The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Adventures ofSherlock Holmesby Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
(#15in our series bySir Arthur Conan Doyle)

Copyright laws are changing all over the world. Be sure to check the
copyright laws for your country before downloading or redistributing
this or anyother Project Gutenberg eBook.This header should be the firstthing seen whenviewing this Project
Gutenberg file.  Please donot remove it.Do not change oredit the
headerwithout writtenpermission.

Please read the "legal small print," and other information about the
eBook and Project Gutenberg at the bottom ofthis file.  Included is
important information about your specific rights and restrictions in
howthe file may beused.  You canalso find out about how to makea
donation to Project Gutenberg,and how to getinvolved.


**Welcome To The World of Free PlainVanilla Electronic Texts**

**eBooks Readable By Both Humans and By Computers,Since 1971**

*****These eBooksWere Prepared ByThousands of Volunteers!*****Title: The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes

Author: Sir Arthur Conan Doyle

Release Date: March,1999  [EBook #1661]
[Most recently updated: November 29, 2002]Edition: 12

Language: EnglishCharacter set encoding: ASCII

*** START OF THEPROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, THE ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLMES ***(Additional editing by Jose Menendez)



THEADVENTURES OF
SHERLOCK HOLMES

BY

SIR ARTHUR CONAN DOYLE

CONTENTS

I.	A Scandal in Bohemia
II.The Red-HeadedLeague
III.	A Case of Identity
IV.	The BoscombeValley Mystery
V.	The Five Orange Pips
VI.	The Man with the Twisted Lip
VII.	TheAdventure of the Blue CarbuncleVIII.	The Adventure of the Speckled Band
IX.	The Adventure of the Engineer's Thumb
X.	The Adventure of the Noble Bachelor
XI.	The Adventure ofthe Beryl Coronet
XII.	The Adventure of the Copper Beeches


ADVENTURE  I.  A SCANDAL IN BOHEMIAI.


To Sherlock Holmes she isalways the woman. I have seldomheard him mention her under anyother name. Inhis eyes she eclipses and predominates the wholeof her sex. Itwas not that hefelt any emotionakin to love for Irene Adler. All emotions, andthat one particularly, were abhorrent to his cold, precise butadmirably balanced mind. He was,I take it, themost perfect reasoning and observing machine that the world hasseen, but as a lover he would have placed himself in a false position. He neverspoke of the softer passions, save with a gibe and a sneer. Theywere admirablethings for the observer--excellent for drawing the veil from men's motives and actions. But forthe trained reasoner to admit such intrusions into his own delicate and finely adjusted temperament was to introduce a distracting factor whichmight throw a doubt upon all hismental results.Grit in a sensitive instrument,or a crack in one of his own high-power lenses,would not be more disturbing than a strong emotion in a naturesuch as his. Andyet there was but one woman tohim, and that woman was the lateIrene Adler, ofdubious and questionable memory.

I had seen little of Holmes lately. My marriage had drifted us away from eachother. My own complete happiness, and the home-centred interests which rise uparound the man who first finds himself master ofhis own establishment, were sufficient to absorb all my attention, while Holmes, who loathed every form of society with his whole Bohemian soul, remained in our lodgings in Baker Street, buried among his oldbooks, and alternating from week to week between cocaine and ambition, the drowsiness of the drug, and the fierce energy of hisown keen nature. He was still,as ever, deeplyattracted by thestudy of crime,and occupied his immense faculties and extraordinary powers ofobservation in following out those clues, and clearing up thosemysteries whichhad been abandoned as hopeless by the official police. From timeto time I heardsome vague account of his doings: of his summons to Odessa in the case of the Trepoff murder, of his clearing up of the singular tragedy of theAtkinson brothers at Trincomalee, and finally of the mission which he had accomplished so delicately and successfully for the reigning family of Holland. Beyond these signs ofhis activity, however, which Imerely shared with all the readers of the dailypress, I knew little of my former friend and companion.

One night--it was on the twentieth of March, 1888--I was returning froma journey to apatient (for I had now returnedto civil practice), when my wayled me through Baker Street. AsI passed the well-remembered door, which must always be associated in my mind with my wooing, and with the darkincidents of theStudy in Scarlet, I was seizedwith a keen desire to see Holmesagain, and to know how he was employing his extraordinary powers. His rooms were brilliantly lit, and, even asI looked up, I saw his tall, spare figure pass twice in a dark silhouette against the blind. Hewas pacing the room swiftly, eagerly, with his head sunk upon his chest and hishands clasped behind him. To me,who knew his every mood and habit, his attitudeand manner toldtheir own story. He was at workagain. He had risen out of hisdrug-created dreams and was hotupon the scent of some new problem. I rang the bell and was shown up to the chamber which had formerly been in part my own.

Hismanner was noteffusive. It seldom was; but hewas glad, I think, to see me. With hardly a wordspoken, but with a kindly eye,he waved me to an armchair, threw across his case of cigars, andindicated a spirit case and a gasogene in the corner. Then he stood before thefire and lookedme over in his singular introspective fashion."Wedlock suits you," he remarked. "I think, Watson, that you have put on seven and a half poundssince I saw you."

"Seven!" I answered.

"Indeed, I should havethought a little more. Just a trifle more, I fancy, Watson. Andin practice again, I observe. You did not tellme that you intended to go intoharness."

"Then, how do you know?"

"I see it,I deduce it. Howdo I know thatyou have been getting yourself very wet lately,and that you have a most clumsyand careless servant girl?"

"Mydear Holmes," said I, "this istoo much. You would certainly have been burned,had you lived afew centuries ago. It is true that I had a country walk on Thursday and came home in a dreadfulmess, but as I have changed my clothes I can't imagine how you deduce it. As toMary Jane, she is incorrigible,and my wife hasgiven her notice, but there, again, I fail to see how you work it out."

He chuckled to himselfand rubbed his long, nervous hands together.

"It is simplicityitself," said he; "my eyes tellme that on the inside of your left shoe, just where the firelight strikes it, the leather is scored by six almost parallel cuts.Obviously theyhave been causedby someone whohas very carelessly scraped round the edges of the sole in orderto remove crusted mud from it.Hence, you see,my double deduction that you hadbeen out in vile weather, and that you had a particularly malignant boot-slitting specimen of the London slavey. As to your practice, if a gentleman walks intomy rooms smelling of iodoform,with a black mark of nitrate ofsilver upon hisright forefinger, and a bulge onthe right sideof his top-hat to show where hehas secreted hisstethoscope, Imust be dull, indeed, if I do not pronounce himto be an activemember of the medical profession."

I could nothelp laughing atthe ease with which he explained his process ofdeduction. "When I hear you give your reasons,"I remarked, "the thing always appears to me tobe so ridiculously simple that Icould easily doit myself, though at each successive instance of your reasoningI am baffled until you explainyour process. And yet I believethat my eyes areas good as yours."

"Quite so,"he answered, lighting a cigarette, and throwinghimself down into an armchair."You see, but you do not observe. The distinction is clear. Forexample, you have frequently seen the steps which lead up from the hall to thisroom."

"Frequently."

"How often?"

"Well, somehundreds of times."

"Then howmany are there?""How many? I don't know."

"Quite so! You havenot observed. And yet you haveseen. That is just my point. Now, I know that there are seventeen steps, becauseI have both seen and observed.By the way, since you are interested in these little problems, and since you aregood enough tochronicle one ortwo of my trifling experiences,you may be interested in this."He threw over asheet of thick,pink-tinted notepaper which hadbeen lying openupon the table."It came by thelast post," said he. "Read it aloud."

The notewas undated, and without eithersignature or address.

"There will call upon you to-night, at aquarter to eight o'clock," it said, "a gentleman who desires toconsult you upon a matter of the very deepest moment. Your recent services to one of the royalhouses of Europehave shown thatyou are one whomay safely be trusted with matters which are ofan importance which can hardlybe exaggerated.This account ofyou we have fromall quarters received. Be in your chamber thenat that hour, and do not take itamiss if your visitor wear a mask."

"This is indeed a mystery," I remarked. "What do you imagine that it means?"

"I have no data yet. It is acapital mistaketo theorise before one has data. Insensibly onebegins to twistfacts to suit theories, insteadof theories tosuit facts. Butthe note itself.What do you deduce from it?"

Icarefully examined the writing,and the paper upon which it waswritten.

"Theman who wrote itwas presumablywell to do," I remarked, endeavouring to imitatemy companion'sprocesses. "Suchpaper could notbe bought underhalf a crown apacket. It is peculiarly strongand stiff."

"Peculiar--that isthe very word,"said Holmes. "Itis not an English paper at all.Hold it up to the light."

I did so, and saw alarge "E" with asmall "g," a "P," and a large "G" with a small"t" woven into the texture of the paper.

"Whatdo you make of that?" asked Holmes.

"The name of the maker, nodoubt; or his monogram, rather.""Not at all. The 'G' with thesmall 't' standsfor 'Gesellschaft,' which is the German for 'Company.' It is acustomary contraction like our 'Co.' 'P,' of course, stands for'Papier.' Now for the 'Eg.' Letus glance at ourContinental Gazetteer." He tookdown a heavy brown volume fromhis shelves. "Eglow, Eglonitz--here we are, Egria. It is in a German-speaking country--in Bohemia, not far fromCarlsbad. 'Remarkable as being the scene of thedeath of Wallenstein, and for its numerous glass-factories and paper-mills.' Ha,ha, my boy, what do you make ofthat?" His eyessparkled, and he sent up a great blue triumphant cloud from hiscigarette.

"The paper was madein Bohemia," Isaid.

"Precisely. And the man who wrote the note is a German. Do you note the peculiar construction of the sentence--'This account of you we have from all quarters received.'A Frenchman or Russian could nothave written that. It is the German who is so uncourteous to his verbs. It onlyremains, therefore, to discoverwhat is wantedby this German who writes upon Bohemian paper and prefers wearing a mask to showing his face. And here he comes,if I am not mistaken, to resolve all our doubts."

As he spokethere was the sharp sound of horses' hoofs and grating wheels against the curb,followed by a sharp pull at thebell. Holmes whistled.

"A pair,by the sound,"said he. "Yes,"he continued, glancing out of the window. "A nice little brougham and a pair ofbeauties. A hundred and fifty guineas apiece. There's money in this case, Watson, if there is nothing else."

"Ithink that I had better go, Holmes."

"Not a bit, Doctor. Staywhere you are. Iam lost withoutmy Boswell. Andthis promises to be interesting. It would be apity to miss it."

"But your client--"

"Never mind him. I may want your help, and so may he. Here he comes. Sitdown in that armchair, Doctor,and give us yourbest attention."

A slow and heavy step, whichhad been heard upon the stairs and in the passage, paused immediately outside the door. Then there was a loud and authoritativetap.

"Come in!"said Holmes.

Aman entered whocould hardly have been less than six feet six inches in height,with the chestand limbs of a Hercules. His dress was rich witha richness which would, in England, be looked upon as akin to bad taste. Heavybands of astrakhan were slashedacross the sleeves and fronts ofhis double-breasted coat, whilethe deep blue cloak which was thrown over his shoulders was lined with flame-coloured silk andsecured at the neck with a brooch which consisted of a single flaming beryl. Boots which extended halfway up hiscalves, and which were trimmedat the tops withrich brown fur,completed the impression of barbaric opulence which was suggested by his wholeappearance. He carried a broad-brimmed hat in his hand, while hewore across theupper part of his face, extending down past thecheekbones, a black vizard mask, which he had apparently adjusted that very moment, for his hand was still raised to it as he entered. From thelower part of the face he appeared to be a manof strong character, with a thick, hanging lip,and a long, straight chin suggestive of resolution pushed to thelength of obstinacy.

"You hadmy note?" he asked with a deep harsh voice and astrongly markedGerman accent."I told you thatI would call."He looked from one to the otherof us, as if uncertain which toaddress.

"Praytake a seat," said Holmes. "Thisis my friend and colleague, Dr.Watson, who isoccasionally good enough to helpme in my cases.Whom have I thehonour to address?"

"You may address me as theCount Von Kramm, a Bohemian nobleman. I understand that this gentleman, your friend, is a man of honour and discretion, whom Imay trust with amatter of the most extreme importance. If not,I should much prefer to communicate with you alone."

I rose togo, but Holmes caught me by thewrist and pushedme back into mychair. "It is both, or none," said he. "You maysay before thisgentleman anything which you may say to me."

The Count shrugged his broad shoulders. "Then I must begin," saidhe, "by bindingyou both to absolute secrecy for two years; atthe end of thattime the matterwill be of no importance. At present it is not too much to say that it is of such weight it mayhave an influence upon Europeanhistory."

"I promise," said Holmes.

"And I.""You will excusethis mask," continued our strange visitor. "Theaugust person who employs me wishes his agent to be unknown toyou, and I may confess at once that the title bywhich I have just called myselfis not exactlymy own."

"I wasaware of it," said Holmes dryly.

"The circumstances are of great delicacy, andevery precaution has to be taken to quench whatmight grow to be an immense scandal and seriously compromise one of the reigning families of Europe. To speak plainly, the matter implicates the great House ofOrmstein, hereditary kings of Bohemia."

"I wasalso aware of that," murmured Holmes, settlinghimself down inhis armchair andclosing his eyes.

Our visitorglanced with some apparent surprise at the languid, lounging figure of the man who had been no doubt depicted tohim as the mostincisive reasoner and most energetic agent in Europe. Holmes slowly reopened his eyes and looked impatiently athis gigantic client.

"If yourMajesty would condescend to state your case," heremarked, "I should be better able to advise you."

The man sprang from his chair and paced upand down the room in uncontrollable agitation. Then, with a gesture of desperation, he tore themask from his face and hurled itupon the ground. "You are right," he cried; "Iam the King. Whyshould I attempt to conceal it?"

"Why, indeed?" murmured Holmes. "Your Majestyhad not spokenbefore I was aware that I was addressing WilhelmGottsreich Sigismond von Ormstein, Grand Duke of Cassel-Felstein, and hereditary King of Bohemia."

"But you can understand," said our strangevisitor, sittingdown once moreand passing hishand over his high white forehead, "you can understand that I amnot accustomedto doing such business in my ownperson. Yet thematter was so delicate that I could not confideit to an agentwithout puttingmyself in his power. I have comeincognito fromPrague for the purpose of consulting you."

"Then, pray consult," said Holmes, shutting his eyesonce more.

"The facts are briefly these: Somefive years ago,during a lengthyvisit to Warsaw, I made the acquaintance of thewell-known adventuress, Irene Adler. The name is no doubt familiar to you."

"Kindly look her up in my index, Doctor," murmuredHolmes withoutopening his eyes. For many yearshe had adopteda system of docketing all paragraphs concerningmen and things,so that it was difficult to namea subject or aperson on whichhe could not atonce furnish information. In this case I found her biography sandwiched in between that of a Hebrew rabbi and that of a staff-commander who hadwritten a monograph upon the deep-sea fishes.

"Let me see!" said Holmes. "Hum!Born in New Jersey in the year 1858. Contralto--hum! La Scala, hum! Prima donnaImperial Opera of Warsaw--yes! Retired from operatic stage--ha!Living in London--quite so! YourMajesty, as I understand, became entangled withthis young person, wrote her some compromisingletters, and isnow desirous ofgetting those letters back."

"Precisely so. Buthow--"

"Was there a secret marriage?"

"None.""No legal papers or certificates?"

"None."

"Then I fail to follow your Majesty. If this young person shouldproduce her letters for blackmailing or other purposes, how is she to prove their authenticity?""There is thewriting."

"Pooh, pooh! Forgery."

"My private note-paper."

"Stolen."

"My ownseal."

"Imitated."

"My photograph."

"Bought.""We were bothin the photograph."

"Oh, dear!That is very bad! Your Majesty has indeed committed an indiscretion."

"I was mad--insane."

"You have compromised yourself seriously."

"I wasonly Crown Prince then. I was young. I am but thirty now."

"Itmust be recovered."

"We have tried and failed.""Your Majestymust pay. It must be bought."

"She will not sell."

"Stolen, then."

"Five attempts have been made. Twice burglars in my pay ransacked her house. Once we diverted her luggagewhen she travelled. Twice she has been waylaid.There has been no result."

"Nosign of it?"

"Absolutely none."Holmes laughed. "It is quite apretty little problem," said he.

"But a very serious one to me," returned theKing reproachfully.

"Very, indeed. And what does she propose todo with the photograph?"

"To ruin me."

"But how?"

"I am about to be married."

"So I have heard."

"To Clotilde Lothman vonSaxe-Meningen, second daughter of the King of Scandinavia. You may know the strict principles ofher family. Sheis herself thevery soul of delicacy. A shadowof a doubt as tomy conduct would bring the matter to an end.""And Irene Adler?"

"Threatens to send them thephotograph. Andshe will do it.I know that shewill do it. Youdo not know her,but she has a soul of steel. She has the face of the most beautiful of women, and the mind of the most resoluteof men. Ratherthan I should marry another woman, there are nolengths to whichshe would not go--none."

"Youare sure that she has not sent it yet?"

"I am sure."

"And why?"

"Because shehas said that she would send iton the day whenthe betrothal was publicly proclaimed. That willbe next Monday."

"Oh, then wehave three daysyet," said Holmes with a yawn. "That is very fortunate, as I have one or two matters of importance to look intojust at present.Your Majesty will, of course, stay in London for the present?""Certainly. Youwill find me atthe Langham under the name of the Count Von Kramm."

"Then I shall drop you a line to let you know how we progress."

"Pray doso. I shall be all anxiety."

"Then, as to money?"

"You have carte blanche."

"Absolutely?"

"Itell you that Iwould give oneof the provincesof my kingdom to have that photograph."

"And for present expenses?"

The Kingtook a heavy chamois leather bagfrom under hiscloak and laid it on the table."There are three hundred poundsin gold and seven hundred in notes," he said.Holmes scribbleda receipt upona sheet of his note-book and handed it to him."And Mademoiselle's address?" heasked.

"Is Briony Lodge, Serpentine Avenue, St. John's Wood."Holmes took a note of it. "Oneother question,"said he. "Was the photograph acabinet?"

"It was."

"Then, good-night, your Majesty, and I trust that we shallsoon have somegood news for you. And good-night, Watson," he added, as the wheels of the royalbrougham rolleddown the street. "If you will be good enough tocall to-morrowafternoon at three o'clock I should like to chatthis little matter over with you."

II.


At three o'clock precisely I was at Baker Street, butHolmes had notyet returned. The landlady informed me that he had left the house shortly aftereight o'clock inthe morning. Isat down besidethe fire, however, with the intention of awaiting him, however long he might be.I was already deeply interestedin his inquiry,for, though itwas surrounded by none of the grim and strange features which were associated with the two crimes which I have already recorded,still, the nature of the case and the exalted station of his client gave it a character of itsown. Indeed, apart from the nature of the investigation which myfriend had on hand, there was something in hismasterly grasp of a situation, and his keen, incisive reasoning,which made it apleasure to meto study his system of work, andto follow the quick, subtle methods by which hedisentangled the most inextricable mysteries. So accustomed wasI to his invariable success that the very possibility of his failing had ceasedto enter into my head.

It wasclose upon fourbefore the dooropened, and a drunken-looking groom, ill-kempt and side-whiskered, with an inflamed face and disreputable clothes, walked into the room. Accustomed as I was tomy friend's amazing powers in the use of disguises, I had to look three times before I was certain that it was indeed he. With anod he vanishedinto the bedroom, whence he emerged in five minutes tweed-suited and respectable, as of old. Putting his handsinto his pockets, he stretched out his legs in front of the fireand laughed heartily for some minutes.

"Well,really!" he cried, and then he choked and laughed again until hewas obliged tolie back, limp and helpless, inthe chair.

"What is it?"

"It'squite too funny. I am sure youcould never guess how I employedmy morning, orwhat I ended bydoing."

"I can't imagine. I suppose that you have been watchingthe habits, andperhaps the house, of Miss Irene Adler."

"Quite so; but the sequel was ratherunusual. I willtell you, however. I left the house a little after eight o'clockthis morning inthe character of a groom out ofwork. There isa wonderful sympathy and freemasonry among horsey men. Be one ofthem, and you will know all that there is to know. I soon foundBriony Lodge. It is a bijou villa, with a garden at the back, but built out infront right up to the road, twostories. Chubb lock to the door.Large sitting-room on the rightside, well furnished, with longwindows almostto the floor, and those preposterous English window fasteners which a child could open. Behind there was nothingremarkable, save that the passage window couldbe reached fromthe top of the coach-house. I walked round it and examined it closely from everypoint of view,but without noting anything elseof interest.

"I then lounged down the street and found, as I expected, that there was a mews in a lane which runs down by onewall of the garden. I lent the ostlers a hand inrubbing down their horses, andreceived in exchange twopence, aglass of half-and-half, two fills of shag tobacco, and as muchinformation as Icould desire about Miss Adler,to say nothing of half a dozen other people in the neighbourhoodin whom I was not in the leastinterested, butwhose biographies I was compelled to listen to.""And what of Irene Adler?" I asked.

"Oh, shehas turned all the men's heads down in that part. She is the daintiest thing under a bonnet on this planet. So say the Serpentine-mews, to a man. She lives quietly, sings at concerts, drives out at five everyday, and returns at seven sharpfor dinner. Seldom goes out atother times, except when she sings. Has only onemale visitor, but a good deal of him. He is dark, handsome, anddashing, nevercalls less thanonce a day, andoften twice. Heis a Mr. GodfreyNorton, of theInner Temple. See the advantagesof a cabman asa confidant. They had driven himhome a dozen times from Serpentine-mews, and knew all about him. When I had listened to all they had to tell, Ibegan to walk up and down nearBriony Lodge once more, and to think over my plan of campaign."This Godfrey Norton was evidently an importantfactor in the matter. He was a lawyer. That sounded ominous. What was the relation between them,and what the object of his repeated visits? Wasshe his client,his friend, orhis mistress? Ifthe former, shehad probably transferred the photograph to hiskeeping. If thelatter, it was less likely. On the issue of thisquestion depended whether I should continue mywork at Briony Lodge, or turn myattention to the gentleman's chambers in the Temple. It was a delicate point, and it widened the field of my inquiry. I fear that I bore you with these details, but I have tolet you see my little difficulties, if you are to understand thesituation."

"Iam following you closely," I answered.

"I wasstill balancingthe matter in mymind when a hansom cab drove upto Briony Lodge, and a gentleman sprang out. Hewas a remarkably handsome man,dark, aquiline,and moustached--evidently the man of whom I hadheard. He appeared to be in a great hurry, shouted to the cabmanto wait, and brushed past the maid who opened the door with theair of a man who was thoroughlyat home.

"He was in the houseabout half an hour, and I couldcatch glimpses of him in the windows of the sitting-room, pacingup and down, talking excitedly,and waving hisarms. Of her I could see nothing. Presently he emerged, lookingeven more flurried than before.As he stepped upto the cab, hepulled a gold watch from his pocket and looked at it earnestly,'Drive like thedevil,' he shouted, 'first to Gross & Hankey's in Regent Street,and then to theChurch of St. Monica in the Edgeware Road. Halfa guinea if youdo it in twentyminutes!'

"Away they went, andI was just wondering whether Ishould not do well to follow them when up the lane came a neat little landau, the coachman withhis coat only half-buttoned, andhis tie under his ear, while all the tags of his harness were sticking out of the buckles. It hadn't pulled upbefore she shotout of the halldoor and into it. I only caughta glimpse of herat the moment,but she was a lovely woman, witha face that a man might die for.

" 'The Churchof St. Monica,John,' she cried, 'and half a sovereign if you reach it in twenty minutes.'

"This was quite toogood to lose, Watson. I was just balancing whether I should runfor it, or whether I should perch behind her landau when a cabcame through thestreet. The driver looked twiceat such a shabby fare, but I jumped in before he could object.'The Church of St. Monica,' saidI, 'and half asovereign if youreach it in twenty minutes.' Itwas twenty-fiveminutes to twelve, and of course it was clear enough what was in the wind.

"Mycabby drove fast. I don't thinkI ever drove faster, but the others were therebefore us. The cab and the landau with their steaming horses were in front of the door when I arrived. I paid the man and hurried into the church. There was nota soul there save the two whomI had followed and a surpliced clergyman, who seemed to be expostulating with them. They were all three standingin a knot in front of the altar. I lounged up the side aisle like any other idler who has dropped into a church. Suddenly, to my surprise, thethree at the altar faced round to me, and Godfrey Norton came running as hard ashe could towards me.

" 'ThankGod,' he cried.'You'll do. Come! Come!'

" 'What then?' I asked.

" 'Come, man,come, only three minutes, or itwon't be legal.'

"I was half-dragged up to thealtar, and before I knew whereI was I found myself mumbling responses which were whispered inmy ear, and vouching for thingsof which I knewnothing, and generally assistingin the secure tying up of IreneAdler, spinster, to Godfrey Norton, bachelor. It was all done in an instant, and there was thegentleman thanking me on the oneside and the lady on the other,while the clergyman beamed on me in front. It was the most preposterous position in which I ever found myself in my life, and it was the thought of it that started me laughingjust now. It seems that there had been some informality about their license, that the clergymanabsolutely refused to marry them without a witness of some sort, and that my lucky appearance saved the bridegroom from havingto sally out into the streets insearch of a best man. The bridegave me a sovereign, and I meanto wear it on my watch chain inmemory of the occasion."

"Thisis a very unexpected turn of affairs," said I;"and what then?""Well, I foundmy plans very seriously menaced. It looked as if the pair mighttake an immediate departure, and so necessitatevery prompt andenergetic measures on my part.At the church door, however, they separated, hedriving back tothe Temple, andshe to her own house. 'I shall drive out in thepark at five asusual,' she saidas she left him. I heard no more. They drove away in differentdirections, andI went off to make my own arrangements."

"Whichare?"

"Some cold beef and a glass of beer," heanswered, ringing the bell. "Ihave been too busy to think of food, and I am likely to be busier still this evening. By the way, Doctor, I shall want your co-operation."

"I shall be delighted."

"You don'tmind breaking the law?"

"Not inthe least."

"Nor running a chance of arrest?""Not in a goodcause."

"Oh, the cause is excellent!"

"Then Iam your man."

"I was sure thatI might rely onyou."

"But whatis it you wish?"

"When Mrs. Turner has broughtin the tray I will make it clear to you. Now,"he said as he turned hungrily onthe simple farethat our landlady had provided,"I must discussit while I eat,for I have notmuch time. It isnearly five now. In two hours we must be on thescene of action. Miss Irene, orMadame, rather,returns from her drive at seven. We must be atBriony Lodge tomeet her."

"Andwhat then?"

"You must leave that to me. I havealready arranged what is to occur. There is only one point on which I must insist. You must notinterfere, comewhat may. You understand?"

"Iam to be neutral?"

"To do nothing whatever. There will probablybe some small unpleasantness. Do not join in it. It will end inmy being conveyed into the house. Four or fiveminutes afterwards the sitting-room window willopen. You are tostation yourself close to thatopen window."

"Yes."

"You areto watch me, forI will be visible to you."

"Yes."

"And when Iraise my hand--so--you will throw into the roomwhat I give youto throw, and will, at the sametime, raise thecry of fire. You quite follow me?"

"Entirely.""It is nothingvery formidable," he said, taking a long cigar-shaped roll fromhis pocket. "Itis an ordinaryplumber's smoke-rocket, fitted with a cap at either end to makeit self-lighting. Your task is confined to that.When you raiseyour cry of fire, it will be taken up by quite anumber of people. You may thenwalk to the endof the street, and I will rejoinyou in ten minutes. I hope thatI have made myself clear?"

"Iam to remain neutral, to get near the window, towatch you, andat the signal tothrow in this object, then to raise the cry offire, and to wait you at the corner of the street."

"Precisely."

"Then you mayentirely rely on me."

"That isexcellent. I think, perhaps, itis almost timethat I prepare for the new roleI have to play."He disappearedinto his bedroom and returned in a few minutesin the characterof an amiable and simple-mindedNonconformist clergyman. His broad black hat, his baggy trousers, his white tie, his sympathetic smile, and general look of peering and benevolent curiosity were such as Mr. John Hare alone could have equalled. It was not merely that Holmes changed his costume. His expression, his manner, his very soulseemed to varywith every freshpart that he assumed. The stagelost a fine actor, even as science lost an acute reasoner, whenhe became a specialist in crime.

It was a quarter past six when we left BakerStreet, and it still wanted tenminutes to the hour when we found ourselves in Serpentine Avenue. It was alreadydusk, and the lamps were just being lighted aswe paced up anddown in front ofBriony Lodge, waiting for the coming of its occupant. The housewas just such as I had picturedit from Sherlock Holmes' succinct description,but the localityappeared to beless private than I expected. Onthe contrary, for a small street in a quiet neighbourhood, it was remarkably animated. There was a group of shabbily dressed men smoking and laughing in a corner, a scissors-grinder with hiswheel, two guardsmen who were flirting with a nurse-girl, and several well-dressed young men whowere lounging up and down withcigars in theirmouths.

"You see," remarked Holmes, as we pacedto and fro in front of the house, "this marriage rather simplifies matters. Thephotograph becomes a double-edged weapon now. The chances are that she would beas averse to its being seen byMr. Godfrey Norton, as our client is to its coming to the eyes of his princess.Now the questionis, Where are we to find the photograph?"

"Where, indeed?"

"It is most unlikely that she carries it about with her. It is cabinet size. Too large for easy concealment abouta woman's dress.She knows thatthe King is capable of having her waylaid and searched. Two attempts of the sorthave already been made. We maytake it, then, that she does notcarry it aboutwith her."

"Where, then?"

"Herbanker or her lawyer. There isthat double possibility. But I am inclined to think neither. Women are naturallysecretive, andthey like to dotheir own secreting. Why shouldshe hand it overto anyone else?She could trusther own guardianship, but she could not tell what indirect or political influence might be brought to bear upona business man.Besides, remember that she hadresolved to useit within a fewdays. It must bewhere she can lay her hands upon it. It must bein her own house."

"But it hastwice been burgled."

"Pshaw! They did not knowhow to look.""But how will you look?"

"I will not look."

"What then?"

"I will get her to show me."

"But she will refuse.""She will notbe able to. ButI hear the rumble of wheels. Itis her carriage.Now carry out my orders to theletter."

As hespoke the gleamof the sidelights of a carriagecame round the curve of the avenue. It was a smart little landauwhich rattled up to the door ofBriony Lodge. As it pulled up,one of the loafing men at the corner dashed forward to open thedoor in the hopeof earning a copper, but was elbowed away by another loafer, who had rushed upwith the same intention. A fierce quarrel brokeout, which was increased by thetwo guardsmen, who took sides with one of the loungers, and by the scissors-grinder, who was equally hot upon the other side. Ablow was struck,and in an instant the lady, whohad stepped from her carriage,was the centre of a little knotof flushed and struggling men, who struck savagely at each otherwith their fists and sticks. Holmes dashed intothe crowd to protect the lady;but, just as hereached her, hegave a cry and dropped to the ground, with the blood running freely down his face. At his fall the guardsmen took to their heelsin one direction and the loungers in the other,while a numberof better dressed people, who had watched the scuffle without taking part in it,crowded in to help the lady andto attend to the injured man. Irene Adler, as Iwill still callher, had hurried up the steps;but she stood atthe top with her superb figureoutlined againstthe lights of the hall, lookingback into the street.

"Is thepoor gentleman much hurt?" she asked.

"He is dead," cried several voices.

"No,no, there's life in him!" shouted another. "Buthe'll be gone before you can get him to hospital."

"He's a brave fellow," saida woman. "Theywould have had the lady's purseand watch if ithadn't been forhim. They were agang, and a rough one, too. Ah,he's breathingnow."

"He can'tlie in the street. May we bringhim in, marm?""Surely. Bringhim into the sitting-room. Thereis a comfortable sofa. This way, please!"

Slowly and solemnlyhe was borne into Briony Lodge and laid out in the principal room, while I stillobserved the proceedings from my post by the window. The lampshad been lit, but the blinds hadnot been drawn,so that I couldsee Holmes as he lay upon the couch. I do not know whether he was seized with compunction at that moment for the part he was playing, but I know that I never felt more heartily ashamed of myself in my life than when I saw the beautiful creature against whom I was conspiring, or the grace and kindlinesswith which shewaited upon theinjured man. Andyet it would bethe blackest treachery to Holmes to draw back now from the partwhich he had intrusted to me. Ihardened my heart, and took thesmoke-rocket from under my ulster. After all, Ithought, we arenot injuring her. We are but preventing her from injuring another.

Holmes hadsat up upon thecouch, and I sawhim motion likea man who is inneed of air. Amaid rushed across and threw open the window. Atthe same instant I saw him raise his hand and at the signal I tossed my rocketinto the room with a cry of "Fire!" The word wasno sooner out of my mouth thanthe whole crowdof spectators, well dressed andill--gentlemen,ostlers, and servant maids--joined in a generalshriek of "Fire!" Thick clouds of smoke curled through the roomand out at the open window. I caught a glimpse of rushing figures, and a momentlater the voiceof Holmes from within assuring them that it wasa false alarm. Slipping throughthe shouting crowd I made my wayto the corner of the street, and in ten minuteswas rejoiced tofind my friend's arm in mine, and to get away from the scene ofuproar. He walked swiftly and in silence for some few minutes until we had turned down one of the quiet streetswhich lead towards the EdgewareRoad.

"You didit very nicely,Doctor," he remarked. "Nothingcould have beenbetter. It is all right."

"Youhave the photograph?"

"I know where it is."

"And how did you find out?"

"Sheshowed me, as Itold you she would."

"I am still in the dark.""I do not wishto make a mystery," said he, laughing. "The matter was perfectlysimple. You, ofcourse, saw that everyone in the street was anaccomplice. Theywere all engaged for the evening."

"I guessedas much."

"Then, when the row broke out, I hada little moist red paint in thepalm of my hand.I rushed forward, fell down, clapped my hand tomy face, and became a piteous spectacle. It isan old trick.""That also I could fathom."

"Then they carriedme in. She was bound to have mein. What else could she do? Andinto her sitting-room, which wasthe very room which I suspected. It lay betweenthat and her bedroom, and I wasdetermined to see which. They laid me on a couch, I motioned for air, they werecompelled to open the window, and you had yourchance."

"How did that help you?"

"It was all-important. Whena woman thinks that her house ison fire, her instinct is at once to rush to thething which shevalues most. Itis a perfectlyoverpowering impulse, and I havemore than oncetaken advantageof it. In the case of the Darlington Substitution Scandal it wasof use to me, and also in the Arnsworth Castlebusiness. A married woman grabsat her baby; anunmarried one reaches for her jewel-box. Now itwas clear to methat our lady ofto-day had nothing in the housemore precious to her than whatwe are in questof. She would rush to secure it.The alarm of fire was admirablydone. The smokeand shouting were enough to shake nerves of steel. She responded beautifully. The photograph isin a recess behind a sliding panel just above the right bell-pull. She was there in an instant,and I caught aglimpse of it asshe half drew it out. When I cried out that itwas a false alarm, she replacedit, glanced at the rocket, rushed from the room,and I have notseen her since.I rose, and, making my excuses,escaped from thehouse. I hesitated whether to attempt to securethe photographat once; but thecoachman had come in, and as hewas watching menarrowly, it seemed safer to wait. A little over-precipitance may ruin all."

"And now?" I asked.

"Our quest is practically finished. I shallcall with the King to-morrow, and with you, if you care to comewith us. We willbe shown into the sitting-roomto wait for thelady, but it isprobable that when she comes shemay find neither us nor the photograph. It might be a satisfaction to his Majesty to regain itwith his own hands."

"And whenwill you call?""At eight in the morning. She will not be up, so that we shallhave a clear field. Besides, wemust be prompt,for this marriage may mean a complete change inher life and habits. I must wireto the King without delay."

Wehad reached Baker Street and had stopped at thedoor. He was searching his pockets for the keywhen someone passing said:

"Good-night, MisterSherlock Holmes."

There were several people onthe pavement atthe time, but the greeting appeared to come froma slim youth inan ulster who had hurried by."I've heard thatvoice before,"said Holmes, staring down the dimly lit street."Now, I wonder who the deuce that could have been."

III.


I slept at Baker Street that night,and we were engaged upon our toast and coffee inthe morning when the King of Bohemia rushed into the room.

"You have really got it!" he cried,grasping Sherlock Holmes by either shoulder andlooking eagerlyinto his face."Not yet."

"But you have hopes?"

"I have hopes."

"Then, come. I am all impatience to be gone."

"We must have a cab."

"No,my brougham is waiting."

"Thenthat will simplify matters." Wedescended and started off once more for Briony Lodge.

"Irene Adler is married,"remarked Holmes.

"Married! When?"

"Yesterday."

"But to whom?"

"To an English lawyer named Norton."

"But she could not lovehim."

"I am inhopes that shedoes."

"And whyin hopes?"

"Because it would spare your Majesty all fear of future annoyance.If the lady loves her husband, she does not loveyour Majesty. If she does not love your Majesty, there is no reason why she should interfere with your Majesty's plan."

"It istrue. And yet--! Well! I wish she had been of my own station! What a queen shewould have made!" He relapsed into a moody silence, which was not broken until we drew up in Serpentine Avenue.The door of Briony Lodge was open, and an elderly woman stood upon the steps. She watched us with a sardonic eye as we steppedfrom the brougham.

"Mr. Sherlock Holmes, I believe?" said she."I am Mr. Holmes," answered mycompanion, looking at her with aquestioning andrather startledgaze.

"Indeed!My mistress told me that you were likely to call. She left thismorning with her husband by the5:15 train fromCharing Cross for the Continent."

"What!" Sherlock Holmes staggered back, white with chagrin and surprise. "Doyou mean that she has left England?"

"Never toreturn."

"Andthe papers?" asked the King hoarsely. "All is lost."

"We shallsee." He pushedpast the servantand rushed intothe drawing-room, followed by the King and myself. The furniture was scatteredabout in every direction, with dismantled shelves and open drawers, as if the lady had hurriedlyransacked thembefore her flight. Holmes rushedat the bell-pull, tore back a small sliding shutter, and, plunging in his hand,pulled out a photograph and a letter. The photograph was of Irene Adler herselfin evening dress, the letter was superscribed to "Sherlock Holmes, Esq. To be left till calledfor." My friendtore it open, and we all three read it together.It was dated atmidnight of thepreceding nightand ran in thisway:

"MY DEARMR. SHERLOCK HOLMES,--You reallydid it very well. You took me in completely. Until after the alarm of fire, I had not a suspicion. But then, when I found how Ihad betrayed myself, I began tothink. I had been warned against you months ago. I had been told that, if the King employed anagent, it wouldcertainly be you. And your address had been given me. Yet, withall this, you made me reveal what you wanted toknow. Even afterI became suspicious, I found ithard to think evil of such a dear, kind old clergyman. But, youknow, I have been trained as anactress myself.Male costume isnothing new tome. I often takeadvantage of the freedom whichit gives. I sentJohn, the coachman, to watch you, ran upstairs,got into my walking clothes, asI call them, and came down justas you departed.

"Well, I followed you to yourdoor, and so made sure that I was really an object of interestto the celebrated Mr. Sherlock Holmes. Then I, rather imprudently, wished you good-night, and started for the Temple to see my husband.

"We both thought the best resource wasflight, when pursued by so formidable an antagonist; so you willfind the nest empty when you call to-morrow. Asto the photograph, your clientmay rest in peace. I love and amloved by a better man than he.The King may dowhat he will without hindrance from one whom hehas cruelly wronged. I keep it only to safeguardmyself, and topreserve a weapon which will always secure me from any steps which he might takein the future.I leave a photograph which he might care to possess; and I remain, dear Mr. Sherlock Holmes,


"Very truly yours,"IRENE NORTON, nee ADLER."

"What a woman--oh, what a woman!" cried the King ofBohemia, when wehad all three read this epistle. "Did I not tell you how quickand resolute shewas? Would shenot have made anadmirable queen? Is it not a pity that she wasnot on my level?"

"From what Ihave seen of thelady, she seems, indeed, to beon a very different level to your Majesty," saidHolmes coldly."I am sorry thatI have not beenable to bring your Majesty's business to a moresuccessful conclusion."

"On the contrary, my dear sir," criedthe King; "nothing could be moresuccessful. I know that her word is inviolate.The photograph is now as safe asif it were in the fire."

"I amglad to hear your Majesty say so."

"I am immensely indebted toyou. Pray tellme in what way Ican reward you.This ring--" Heslipped an emerald snake ring from his finger and held it out upon the palm ofhis hand.

"YourMajesty has something which I should value evenmore highly," said Holmes.

"You have but to name it."

"This photograph!"

TheKing stared athim in amazement.

"Irene's photograph!" he cried. "Certainly, if you wish it.""I thank your Majesty. Then there is no more tobe done in thematter. I have the honour to wish you a very good morning." He bowed, and, turning away withoutobserving the hand which the King had stretchedout to him, he set off in my company for his chambers.

And thatwas how a greatscandal threatened to affect the kingdom of Bohemia, and how the best plans ofMr. Sherlock Holmes were beatenby a woman's wit. He used to make merry over thecleverness of women, but I havenot heard him do it of late. And when he speaksof Irene Adler,or when he refers to her photograph, it is always under the honourable title ofthe woman.

ADVENTURE  II.  THERED-HEADED LEAGUE


I had called upon my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, one day in the autumn oflast year and found him in deepconversation with a very stout,florid-faced, elderly gentlemanwith fiery red hair. With an apology for my intrusion, I was about to withdraw when Holmes pulled me abruptly into the room andclosed the doorbehind me.

"Youcould not possibly have come ata better time,my dear Watson,"he said cordially.

"I was afraid that you wereengaged."

"SoI am. Very muchso."

"Then I can wait in the next room."

"Notat all. This gentleman, Mr. Wilson, has been mypartner and helper in many of mymost successfulcases, and I have no doubt thathe will be of the utmost use tome in yours also."

The stout gentleman half rose from his chair and gave a bobof greeting, with a quick little questioning glance from his small fat-encircled eyes.

"Try the settee," saidHolmes, relapsing into his armchair and puttinghis fingertips together, as washis custom whenin judicial moods. "I know, my dear Watson, thatyou share my love of all that is bizarre and outside the conventions and humdrum routine of everyday life. Youhave shown yourrelish for it bythe enthusiasmwhich has prompted you to chronicle, and, if youwill excuse mysaying so, somewhat to embellishso many of my own little adventures."

"Your cases have indeedbeen of the greatest interest tome," I observed.

"You will remember that I remarked the otherday, just beforewe went into the very simple problem presentedby Miss Mary Sutherland, that for strange effects and extraordinary combinationswe must go to life itself, which is always farmore daring thanany effort of the imagination.""A propositionwhich I took the liberty of doubting."

"You did, Doctor, but none the less youmust come roundto my view, forotherwise I shall keep on piling fact upon facton you until your reason breaksdown under themand acknowledges me to be right. Now, Mr. JabezWilson here hasbeen good enough to call upon me this morning,and to begin a narrative which promises to be one of the most singular which I have listened tofor some time. You have heard meremark that thestrangest and most unique things are very oftenconnected not with the larger but with the smaller crimes, andoccasionally, indeed, where there is room for doubt whether anypositive crime has been committed. As far as I have heard, it isimpossible forme to say whether the present case is an instance of crime or not, but the course of events is certainly among the most singularthat I have ever listened to. Perhaps, Mr. Wilson, you would have the great kindness to recommence your narrative. I ask you not merely becausemy friend Dr. Watson has not heard the openingpart but also because the peculiar nature of thestory makes meanxious to haveevery possible detail from yourlips. As a rule,when I have heard some slight indication of thecourse of events, I am able toguide myself bythe thousands ofother similar cases which occurto my memory. In the present instance I am forced to admit thatthe facts are,to the best of my belief, unique."

The portly client puffed outhis chest withan appearance ofsome little pride and pulled adirty and wrinkled newspaper from the inside pocket of his greatcoat. As he glanced down the advertisement column, with his headthrust forwardand the paper flattened out uponhis knee, I took a good look atthe man and endeavoured, afterthe fashion of my companion, toread the indications which mightbe presented byhis dress or appearance.

I didnot gain very much, however, bymy inspection.Our visitor boreevery mark of being an averagecommonplace British tradesman, obese, pompous, and slow. He worerather baggy grey shepherd's check trousers, anot over-clean black frock-coat,unbuttoned in the front, and adrab waistcoat with a heavy brassy Albert chain,and a square pierced bit of metal dangling downas an ornament.A frayed top-hat and a faded brown overcoat with a wrinkled velvet collar lay upon a chair beside him. Altogether, look as I would, there was nothing remarkable about the mansave his blazingred head, and the expression ofextreme chagrinand discontentupon his features.

Sherlock Holmes' quick eye took in my occupation, and he shook his head witha smile as he noticed my questioning glances. "Beyond the obvious facts that hehas at some time done manual labour, that he takes snuff, thathe is a Freemason, that he has been in China, and that he has done a considerable amount of writing lately, I can deduce nothingelse."

Mr. Jabez Wilson started up in his chair, with his forefinger upon thepaper, but his eyes upon my companion.

"How, inthe name of good-fortune, did you know all that, Mr. Holmes?" he asked. "How did you know, forexample, that Idid manual labour. It's as trueas gospel, for Ibegan as a ship's carpenter.""Your hands, mydear sir. Your right hand is quite a size largerthan your left.You have workedwith it, and the muscles are more developed.""Well, the snuff, then, and theFreemasonry?"

"I won't insult your intelligenceby telling youhow I read that,especially as,rather against the strict rulesof your order, you use an arc-and-compass breastpin."

"Ah, of course, I forgotthat. But the writing?"

"What else can be indicated by that right cuff so veryshiny for five inches, and the left one with thesmooth patch near the elbow where you rest it upon the desk?""Well, but China?"

"The fish that you have tattooed immediatelyabove your right wrist could only have been done in China. I have made a smallstudy of tattoomarks and have even contributedto the literature of the subject. That trick ofstaining the fishes' scales of adelicate pink is quite peculiarto China. When,in addition, Isee a Chinese coin hanging fromyour watch-chain, the matter becomes even more simple."

Mr. Jabez Wilson laughed heavily. "Well, I never!" saidhe. "I thoughtat first that you had done something clever, butI see that there was nothing init after all.""I begin to think, Watson," said Holmes, "thatI make a mistakein explaining.'Omne ignotum pro magnifico,' you know, and my poor little reputation, such as it is, will suffer shipwreck if Iam so candid. Can you not findthe advertisement, Mr. Wilson?""Yes, I have got it now," he answered with histhick red fingerplanted halfwaydown the column. "Here it is. This is what began it all. You just read it for yourself, sir."I took the paperfrom him and read as follows:"TO THE RED-HEADED LEAGUE: On account of the bequest of the lateEzekiah Hopkins, of Lebanon, Pennsylvania, U. S. A., there is now another vacancy open which entitles a memberof the League toa salary of $4a week for purely nominal services. All red-headed men who are sound in body andmind and abovethe age of twenty-one years, areeligible. Applyin person on Monday, at eleveno'clock, to Duncan Ross, at theoffices of the League, 7 Pope'sCourt, Fleet Street."

"What onearth does thismean?" I ejaculated after I hadtwice read overthe extraordinary announcement.Holmes chuckledand wriggled inhis chair, as was his habit when in high spirits. "It is a little off the beaten track, isn't it?" said he. "And now, Mr. Wilson, off you go atscratch and tell us all about yourself, your household, and theeffect which this advertisementhad upon your fortunes. You will first make a note, Doctor, ofthe paper and the date."

"It isThe Morning Chronicle of April27, 1890. Just two months ago.""Very good. Now, Mr. Wilson?""Well, it is just as I have beentelling you, Mr. Sherlock Holmes," said Jabez Wilson, mopping his forehead; "Ihave a small pawnbroker's business at Coburg Square, near the City. It's not a very large affair, and of late years it has not done more than just give me a living. I used to be able to keep two assistants, but now I only keep one; and I would have a job to pay him but that he is willingto come for half wages so as tolearn the business."

"What isthe name of thisobliging youth?" asked SherlockHolmes.

"His name is Vincent Spaulding, and he's not such a youth, either. It's hard to say his age. I shouldnot wish a smarter assistant, Mr. Holmes; and Iknow very well that he could better himself andearn twice whatI am able to give him. But, after all, if he issatisfied, why should I put ideas in his head?""Why, indeed? You seem most fortunate in havingan employe whocomes under thefull market price. It is not a common experienceamong employersin this age. Idon't know thatyour assistant is not as remarkable as your advertisement."

"Oh, he has his faults, too," saidMr. Wilson. "Never was such a fellow for photography. Snapping away with a camera when he oughtto be improvinghis mind, and then diving down into the cellar like a rabbit into its hole to develop his pictures. That is hismain fault, buton the whole he's a good worker.There's no vicein him."

"He is still with you, I presume?"

"Yes, sir. He anda girl of fourteen, who does abit of simple cooking and keepsthe place clean--that's all I have in the house,for I am a widower and never had any family. Welive very quietly, sir, the three of us; and wekeep a roof over our heads andpay our debts, if we do nothingmore.

"The first thing that putus out was thatadvertisement.Spaulding, he came down into theoffice just this day eight weeks, with this very paper in his hand, and he says:

" 'I wish tothe Lord, Mr. Wilson, that I wasa red-headed man.'

" 'Why that?' I asks.

" 'Why,' says he, 'here's another vacancy on the League of the Red-headed Men. It'sworth quite a little fortune toany man who getsit, and I understand that thereare more vacancies than there are men, so thatthe trustees areat their wits'end what to do with the money. If my hair wouldonly change colour, here's a nice little crib all ready for me to step into.'

"'Why, what is it, then?' I asked. You see, Mr.Holmes, I am a very stay-at-homeman, and as mybusiness came tome instead of my having to go to it, I was often weeks on end without putting my foot over thedoor-mat. In that way I didn't know much of whatwas going on outside, and I wasalways glad ofa bit of news." 'Have you never heard of the League of the Red-headed Men?' heasked with hiseyes open.

" 'Never.'

" 'Why,I wonder at that, for you are eligible yourselffor one of the vacancies.'

" 'And what are theyworth?' I asked.

" 'Oh, merelya couple of hundred a year, butthe work is slight, and it neednot interfere very much with one's other occupations.'

"Well,you can easily think that that made me prick upmy ears, for thebusiness has not been over goodfor some years,and an extra couple of hundredwould have beenvery handy.

" 'Tell me all about it,' said I." 'Well,' said he, showing me the advertisement,'you can see for yourself thatthe League has avacancy, and there is the address where you should apply for particulars. As far as I can makeout, the Leaguewas founded by an American millionaire, EzekiahHopkins, who wasvery peculiar in his ways. He was himself red-headed, and he had a great sympathy for all red-headed men; so, when he died, itwas found that he had left his enormous fortunein the hands oftrustees, with instructions to apply the interest to the providing of easy berths to men whose hair is of that colour. From allI hear it is splendid pay and very little to do.'

" 'But,' saidI, 'there wouldbe millions ofred-headed men who would apply.'" 'Not so manyas you might think,' he answered. 'You see it is really confined to Londoners,and to grown men. This Americanhad started fromLondon when hewas young, and he wanted to do the old town a good turn. Then, again, I have heard it is no useyour applying ifyour hair is light red, or darkred, or anything but real bright, blazing, fiery red. Now, if you cared to apply, Mr. Wilson, you would just walk in; but perhaps it would hardly be worth yourwhile to put yourself out of the way for the sake of a few hundred pounds.'

"Now, it is a fact, gentlemen, asyou may see foryourselves, thatmy hair is of avery full and rich tint, so that it seemed to me that if therewas to be any competition in thematter I stoodas good a chanceas any man thatI had ever met.Vincent Spaulding seemed to know so much aboutit that I thought he might proveuseful, so I just ordered him to put up the shutters for the day and to come right away with me. He was very willing to have aholiday, so we shut the businessup and startedoff for the address that was given us in the advertisement.

"Inever hope to see such a sight as that again, Mr. Holmes. From north, south, east, and west every man who had ashade of red inhis hair had tramped into the city to answer theadvertisement.Fleet Street waschoked with red-headed folk, and Pope's Court looked like a coster's orange barrow. I should not have thought there were so many in the whole country as were brought togetherby that single advertisement. Every shade of colour they were--straw, lemon, orange, brick, Irish-setter, liver,clay; but, as Spaulding said, there were not many who had the real vivid flame-coloured tint. When I saw how many were waiting,I would have given it up in despair; but Spaulding would not hear of it. How hedid it I couldnot imagine, buthe pushed and pulled and butteduntil he got methrough the crowd, and right upto the steps which led to the office. There wasa double streamupon the stair,some going up in hope, and somecoming back dejected; but we wedged in as wellas we could andsoon found ourselves in the office."

"Your experience has beena most entertaining one," remarked Holmes as hisclient paused and refreshed hismemory with a huge pinch of snuff. "Pray continue your very interesting statement."

"There wasnothing in theoffice but a couple of wooden chairs and a dealtable, behind which sat a smallman with a headthat was even redder than mine.He said a few words to each candidate as he cameup, and then healways managedto find some fault in them whichwould disqualify them. Gettinga vacancy did not seem to be such a very easy matter, after all.However, when our turn came thelittle man wasmuch more favourable to me thanto any of the others, and he closed the door aswe entered, so that he might have a private wordwith us.

" 'This is Mr. JabezWilson,' said myassistant, 'andhe is willing to fill a vacancyin the League.'" 'And he is admirably suitedfor it,' the other answered. 'Hehas every requirement. I cannotrecall when I have seen anything so fine.' He took a step backward, cocked hishead on one side, and gazed at my hair until I felt quite bashful. Then suddenlyhe plunged forward, wrung my hand, and congratulated me warmlyon my success." 'It would be injustice to hesitate,' said he.'You will, however, I am sure, excuse me for taking an obvious precaution.' Withthat he seizedmy hair in bothhis hands, and tugged until I yelled with the pain. 'There is water in your eyes,' said he as hereleased me. 'Iperceive that all is as it should be. But we have to be careful, for we have twice been deceived by wigs and once by paint. I could tell you tales of cobbler'swax which woulddisgust you with human nature.'He stepped overto the window and shouted through it at the topof his voice that the vacancy was filled. A groan of disappointment came up from below, and thefolk all trooped away in different directions until there was not a red-head tobe seen exceptmy own and thatof the manager." 'My name,' said he, 'is Mr. Duncan Ross, andI am myself oneof the pensioners upon the fundleft by our noble benefactor. Are you a marriedman, Mr. Wilson?Have you a family?'

"I answered that I had not.

"His face fell immediately." 'Dear me!' hesaid gravely, 'that is very serious indeed! I amsorry to hear you say that. Thefund was, of course, for the propagation and spread of the red-heads as well asfor their maintenance. It is exceedingly unfortunate that you should be a bachelor.'

"My facelengthened at this, Mr. Holmes,for I thought that I was not tohave the vacancyafter all; butafter thinking it over for a fewminutes he saidthat it would be all right.

"'In the case ofanother,' said he, 'the objection might be fatal, but we must stretch a point infavour of a manwith such a head of hair as yours. When shall you be able to enter upon your new duties?'

" 'Well, it is a little awkward, forI have a business already,' said I.

" 'Oh, never mind about that, Mr. Wilson!'said Vincent Spaulding. 'I should be able to look after that for you.'

" 'Whatwould be the hours?' I asked." 'Ten to two.'"Now a pawnbroker's business ismostly done ofan evening, Mr.Holmes, especially Thursday andFriday evening,which is just before pay-day; soit would suit me very well to earn a little inthe mornings. Besides, I knew that my assistantwas a good man,and that he would see to anything that turned up.

" 'That wouldsuit me very well,' said I. 'And the pay?'

" 'Is $4 a week.'" 'And the work?'

" 'Is purelynominal.'

" 'What do you call purely nominal?'" 'Well, you have to be in theoffice, or at least in the building, the whole time. If you leave, you forfeit your whole position forever. Thewill is very clear upon that point. You don't comply with the conditions if youbudge from the office during that time.'

" 'It's only four hours a day, and I should not thinkof leaving,' said I.

" 'No excuse will avail,'said Mr. DuncanRoss; 'neither sickness nor business nor anything else. There you must stay, oryou lose your billet.'

" 'And the work?'

" 'Isto copy out theEncyclopaedia Britannica. Thereis the first volume of it in that press. You must find your ownink, pens, andblotting-paper,but we provide this table and chair. Will you beready to-morrow?'

" 'Certainly,' I answered." 'Then, good-bye, Mr. Jabez Wilson, and let mecongratulate youonce more on the important position which you have been fortunate enough to gain.' He bowed meout of the roomand I went homewith my assistant, hardly knowing what to say ordo, I was so pleased at my owngood fortune.

"Well, I thoughtover the matterall day, and byevening I was inlow spirits again; for I had quite persuaded myself that the whole affair mustbe some great hoax or fraud, though what its object might be I could not imagine. It seemed altogether past belief that anyone could make such awill, or that they would pay such a sum for doing anything so simple as copyingout the Encyclopaedia Britannica. Vincent Spaulding did what hecould to cheerme up, but by bedtime I had reasoned myself outof the whole thing. However, inthe morning I determined to havea look at it anyhow, so I bought a penny bottleof ink, and with a quill-pen, and seven sheetsof foolscap paper, I started offfor Pope's Court.

"Well, to mysurprise and delight, everything was as right as possible. Thetable was set out ready for me,and Mr. Duncan Ross was there tosee that I gotfairly to work.He started me off upon the letter A, and then heleft me; but hewould drop in from time to timeto see that allwas right withme. At two o'clock he bade me good-day, complimented me upon theamount that I had written, andlocked the doorof the office after me.

"This went on day afterday, Mr. Holmes, and on Saturday the manager came in and planked down four golden sovereigns for my week's work. It was the same next week, andthe same the week after. Everymorning I was there at ten, andevery afternoonI left at two. By degrees Mr. Duncan Ross took to coming in onlyonce of a morning, and then, after a time, he did not come in at all. Still, ofcourse, I neverdared to leavethe room for aninstant, for I was not sure whenhe might come,and the billet was such a good one, and suited me so well, thatI would not riskthe loss of it."Eight weeks passed away likethis, and I hadwritten about Abbots and Archeryand Armour andArchitecture andAttica, and hoped with diligence that I might get on to the B'sbefore very long. It cost me something in foolscap, and I had pretty nearly filled a shelf withmy writings. And then suddenlythe whole business came to an end."

"To an end?"

"Yes, sir. And no later thanthis morning. Iwent to my workas usual at teno'clock, but thedoor was shut and locked, witha little squareof cardboard hammered on to themiddle of the panel with a tack.Here it is, andyou can read for yourself."

Heheld up a pieceof white cardboard about the size of a sheet ofnote-paper. Itread in this fashion:


THE RED-HEADED LEAGUE

IS

DISSOLVED.

October 9, 1890.Sherlock Holmes and I surveyedthis curt announcement and therueful face behind it, until thecomical side ofthe affair so completely overtopped every otherconsideration that we both burst out into a roar of laughter."I cannot see that there is anything very funny," cried our client, flushing upto the roots ofhis flaming head. "If you can donothing betterthan laugh at me, I can go elsewhere."

"No, no," cried Holmes,shoving him backinto the chairfrom which he had half risen. "Ireally wouldn'tmiss your casefor the world. It is most refreshingly unusual.But there is, ifyou will excusemy saying so, something just alittle funny about it. Pray whatsteps did you take when you found the card uponthe door?"

"Iwas staggered, sir. I did not know what to do. Then I called atthe offices round, but none of them seemed to know anything about it. Finally, Iwent to the landlord, who is anaccountant living on the groundfloor, and I asked him if he could tell me whathad become of the Red-headed League. He said that he had neverheard of any such body. Then I asked him who Mr.Duncan Ross was. He answered that the name wasnew to him.

" 'Well,' said I, 'the gentleman atNo. 4.'

" 'What, the red-headed man?'

" 'Yes.'

" 'Oh,' saidhe, 'his name was William Morris. He was a solicitor and was using my room as atemporary convenience until hisnew premises were ready. He moved out yesterday.'

" 'Where could I find him?'" 'Oh, at his new offices. He did tell me the address. Yes, 17 King Edward Street, near St. Paul's.'

"I startedoff, Mr. Holmes, but when I gotto that addressit was a manufactory of artificial knee-caps, and no one in ithad ever heard of either Mr. William Morris or Mr. Duncan Ross.""And what didyou do then?" asked Holmes.

"Iwent home to Saxe-Coburg Square,and I took theadvice of my assistant. But he could not help mein any way. Hecould only say that if I waitedI should hear bypost. But thatwas not quite good enough, Mr. Holmes. I did notwish to lose such a place without a struggle, so, as I had heard that you weregood enough to give advice to poor folk who werein need of it,I came right away to you."

"Andyou did very wisely," said Holmes. "Your case is an exceedinglyremarkable one,and I shall behappy to look into it. From whatyou have told me I think that it is possible that graver issueshang from it than might at first sight appear.""Grave enough!" said Mr. JabezWilson. "Why, Ihave lost fourpound a week.""As far as you are personally concerned," remarked Holmes, "I donot see that you have any grievance against this extraordinaryleague. On the contrary, you are, as I understand, richer by some $30, to say nothing of the minute knowledge which you have gained on every subject which comesunder the letter A. You have lost nothing by them."

"No, sir.But I want to find out about them, and who theyare, and what their object was in playing this prank--if it wasa prank--upon me. It was a pretty expensive jokefor them, for it cost them twoand thirty pounds."

"We shall endeavour to clear up these points for you. And,first, one or two questions, Mr.Wilson. This assistant of yourswho first called your attentionto the advertisement--how longhad he been withyou?"

"About amonth then."

"How did he come?"

"In answer toan advertisement."

"Was he theonly applicant?"

"No, I had adozen."

"Why did you pick him?""Because he was handy and would come cheap.""At half wages,in fact."

"Yes."

"What is he like, this Vincent Spaulding?"

"Small, stout-built, very quick in his ways, no hair on his face,though he's notshort of thirty. Has a white splash of acid upon his forehead."Holmes sat upin his chair inconsiderable excitement. "I thought as much," said he. "Have youever observed that his ears arepierced for earrings?"

"Yes, sir. He told me that a gipsy haddone it for himwhen he was a lad."

"Hum!" saidHolmes, sinkingback in deep thought. "He is still with you?""Oh, yes, sir; Ihave only justleft him."

"Andhas your business been attendedto in your absence?"

"Nothingto complain of,sir. There's never very much todo of a morning."

"That will do, Mr. Wilson. Ishall be happy to give you an opinion upon the subject in the course of a day ortwo. To-day isSaturday, and Ihope that by Monday we may cometo a conclusion."

"Well, Watson," said Holmes when our visitorhad left us, "what do you make of it all?"

"I make nothing of it," I answered frankly. "It is amost mysteriousbusiness."

"Asa rule," said Holmes, "the morebizarre a thingis the less mysterious it proves to be. It is your commonplace,featureless crimes which are really puzzling, just as a commonplace face is themost difficultto identify. ButI must be prompt over this matter."

"What areyou going to do,then?" I asked."To smoke," heanswered. "It is quite a threepipe problem, and I beg that youwon't speak tome for fifty minutes." He curledhimself up in his chair, with his thin knees drawn up to his hawk-like nose, and there he sat with his eyes closed and his black clay pipe thrusting out like the bill of somestrange bird. Ihad come to theconclusion thathe had dropped asleep, and indeed was nodding myself, when he suddenly sprang out of his chair with the gestureof a man who hasmade up his mind and put his pipe down upon themantelpiece.

"Sarasate plays at the St. James's Hall this afternoon," he remarked. "What do you think, Watson?Could your patients spare you for a few hours?""I have nothing to do to-day.My practice is never very absorbing."

"Then puton your hat andcome. I am going through the City first, and wecan have some lunch on the way.I observe thatthere is a gooddeal of German music on the programme, which israther more to my taste than Italian or French.It is introspective, and I wantto introspect. Come along!"

Wetravelled by theUnderground asfar as Aldersgate; and a short walk took us to Saxe-Coburg Square, the scene ofthe singular story which we hadlistened to in the morning. It was a poky, little, shabby-genteel place, where four lines of dingy two-storied brick houses looked out into a small railed-in enclosure, where alawn of weedy grass and a few clumps of faded laurel bushes made a hard fight against a smoke-laden and uncongenial atmosphere.Three gilt balls and a brown board with "JABEZWILSON" in whiteletters, upon acorner house, announced the place where our red-headed client carried on his business. SherlockHolmes stoppedin front of it with his head onone side and looked it all over,with his eyes shining brightlybetween puckeredlids. Then he walked slowly upthe street, andthen down againto the corner, still looking keenly at the houses. Finally he returned to the pawnbroker's, and,having thumpedvigorously uponthe pavement with his stick twoor three times,he went up to the door and knocked. It was instantly opened by abright-looking,clean-shaven young fellow, whoasked him to step in.

"Thank you," said Holmes,"I only wishedto ask you how you would go fromhere to the Strand."

"Third right, fourth left," answered theassistant promptly, closing thedoor.

"Smart fellow, that," observed Holmes aswe walked away."He is, in my judgment, the fourth smartest manin London, and for daring I am not sure that hehas not a claimto be third. I have known something of him before."

"Evidently," said I, "Mr. Wilson's assistant counts for a good deal in thismystery of theRed-headed League. I am sure that you inquired your way merely in order that youmight see him.""Not him."

"What then?"

"Theknees of his trousers."

"And what did you see?"

"What I expected to see."

"Why did you beatthe pavement?""My dear doctor,this is a timefor observation,not for talk. We are spies in an enemy's country. We know something of Saxe-Coburg Square. Letus now explore the parts which lie behind it."The road in which we found ourselves as we turned round the corner from the retired Saxe-CoburgSquare presentedas great a contrast to it as the front of a picture does to theback. It was one of the main arteries which conveyed the traffic of the City tothe north and west. The roadwaywas blocked with the immense stream of commerceflowing in a double tide inwardand outward, while the footpaths were black with the hurrying swarm of pedestrians. It was difficult to realiseas we looked atthe line of fine shops and stately business premises that theyreally abutted on the other sideupon the fadedand stagnant square which we hadjust quitted."Let me see," said Holmes, standing at the corner and glancing along the line, "I should like just to remember the order of thehouses here. Itis a hobby of mine to have an exact knowledge ofLondon. There is Mortimer's, the tobacconist, the little newspaper shop, the Coburg branch of the City and Suburban Bank, the Vegetarian Restaurant, and McFarlane's carriage-building depot. That carries us right on to the other block. Andnow, Doctor, we've done our work, so it's time we had some play.A sandwich anda cup of coffee,and then off toviolin-land, where all is sweetness and delicacy and harmony, and there are nored-headed clients to vex us with their conundrums."

My friendwas an enthusiastic musician, being himself notonly a very capable performer but a composer ofno ordinary merit. All the afternoon he sat in the stalls wrapped in the most perfect happiness,gently waving his long, thin fingers in time tothe music, while his gently smiling face and his languid, dreamy eyes were as unlike those of Holmes the sleuth-hound, Holmes the relentless, keen-witted, ready-handed criminal agent, as it was possible to conceive. In hissingular character the dual nature alternately asserted itself,and his extremeexactness and astuteness represented, as I haveoften thought, the reaction against the poetic and contemplativemood which occasionally predominated in him. The swing of his nature took him from extreme languor to devouringenergy; and, asI knew well, hewas never so truly formidable as when, for dayson end, he hadbeen lounging inhis armchair amid his improvisations and his black-letter editions. Then it wasthat the lust of the chase would suddenly comeupon him, and that his brilliantreasoning powerwould rise to the level of intuition, until those who were unacquainted with his methods wouldlook askance athim as on a manwhose knowledgewas not that ofother mortals. When I saw him that afternoon soenwrapped in themusic at St. James's Hall I felt that an evil time might be coming upon those whom he had set himself to hunt down.

"You wantto go home, no doubt, Doctor," he remarked as weemerged.

"Yes,it would be aswell."

"And I have some business to do which will take some hours. This business at Coburg Square is serious.""Why serious?""A considerablecrime is in contemplation. I have every reasonto believe thatwe shall be in time to stop it.But to-day beingSaturday rathercomplicates matters. I shall want your help to-night."

"At what time?"

"Ten will be early enough."

"I shallbe at Baker Street at ten."

"Very well. And, Isay, Doctor, there may be some little danger, sokindly put yourarmy revolver in your pocket."He waved his hand, turned on hisheel, and disappeared in an instant among the crowd.

I trust that I am not more dense than myneighbours, butI was always oppressed with a sense of my own stupidity in my dealings with Sherlock Holmes. Here I had heard what he had heard,I had seen whathe had seen, and yet from his words it was evident that he sawclearly not onlywhat had happened but what wasabout to happen,while to me thewhole businesswas still confused and grotesque. As I drove home to my house inKensington I thought over it all, from the extraordinary storyof the red-headed copier of theEncyclopaedia down to the visitto Saxe-Coburg Square, and the ominous words with which he had parted from me. What was this nocturnal expedition, and why should I go armed? Where were we going, and what werewe to do? I hadthe hint from Holmes that thissmooth-faced pawnbroker's assistant was a formidable man--a manwho might play adeep game. I tried to puzzle itout, but gave it up in despairand set the matter aside until night should bring an explanation.

It was a quarter-past nine when I started from home and mademy way across the Park, and so through Oxford Street to Baker Street. Two hansoms were standingat the door, andas I entered the passage I heard the sound of voices from above. On entering his room, I foundHolmes in animated conversationwith two men, one of whom I recognised as PeterJones, the official police agent, while the other was a long, thin, sad-faced man, with a very shiny hat and oppressively respectable frock-coat.

"Ha! Our party is complete,"said Holmes, buttoning up his pea-jacket and taking his heavy hunting crop fromthe rack. "Watson, I think you know Mr. Jones, of Scotland Yard?Let me introduce you to Mr. Merryweather, who is to be our companion in to-night's adventure.""We're huntingin couples again, Doctor, you see," said Jones in his consequential way. "Our friend here is a wonderful man forstarting a chase. All he wantsis an old dog tohelp him to dothe running down."

"I hope a wild goose may notprove to be theend of our chase," observed Mr.Merryweather gloomily.

"You may place considerable confidencein Mr. Holmes, sir," said the police agent loftily. "He has hisown little methods, which are, if he won't mindmy saying so, just a little tootheoretical andfantastic, but he has the makings of a detectivein him. It is not too much to say that once ortwice, as in that business of the Sholto murderand the Agra treasure, he has been more nearly correct than theofficial force.""Oh, if you say so, Mr. Jones,it is all right," said the stranger with deference. "Still, I confess that I miss my rubber. Itis the first Saturday night forseven-and-twenty years that I have not had my rubber."

"I think you will find," said SherlockHolmes, "that you will play fora higher stake to-night than youhave ever doneyet, and that the play will be more exciting. For you, Mr. Merryweather, the stake will be some$30,000; and foryou, Jones, itwill be the manupon whom you wish to lay your hands."

"John Clay, the murderer, thief, smasher, and forger. He's a young man,Mr. Merryweather, but he is at the head of his profession, and Iwould rather have my braceletson him than on any criminal in London. He's a remarkable man, isyoung John Clay. His grandfather was a royal duke, and he himself has been to Eton and Oxford.His brain is ascunning as his fingers, and though we meet signsof him at everyturn, we neverknow where to find the man himself. He'll cracka crib in Scotland one week, andbe raising money to build an orphanage in Cornwall the next. I've been on his track for years and have never set eyes on him yet."

"I hope that I may have thepleasure of introducing you to-night. I've hadone or two little turns also with Mr. John Clay,and I agree with you that he isat the head ofhis profession.It is past ten,however, and quite time that westarted. If youtwo will take the first hansom,Watson and I will follow in thesecond."

Sherlock Holmes was not very communicative during thelong drive and lay back in the cab humming the tunes which he had heard in the afternoon. We rattled through anendless labyrinth of gas-lit streets until we emerged into Farrington Street.

"We are close there now," my friend remarked. "This fellow Merryweather is a bankdirector, and personally interested in the matter. I thought itas well to haveJones with us also. He is not abad fellow, though an absoluteimbecile in hisprofession. He has one positivevirtue. He is asbrave as a bulldog and as tenacious as a lobster if he gets hisclaws upon anyone. Here we are,and they are waiting for us."We had reached the same crowdedthoroughfare inwhich we had found ourselves inthe morning. Ourcabs were dismissed, and, following the guidance of Mr. Merryweather, we passeddown a narrow passage and through a side door,which he openedfor us. Within there was a smallcorridor, whichended in a verymassive iron gate. This also was opened, and led down a flightof winding stonesteps, which terminated at another formidable gate. Mr. Merryweather stopped tolight a lantern, and then conducted us down a dark, earth-smelling passage, andso, after opening a third door,into a huge vault or cellar, which was piled all round with crates and massiveboxes.

"You arenot very vulnerable from above," Holmes remarked as he held upthe lantern andgazed about him."Nor from below," said Mr. Merryweather, striking his stick upon the flags which lined the floor. "Why, dear me, it sounds quite hollow!" he remarked, lookingup in surprise."I must reallyask you to be alittle more quiet!" said Holmesseverely. "Youhave already imperilled the whole success of ourexpedition. Might I beg that you would have thegoodness to sitdown upon one of those boxes, and not to interfere?"

The solemn Mr. Merryweather perched himself upon a crate,with a very injured expressionupon his face, while Holmes fellupon his kneesupon the floor and, with the lantern and a magnifying lens, began to examine minutely the cracksbetween the stones. A few seconds sufficed to satisfy him, forhe sprang to hisfeet again andput his glass inhis pocket.

"We have at leastan hour before us," he remarked,"for they can hardly take any steps until the good pawnbroker is safely in bed.Then they willnot lose a minute, for the sooner they do theirwork the longertime they will have for their escape. We are atpresent, Doctor--as no doubt youhave divined--in the cellar ofthe City branchof one of the principal London banks. Mr. Merryweather is the chairman of directors, and he willexplain to youthat there are reasons why the more daring criminals of London should take a considerable interest in this cellar at present.""It is our French gold," whispered the director."We have had several warnings that an attempt might be made upon it."

"Your French gold?"

"Yes. We had occasion some months ago to strengthenour resources and borrowed forthat purpose 30,000 napoleons from the Bank of France. It has become known thatwe have never had occasion to unpack the money,and that it is still lying in our cellar. The crate upon which Isit contains 2,000 napoleons packed between layers of lead foil. Our reserve ofbullion is muchlarger at present than is usually kept in a single branch office, and the directors have had misgivings upon the subject."

"Which were very well justified," observed Holmes."And now it is time that we arranged our littleplans. I expectthat within an hour matters willcome to a head.In the meantimeMr. Merryweather, we must put the screen over that dark lantern."

"And sit inthe dark?"

"I am afraid so. I had brought a pack of cards in mypocket, and I thought that, aswe were a partiecarree, you might have your rubber after all. But I see that the enemy's preparations have goneso far that wecannot risk thepresence of a light. And, firstof all, we mustchoose our positions. These aredaring men, andthough we shalltake them at a disadvantage, they may do us someharm unless weare careful. I shall stand behind this crate, and do you concealyourselves behind those. Then,when I flash a light upon them,close in swiftly. If they fire,Watson, have nocompunction about shooting themdown."

I placedmy revolver, cocked, upon the top of the woodencase behind which I crouched. Holmes shot the slide across thefront of his lantern and left usin pitch darkness--such an absolute darkness asI have never before experienced. The smell of hot metal remained to assure us that the light was still there, ready to flash out at a moment'snotice. To me, with my nerves worked up to a pitch of expectancy, there was something depressingand subduing inthe sudden gloom, and in the cold dank air of the vault.

"Theyhave but one retreat," whispered Holmes. "Thatis back throughthe house into Saxe-Coburg Square. I hope that you have done what I asked you, Jones?"

"I havean inspector andtwo officers waiting at the front door."

"Thenwe have stoppedall the holes.And now we mustbe silent and wait."

What a time it seemed! From comparing notes afterwards itwas but an hourand a quarter, yet it appeared to me that the night must have almost gone, and the dawn be breaking above us. Mylimbs were weary and stiff, forI feared to change my position;yet my nerves were worked up tothe highest pitch of tension, and my hearing was so acute thatI could not onlyhear the gentlebreathing of mycompanions, butI could distinguish the deeper,heavier in-breath of the bulkyJones from the thin, sighing note of the bank director. From myposition I couldlook over the case in the direction of the floor. Suddenly my eyes caught the glint of a light.At first it was but a lurid spark upon the stone pavement. Then it lengthenedout until it became a yellow line, and then, without any warningor sound, a gash seemed to openand a hand appeared, a white, almost womanly hand, which felt about in the centre of the littlearea of light.For a minute ormore the hand, with its writhingfingers, protruded out of the floor. Then it was withdrawn as suddenly as it appeared, and allwas dark again save the single lurid spark whichmarked a chinkbetween the stones.

Its disappearance, however,was but momentary. With a rending, tearing sound, one of the broad, white stones turned over upon its side andleft a square, gaping hole, through which streamed the light ofa lantern. Overthe edge there peeped a clean-cut, boyish face,which looked keenly about it, and then, with a hand on either side of the aperture, drew itselfshoulder-high and waist-high, until one knee rested upon the edge. In another instant he stood at the side of the hole and was hauling after hima companion, lithe and small like himself, witha pale face anda shock of veryred hair.

"It's all clear," hewhispered. "Have you the chiseland the bags? Great Scott! Jump, Archie, jump,and I'll swing for it!"

Sherlock Holmes had sprung out and seized the intruderby the collar. The other dived down the hole, and I heard the sound of rending cloth as Jones clutched at his skirts. The lightflashed upon thebarrel of a revolver, but Holmes' hunting cropcame down on theman's wrist, and the pistol clinked upon the stone floor.

"It's no use, John Clay," said Holmes blandly. "Youhave no chance at all."

"So I see," the other answered with theutmost coolness. "I fancy thatmy pal is all right, though I see you have got his coat-tails.""There are three men waiting for him at the door," said Holmes."Oh, indeed! You seem to havedone the thing very completely.I must compliment you."

"And Iyou," Holmes answered. "Your red-headed idea wasvery new and effective."

"You'll see your palagain presently," said Jones. "He's quicker at climbing down holes than I am. Just hold out while I fix the derbies."

"I beg that you will nottouch me with your filthy hands," remarked our prisoner as the handcuffs clattered upon his wrists. "You may notbe aware that Ihave royal blood in my veins. Have the goodness, also, when youaddress me always to say 'sir'and 'please.' ""All right," said Jones with astare and a snigger. "Well, would you please, sir, march upstairs, where we canget a cab to carry your Highnessto the police-station?"

"Thatis better," saidJohn Clay serenely. He made a sweeping bow to the three of us and walked quietly off in the custody of the detective.

"Really,Mr. Holmes," said Mr. Merryweather as we followed them from thecellar, "I do not know how thebank can thank you or repay you.There is no doubt that you havedetected and defeated in the most complete manner one of the most determined attempts at bank robbery that haveever come within my experience."

"I have had one or two littlescores of my own to settle withMr. John Clay,"said Holmes. "Ihave been at some small expenseover this matter, which I shallexpect the bankto refund, butbeyond that I amamply repaid byhaving had an experience whichis in many waysunique, and by hearing the veryremarkable narrative of the Red-headed League.""You see, Watson," he explainedin the early hours of the morning as we sat over a glass of whisky and soda inBaker Street, "it was perfectlyobvious from thefirst that theonly possible object of this rather fantastic business of the advertisement of the League, and the copying of the Encyclopaedia,must be to getthis not over-bright pawnbrokerout of the way for a number of hours every day.It was a curiousway of managingit, but, really, it would be difficult to suggest a better. Themethod was no doubt suggested to Clay's ingenious mind by the colour of his accomplice's hair.The $4 a week was a lure which must draw him, and what was it tothem, who wereplaying for thousands? They putin the advertisement, one roguehas the temporary office, the other rogue incites the man to apply for it, and together they manage to secure his absence everymorning in the week. From the time that I heardof the assistanthaving come forhalf wages, itwas obvious to me that he had some strong motivefor securing the situation."

"But how could you guess what themotive was?"

"Had there been women in the house, I should havesuspected a mere vulgar intrigue. That, however, was out of thequestion. The man's business was a small one, and there was nothing in his house which could account for such elaborate preparations, and suchan expenditure as they were at.It must, then, be something outof the house. What could it be?I thought of theassistant's fondness for photography, and his trick of vanishing into the cellar. The cellar! There was the endof this tangledclue. Then I made inquiries asto this mysterious assistant andfound that I had to deal with one of the coolest and most daring criminals in London. He was doing something inthe cellar--something which took many hours a day for months onend. What couldit be, once more? I could thinkof nothing savethat he was running a tunnel tosome other building.

"So far Ihad got when wewent to visit the scene of action. I surprisedyou by beating upon the pavementwith my stick.I was ascertaining whether the cellar stretchedout in front orbehind. It was not in front. Then I rang the bell, and, as I hoped, the assistant answered it. We have had someskirmishes, butwe had never seteyes upon eachother before. Ihardly looked athis face. His knees were what Iwished to see.You must yourself have remarkedhow worn, wrinkled, and stainedthey were. Theyspoke of those hours of burrowing. The only remaining point waswhat they were burrowing for. Iwalked round thecorner, saw theCity and Suburban Bank abuttedon our friend'spremises, and felt that I had solved my problem.When you drovehome after the concert I calledupon Scotland Yard and upon thechairman of thebank directors,with the resultthat you have seen."

"And how could you tell that they would make their attemptto-night?" I asked.

"Well, when they closed their League offices that was a sign that they cared no longer about Mr. Jabez Wilson's presence--in other words,that they had completed their tunnel. But it wasessential thatthey should useit soon, as it might be discovered, or the bullion might be removed. Saturday would suit them better than any other day, as it would give them two days for their escape. For all these reasonsI expected themto come to-night."

"You reasoned it out beautifully," I exclaimed in unfeignedadmiration. "Itis so long a chain, and yet every link rings true."

"It saved me from ennui," he answered, yawning. "Alas! I already feel it closing in upon me. My life is spent in one long effort to escapefrom the commonplaces of existence. These littleproblems help me to do so."

"And you are a benefactor of the race," said I.

He shrugged his shoulders. "Well,perhaps, afterall, it is of some little use,"he remarked. " 'L'homme c'est rien--l'oeuvre c'est tout,' as Gustave Flaubert wrote to George Sand."

ADVENTUREIII.  A CASE OFIDENTITY


"Mydear fellow," said Sherlock Holmes as we sat oneither side of the fire in his lodgings at BakerStreet, "life is infinitely stranger than anything which the mind of man couldinvent. We wouldnot dare to conceive the thingswhich are really mere commonplaces of existence. If we could fly out of that window hand in hand, hover over this great city, gently remove theroofs, and peepin at the queerthings which are going on, thestrange coincidences, the plannings, the cross-purposes, the wonderful chains ofevents, workingthrough generations, and leading to the most outre results, itwould make all fiction with itsconventionalities and foreseen conclusions moststale and unprofitable."

"And yet I am not convinced of it," Ianswered. "The cases which cometo light in thepapers are, as arule, bald enough, and vulgar enough. We have in our police reports realism pushed to its extreme limits, and yet the result is, it must be confessed, neitherfascinating norartistic."

"A certain selectionand discretionmust be used inproducing a realistic effect," remarked Holmes."This is wantingin the police report, where more stress is laid, perhaps, uponthe platitudes of the magistratethan upon the details, which toan observer contain the vital essence of the whole matter. Depend upon it, there is nothing sounnatural as thecommonplace."I smiled and shook my head. "I can quite understand your thinking so." I said. "Of course, in your position of unofficial adviser and helper toeverybody who isabsolutely puzzled, throughoutthree continents, you are brought in contact with all that is strange and bizarre. But here"--Ipicked up the morning paper fromthe ground--"let us put it to apractical test.Here is the first heading uponwhich I come. 'Ahusband's cruelty to his wife.'There is half acolumn of print, but I know without reading itthat it is all perfectly familiar to me. There is, of course, the other woman, the drink, the push, the blow, the bruise, the sympathetic sisteror landlady. The crudest of writers could invent nothing more crude."

"Indeed,your example isan unfortunateone for your argument," said Holmes, taking thepaper and glancing his eye downit. "This is theDundas separation case, and, asit happens, I was engaged in clearing up some small points in connection with it. The husband was a teetotaler,there was no other woman, and the conduct complained of was that he had driftedinto the habitof winding up every meal by taking out his falseteeth and hurling them at his wife, which, youwill allow, is not an action likely to occur tothe imaginationof the average story-teller. Take a pinch of snuff, Doctor, andacknowledge thatI have scored over you in yourexample."

He held out his snuffbox of old gold,with a great amethyst in the centre of the lid.Its splendour was in such contrast to his homely ways and simple life that I could not help commenting upon it."Ah," said he,"I forgot thatI had not seen you for some weeks. It is a little souvenir fromthe King of Bohemia in return for my assistancein the case of the Irene Adler papers."

"And the ring?" I asked, glancing at aremarkable brilliant which sparkled upon his finger.

"It was from the reigningfamily of Holland, though the matter in which Iserved them wasof such delicacythat I cannot confide it even to you, who havebeen good enoughto chronicle one or two of my little problems.""And have youany on hand justnow?" I asked with interest.

"Some ten or twelve, but none which present any feature of interest. They are important, you understand, withoutbeing interesting. Indeed, I have found that itis usually in unimportant matters that there isa field for theobservation, andfor the quick analysis of causeand effect which gives the charm to an investigation. The larger crimes are aptto be the simpler, for the bigger the crime themore obvious, as a rule, is themotive. In these cases, save for one rather intricate matter which has been referred to me fromMarseilles, there is nothing which presents anyfeatures of interest. It is possible, however,that I may havesomething betterbefore very many minutes are over, for this isone of my clients, or I am muchmistaken."

He had risen from his chair and wasstanding betweenthe parted blinds gazing down into the dull neutral-tinted London street. Looking over his shoulder, I saw thaton the pavementopposite therestood a large woman with a heavyfur boa round her neck, and a large curling redfeather in a broad-brimmed hatwhich was tiltedin a coquettishDuchess of Devonshire fashion over her ear. From under this great panoply she peeped up in a nervous, hesitating fashion at ourwindows, whileher body oscillated backward andforward, and her fingers fidgeted with her glove buttons. Suddenly, with a plunge, as of the swimmer who leavesthe bank, she hurried across the road, and we heard the sharp clang of the bell.

"I have seenthose symptoms before," said Holmes, throwing his cigarette intothe fire. "Oscillation upon thepavement alwaysmeans an affaire de coeur. Shewould like advice, but is not sure that the matter is not too delicate for communication. And yet even here we may discriminate.When a woman has been seriouslywronged by a man she no longeroscillates, andthe usual symptom is a broken bell wire. Here wemay take it that there is a love matter, but that the maiden isnot so much angry as perplexed,or grieved. Buthere she comesin person to resolve our doubts."

As he spoke there was a tap at the door, andthe boy in buttons entered to announce Miss MarySutherland, while the lady herself loomed behind his small black figure like afull-sailed merchant-man behinda tiny pilot boat. Sherlock Holmes welcomed herwith the easy courtesy for whichhe was remarkable, and, havingclosed the doorand bowed her into an armchair,he looked her over in the minuteand yet abstracted fashion which was peculiar to him.

"Do younot find," he said, "that with your short sightit is a little trying to do so much typewriting?"

"I did at first," she answered, "but now I know where the letters are withoutlooking." Then,suddenly realising the full purport of his words, she gave a violent start andlooked up, withfear and astonishment upon her broad, good-humoured face. "You've heard about me, Mr. Holmes," she cried, "elsehow could you know all that?"

"Never mind," said Holmes, laughing; "it is my business to know things. Perhaps Ihave trained myself to see whatothers overlook. If not, why should you come toconsult me?"

"I came to you, sir, because I heard of you fromMrs. Etherege, whose husband youfound so easy when the police and everyone hadgiven him up fordead. Oh, Mr. Holmes, I wish you would do as much for me. I'm not rich, but still I have a hundred a year in myown right, besides the little that I make by the machine, and Iwould give it all to know whathas become of Mr. Hosmer Angel.""Why did you come away to consult me in such ahurry?" asked Sherlock Holmes,with his finger-tips together and his eyes to the ceiling.

Again a startled look came over thesomewhat vacuousface of Miss Mary Sutherland. "Yes, I did bangout of the house," she said, "for it made me angry to see the easy way in whichMr. Windibank--that is, my father--took it all.He would not goto the police, and he would notgo to you, and so at last, as hewould do nothing and kept on saying that therewas no harm done, it made me mad, and I just onwith my things and came right away to you."

"Your father," saidHolmes, "your stepfather, surely, since the name is different.""Yes, my stepfather. I call him father, thoughit sounds funny, too, for he isonly five yearsand two monthsolder than myself."

"And your mother is alive?""Oh, yes, mother is alive andwell. I wasn't best pleased, Mr.Holmes, when she married againso soon after father's death, and a man who wasnearly fifteen years younger than herself. Father was a plumberin the TottenhamCourt Road, andhe left a tidybusiness behindhim, which mother carried on with Mr. Hardy, theforeman; but when Mr. Windibankcame he made her sell the business, for he wasvery superior, being a travellerin wines. Theygot $4700 for the goodwill and interest, which wasn't near as much as father could have got if he had been alive."

I had expected to see Sherlock Holmes impatient under this rambling and inconsequential narrative, but, on the contrary, hehad listened with the greatest concentration ofattention.

"Your own little income," he asked,"does it come out of the business?"

"Oh, no, sir. It is quite separate and wasleft me by my uncle Ned in Auckland. It is in New Zealand stock,paying 4 1/4 per cent. Two thousand five hundred pounds was theamount, but I can only touch the interest."

"You interest me extremely," saidHolmes. "And since you draw so large a sum as ahundred a year,with what you earn into the bargain, you no doubt travel a little and indulge yourself in everyway. I believe that a single lady can get on very nicely upon anincome of about$60."

"I coulddo with much less than that, Mr. Holmes, but you understand that as long as I live at home I don't wish to be aburden to them,and so they have the use of themoney just while I am staying with them. Of course, that is only just for the time. Mr. Windibank draws my interest every quarter and pays it over to mother, and I find that Ican do pretty well with what Iearn at typewriting. It brings me twopence a sheet, and I can often do from fifteen to twenty sheets in a day.""You have madeyour position very clear to me,"said Holmes. "This is my friend, Dr. Watson, before whom you can speak as freely as before myself. Kindly tellus now all aboutyour connectionwith Mr. HosmerAngel."

A flush stole over Miss Sutherland's face, and she picked nervously atthe fringe of her jacket. "I met him first at the gasfitters' ball," she said."They used to send father tickets when he was alive, and then afterwards they remembered us, andsent them to mother. Mr. Windibank did not wishus to go. He never did wish usto go anywhere.He would get quite mad if I wanted so much as tojoin a Sunday-school treat. Butthis time I wasset on going, and I would go; for what right had he to prevent?He said the folk were not fit for us to know, when all father'sfriends were tobe there. And he said that I had nothing fit towear, when I had my purple plush that I had never so much as taken out of the drawer. At last,when nothing else would do, he went off to France upon the business of the firm,but we went, mother and I, withMr. Hardy, whoused to be our foreman, and it was there I met Mr. Hosmer Angel."

"I suppose,"said Holmes, "that when Mr. Windibank came backfrom France he was very annoyedat your having gone to the ball."

"Oh, well, hewas very good about it. He laughed, I remember,and shrugged his shoulders, andsaid there wasno use denying anything to a woman, for she would have her way.""I see. Then at the gasfitters' ball you met,as I understand,a gentleman called Mr. Hosmer Angel."

"Yes, sir. I met him that night, and hecalled next dayto ask if we hadgot home all safe, and after that we met him--that is to say, Mr. Holmes, I methim twice for walks, but afterthat father cameback again, andMr. Hosmer Angel could not cometo the house any more."

"No?""Well, you knowfather didn't like anything ofthe sort. He wouldn't have any visitors if he could help it, andhe used to saythat a woman should be happy inher own family circle. But then,as I used to say to mother, a woman wants her own circle to begin with, and I had not got mineyet."

"But howabout Mr. HosmerAngel? Did he make no attempt to see you?"

"Well, father was going off to France again in a week, and Hosmer wrote and said that it would be safer and betternot to see eachother until he had gone. We could write in the meantime, and heused to write every day. I tookthe letters in in the morning, so there was no need for father to know."

"Wereyou engaged to the gentleman atthis time?"

"Oh, yes, Mr. Holmes. We were engaged after the first walk that wetook. Hosmer--Mr. Angel--was a cashier in an office in Leadenhall Street--and--""What office?""That's the worst of it, Mr. Holmes, I don't know."

"Where did he live, then?"

"He slept onthe premises.""And you don't know his address?"

"No--except that it was Leadenhall Street.""Where did you address your letters, then?"

"Tothe LeadenhallStreet Post Office, to be left till called for.He said that ifthey were sent to the office hewould be chaffedby all the other clerks about having letters from a lady, so Ioffered to typewrite them, likehe did his, buthe wouldn't havethat, for he said that when I wrote them they seemed to come from me, but whenthey were typewritten he alwaysfelt that the machine had come between us. Thatwill just show you how fond he was of me, Mr. Holmes, and the little things thathe would thinkof."

"It was most suggestive,"said Holmes. "Ithas long been an axiom of minethat the littlethings are infinitely the most important. Can you remember any other little things about Mr. Hosmer Angel?"

"Hewas a very shyman, Mr. Holmes.He would ratherwalk with me inthe evening than in the daylight, for he said that he hated tobe conspicuous.Very retiring and gentlemanly hewas. Even his voice was gentle.He'd had the quinsy and swollenglands when hewas young, he told me, and it had left him witha weak throat, and a hesitating,whispering fashion of speech. He was always well dressed, veryneat and plain,but his eyes were weak, just asmine are, and hewore tinted glasses against theglare."

"Well,and what happened when Mr. Windibank, your stepfather, returnedto France?"

"Mr. Hosmer Angelcame to the house again and proposed that we should marry beforefather came back. He was in dreadful earnest and made me swear,with my hands on the Testament,that whatever happened I wouldalways be true to him. Mother said he was quiteright to make meswear, and thatit was a sign of his passion. Mother was all inhis favour fromthe first and was even fonder of him than I was. Then, when they talked of marrying within theweek, I began toask about father; but they bothsaid never to mind about father, but just to tell him afterwards, and mother said she would make it all right with him. I didn't quite like that, Mr. Holmes. It seemed funny that I should askhis leave, as he was only a fewyears older than me; but I didn't want to do anything on the sly, so I wrote tofather at Bordeaux, where the company has its French offices, but the letter came back to me onthe very morning of the wedding."

"It missed him, then?"

"Yes, sir; for he had started to England just beforeit arrived."

"Ha! that was unfortunate. Your wedding was arranged, then, for the Friday. Was it to be in church?"

"Yes, sir,but very quietly. It was to be at St. Saviour's,near King's Cross, and we wereto have breakfast afterwards atthe St. PancrasHotel. Hosmer came for us in a hansom, but as there were two ofus he put us both into it and stepped himself into a four-wheeler, which happened to be the onlyother cab in the street. We gotto the church first, and when the four-wheelerdrove up we waited for him to step out, but he never did, and when the cabman got down from thebox and looked there was no onethere! The cabman said that he could not imaginewhat had becomeof him, for hehad seen him getin with his owneyes. That waslast Friday, Mr.Holmes, and I have never seen or heard anythingsince then to throw any light upon what becameof him."

"It seems to me that you have been very shamefully treated," said Holmes.

"Oh, no, sir! He was too good and kind to leave me so. Why,all the morninghe was saying to me that, whatever happened, Iwas to be true;and that even ifsomething quiteunforeseen occurred to separateus, I was always to remember that I was pledgedto him, and that he would claimhis pledge sooner or later. Itseemed strange talk for a wedding-morning, but what has happenedsince gives a meaning to it.""Most certainlyit does. Your own opinion is, then, that some unforeseen catastrophe has occurred to him?"

"Yes, sir. I believethat he foresawsome danger, orelse he would not have talked so. And then I think that what heforesaw happened."

"But you have no notion asto what it couldhave been?"

"None."

"One morequestion. How did your mother take the matter?""She was angry, and said thatI was never to speak of the matter again."

"Andyour father? Did you tell him?""Yes; and he seemed to think,with me, that something had happened, and that Ishould hear ofHosmer again. Ashe said, what interest could anyone have in bringing me to thedoors of the church, and then leaving me? Now, if he had borrowed my money, or if he had marriedme and got my money settled onhim, there mightbe some reason,but Hosmer wasvery independentabout money andnever would look at a shillingof mine. And yet, what could have happened? Andwhy could he notwrite? Oh, it drives me half-mad to think of it, and I can't sleep a wink at night." She pulleda little handkerchief out of her muff and beganto sob heavilyinto it.

"I shall glance into the case for you," said Holmes, rising, "and I have no doubt thatwe shall reachsome definite result. Let the weight of the matter rest upon menow, and do notlet your mind dwell upon it further. Above all,try to let Mr. Hosmer Angel vanish from your memory, as he has done from your life."

"Then youdon't think I'llsee him again?""I fear not.""Then what hashappened to him?"

"You will leave that questionin my hands. Ishould like an accurate description of him and any letters of his which you canspare."

"I advertised for him in last Saturday's Chronicle," said she. "Here isthe slip and here are four letters from him.""Thank you. Andyour address?""No. 31 Lyon Place, Camberwell.""Mr. Angel's address you neverhad, I understand. Where is your father's placeof business?""He travels forWesthouse & Marbank, the great claret importersof Fenchurch Street."

"Thank you. You have madeyour statementvery clearly. You will leave thepapers here, and remember the advice which I have given you. Let the whole incident be a sealedbook, and do not allow it to affect your life.""You are verykind, Mr. Holmes, but I cannot do that. I shallbe true to Hosmer. He shall findme ready when he comes back."For all the preposterous hat andthe vacuous face, there was something noble inthe simple faithof our visitorwhich compelledour respect. Shelaid her littlebundle of papers upon the tableand went her way, with a promise to come againwhenever she might be summoned.Sherlock Holmessat silent fora few minutes with his fingertips still pressedtogether, his legs stretched outin front of him, and his gaze directed upward to the ceiling. Then he took downfrom the rack the old and oilyclay pipe, whichwas to him as acounsellor, and, having lit it,he leaned backin his chair, with the thick blue cloud-wreathsspinning up fromhim, and a lookof infinite languor in his face.

"Quite an interesting study,that maiden," heobserved. "I found her more interesting than her little problem, which, by theway, is rather atrite one. Youwill find parallel cases, if youconsult my index, in Andover in'77, and therewas something ofthe sort at TheHague last year. Old as is theidea, however, there were one ortwo details which were new to me. But the maiden herself was most instructive.""You appearedto read a good deal upon her which was quite invisible to me," Iremarked.

"Notinvisible but unnoticed, Watson. You did not know where to look, and so you missed all that wasimportant. I can never bring you to realise theimportance of sleeves, the suggestiveness of thumb-nails, or the great issues that may hang from a boot-lace. Now, what did yougather from that woman's appearance? Describe it."

"Well, shehad a slate-coloured, broad-brimmed straw hat, with a feather ofa brickish red.Her jacket wasblack, with black beads sewn upon it, and a fringe of little black jet ornaments. Her dress wasbrown, rather darker than coffeecolour, with alittle purple plush at the neckand sleeves. Hergloves were greyish and were worn through at the right forefinger. Her boots Ididn't observe.She had small round, hanging gold earrings, anda general air ofbeing fairly well-to-do in a vulgar, comfortable, easy-going way."

Sherlock Holmes clapped hishands softly together and chuckled.

" 'Pon myword, Watson, you are coming along wonderfully.You have reallydone very well indeed. It is true that you havemissed everything of importance,but you have hit upon the method, and you havea quick eye forcolour. Never trust to general impressions, my boy, but concentrate yourself upon details. My first glance is always at a woman's sleeve. In a man it is perhapsbetter first totake the knee of the trouser. As you observe, this woman had plush upon her sleeves, which is amost useful material for showing traces. The double line a little above the wrist, where the typewritist presses against the table, was beautifully defined. The sewing-machine, of the hand type, leaves a similar mark, but only on the leftarm, and on theside of it farthest from the thumb, instead of being right across the broadest part, as this was. I then glancedat her face, and, observing thedint of a pince-nez at either side of her nose,I ventured a remark upon shortsight and typewriting, which seemed to surpriseher."

"It surprised me."

"But,surely, it wasobvious. I was then much surprised and interested on glancing down to observe that, though the boots which she was wearing werenot unlike eachother, they werereally odd ones; the one havinga slightly decorated toe-cap, and the other a plain one. One was buttoned onlyin the two lowerbuttons out offive, and the other at the first, third, and fifth. Now, when you see that a young lady, otherwise neatly dressed, has come awayfrom home withodd boots, half-buttoned, it isno great deduction to say that she came away ina hurry."

"Andwhat else?" I asked, keenly interested, as I always was, by my friend's incisivereasoning.

"Inoted, in passing, that she hadwritten a note before leaving home but after being fully dressed. You observed that her right glove was torn atthe forefinger,but you did notapparently see that both glove and finger were stained with violet ink. She hadwritten in a hurry and dipped her pen too deep.It must have been this morning,or the mark would not remain clear upon the finger. All this isamusing, thoughrather elementary, but I must goback to business, Watson. Wouldyou mind reading me the advertised descriptionof Mr. Hosmer Angel?"

I held the little printedslip to the light.

"Missing,"it said, "on themorning of thefourteenth, a gentleman named Hosmer Angel. About five ft. sevenin. in height;strongly built,sallow complexion, black hair, alittle bald inthe centre, bushy, black side-whiskers and moustache; tinted glasses, slight infirmity of speech. Was dressed, when last seen, in black frock-coat faced with silk, black waistcoat, gold Albertchain, and greyHarris tweed trousers, with brown gaiters overelastic-sided boots. Known to have been employedin an office inLeadenhall Street. Anybody bringing--"

"That will do," said Holmes. "As to theletters," he continued, glancing over them, "they are very commonplace. Absolutely no clue in them to Mr. Angel, save that he quotes Balzac once. There is oneremarkable point, however, whichwill no doubt strike you."

"They are typewritten," I remarked."Not only that, but the signature is typewritten. Look at theneat little 'Hosmer Angel' at the bottom. Thereis a date, you see, but no superscription exceptLeadenhall Street, which is rather vague. The point about the signature is verysuggestive--infact, we may call it conclusive."

"Of what?"

"My dear fellow,is it possible you do not see how strongly it bears upon the case?"

"I cannot say that I do unless it were thathe wished to beable to deny his signature if an action for breach of promise were instituted.""No, that wasnot the point. However, I shallwrite two letters, which shouldsettle the matter. One is to a firm in the City,the other is tothe young lady's stepfather, Mr. Windibank, asking him whetherhe could meet ushere at six o'clock to-morrow evening. It is just as well thatwe should do business with the male relatives. And now, Doctor,we can do nothing until the answers to those letters come, so wemay put our little problem uponthe shelf for the interim."

Ihad had so manyreasons to believe in my friend's subtle powersof reasoning andextraordinary energy in actionthat I felt thathe must have some solid groundsfor the assuredand easy demeanour with which he treated the singular mystery which he had beencalled upon tofathom. Once only had I known him to fail, in the case of the King of Bohemia and of the Irene Adler photograph;but when I looked back to the weird business ofthe Sign of Four, and the extraordinary circumstances connectedwith the Studyin Scarlet, I felt that it wouldbe a strange tangle indeed which he could not unravel.

I lefthim then, stillpuffing at his black clay pipe,with the conviction that when Icame again on the next evening Iwould find thathe held in hishands all the clues which wouldlead up to the identity of the disappearing bridegroom of Miss Mary Sutherland.A professionalcase of great gravity was engaging my own attention at the time,and the whole of next day I wasbusy at the bedside of the sufferer. It was notuntil close upon six o'clock that I found myself free and was able to spring into a hansom anddrive to Baker Street, half afraid that I mightbe too late to assist at the denouement of the little mystery. Ifound SherlockHolmes alone, however, half asleep, with his long, thin form curled up in the recesses of his armchair. A formidable array of bottles and test-tubes, with the pungent cleanly smell of hydrochloric acid, toldme that he had spent his day inthe chemical work which was so dear to him.

"Well, have you solved it?" I askedas I entered."Yes. It was thebisulphate of baryta."

"No, no, the mystery!"I cried.

"Oh, that! I thought of the salt thatI have been working upon. Therewas never any mystery in the matter, though, asI said yesterday, some of the details are of interest. The onlydrawback is thatthere is no law, I fear, that can touch the scoundrel."

"Who was he, then, andwhat was his object in deserting Miss Sutherland?"

The question was hardly outof my mouth, and Holmes had notyet opened hislips to reply, when we heard a heavy footfall inthe passage anda tap at the door.

"This is the girl's stepfather, Mr. James Windibank," saidHolmes. "He haswritten to me tosay that he would be here at six. Come in!"

The man who entered was a sturdy,middle-sized fellow, some thirtyyears of age, clean-shaven, andsallow-skinned,with a bland, insinuating manner, and a pair ofwonderfully sharp and penetrating grey eyes. Heshot a questioning glance at each of us, placedhis shiny top-hat upon the sideboard, and witha slight bow sidled down into the nearest chair."Good-evening,Mr. James Windibank," said Holmes. "I think that this typewritten letter is from you, in whichyou made an appointment with mefor six o'clock?"

"Yes, sir. Iam afraid that Iam a little late, but I am notquite my own master, you know. Iam sorry that Miss Sutherland has troubled youabout this little matter, for Ithink it is farbetter not to wash linen of thesort in public.It was quite against my wishes that she came, but she is a veryexcitable, impulsive girl, as you may have noticed, and she is not easily controlled when she has made up her mind on a point. Of course, I didnot mind you somuch, as you arenot connected with the officialpolice, but itis not pleasantto have a familymisfortune likethis noised abroad. Besides, itis a useless expense, for how could you possibly find this Hosmer Angel?"

"Onthe contrary," said Holmes quietly; "I have every reason to believe that I willsucceed in discovering Mr. Hosmer Angel."

Mr. Windibank gave aviolent start and dropped his gloves. "I am delighted to hear it," he said.

"Itis a curious thing," remarked Holmes, "that a typewriter has really quite as much individualityas a man's handwriting. Unlessthey are quite new, no two of them write exactlyalike. Some letters get more worn than others,and some wear only on one side.Now, you remarkin this note ofyours, Mr. Windibank, that in every case there is some little slurring over of the 'e,' and a slight defect in the tail of the 'r.' There are fourteen other characteristics, but those are themore obvious.""We do all our correspondence with this machineat the office, and no doubt it is a little worn," our visitor answered, glancingkeenly at Holmes with his bright little eyes."And now I willshow you what isreally a very interesting study, Mr. Windibank," Holmes continued. "I think ofwriting anotherlittle monographsome of these days on the typewriter and its relation to crime.It is a subjectto which I havedevoted some little attention.I have here fourletters which purport to come from the missingman. They are all typewritten. In each case, notonly are the 'e's' slurred andthe 'r's' tailless, but you willobserve, if youcare to use mymagnifying lens,that the fourteen other characteristics to which I have alludedare there as well."

Mr. Windibank sprang out of his chair andpicked up his hat. "I cannot waste time over this sort of fantastic talk, Mr. Holmes," he said."If you can catch the man, catchhim, and let meknow when you have done it."

"Certainly," saidHolmes, stepping over and turning the key in the door. "I let you know, then, that I have caught him!"

"What!where?" shoutedMr. Windibank, turning white tohis lips and glancing about himlike a rat in atrap.

"Oh, it won't do--reallyit won't," saidHolmes suavely."There is no possible getting out of it, Mr. Windibank. It is quite too transparent, and it wasa very bad compliment when you said that it wasimpossible for me to solve so simple a question.That's right! Sit down and letus talk it over."

Our visitor collapsed into achair, with a ghastly face and aglitter of moisture on his brow. "It--it's notactionable," hestammered.

"I am very much afraid that it is not. But between ourselves, Windibank, it was as cruel and selfishand heartless atrick in a petty way as ever came before me. Now, let me just run over the course of events, and you will contradict me if I gowrong."

The man sat huddled upin his chair, with his head sunk upon his breast, like one whois utterly crushed. Holmes stuckhis feet up onthe corner of the mantelpiece and, leaning backwith his hands in his pockets, began talking, rather to himself,as it seemed, than to us.

"Theman married a woman very much older than himself for her money," said he, "andhe enjoyed the use of the moneyof the daughteras long as she lived with them.It was a considerable sum, for people in their position, and theloss of it would have made a serious difference. It was worth an effort to preserve it. The daughter was of a good, amiable disposition, but affectionate and warm-hearted in her ways, so thatit was evidentthat with her fair personal advantages, and herlittle income, she would not beallowed to remain single long. Now her marriagewould mean, of course, the lossof a hundred a year, so what does her stepfatherdo to prevent it? He takes theobvious course of keeping her athome and forbidding her to seekthe company ofpeople of her own age. But soonhe found that that would not answer forever. Shebecame restive,insisted upon her rights, and finally announcedher positive intention of goingto a certain ball. What does her clever stepfather do then? Heconceives an idea more creditable to his head than to his heart.With the connivance and assistance of his wifehe disguised himself, covered those keen eyes with tinted glasses, masked the face with a moustache and a pair of bushy whiskers, sunk that clear voice into aninsinuating whisper, and doublysecure on account of the girl'sshort sight, heappears as Mr. Hosmer Angel, andkeeps off otherlovers by making love himself.""It was only ajoke at first,"groaned our visitor. "We neverthought that shewould have beenso carried away."

"Very likelynot. However that may be, the young lady was very decidedly carried away, and,having quite made up her mind that her stepfather was in France,the suspicion of treachery never for an instantentered her mind. She was flattered by the gentleman's attentions, and the effect was increasedby the loudly expressed admiration of her mother. Then Mr. Angel began to call,for it was obvious that the matter should be pushed as far as it would go if areal effect wereto be produced.There were meetings, and an engagement, which would finally secure the girl's affections from turning towards anyone else. Butthe deception could not be keptup forever. These pretended journeys to France were rather cumbrous. The thing to do was clearlyto bring the business to an endin such a dramatic manner thatit would leave apermanent impression upon the young lady's mindand prevent herfrom looking upon any other suitor for some time to come. Hencethose vows of fidelity exactedupon a Testament, and hence alsothe allusions to a possibilityof something happening on the very morning of the wedding. JamesWindibank wished Miss Sutherland to be so boundto Hosmer Angel, and so uncertain as to his fate, that for tenyears to come, at any rate, shewould not listento another man.As far as the church door he brought her, and then, as he couldgo no farther,he convenientlyvanished away bythe old trick of stepping in atone door of a four-wheeler andout at the other. I think that was the chain ofevents, Mr. Windibank!"

Our visitor had recovered something ofhis assurance while Holmes had been talking, andhe rose from his chair now witha cold sneer upon his pale face.

"It may be so, or it may not,Mr. Holmes," said he, "but if you are so very sharp you ought to be sharp enough to know that it is you who arebreaking the law now, and not me. I have done nothing actionable from the first, but as long asyou keep that door locked you lay yourself opento an action for assault and illegal constraint."

"The law cannot, as you say,touch you," said Holmes, unlocking and throwingopen the door,"yet there neverwas a man who deserved punishment more. If theyoung lady has abrother or a friend, he ought to lay a whip across your shoulders. By Jove!" hecontinued, flushing up at the sight of the bitter sneer upon the man's face, "it is not part ofmy duties to myclient, but here's a hunting crop handy, and Ithink I shall just treat myselfto--" He took two swift steps tothe whip, but before he could grasp it there was a wild clatterof steps upon the stairs, the heavy hall door banged, and fromthe window we could see Mr. James Windibank running at the top of his speed downthe road.

"There's a cold-blooded scoundrel!"said Holmes, laughing, as he threw himself downinto his chair once more. "Thatfellow will risefrom crime to crime until he does something very bad, and endson a gallows. The case has, in some respects, been not entirelydevoid of interest."

"I cannotnow entirely seeall the steps of your reasoning," I remarked."Well, of courseit was obviousfrom the first that this Mr. Hosmer Angel must have some strongobject for his curious conduct,and it was equally clear that the only man who really profited by the incident,as far as we could see, was thestepfather. Thenthe fact that the two men werenever together,but that the onealways appearedwhen the otherwas away, was suggestive. So were the tinted spectacles and thecurious voice, which both hintedat a disguise,as did the bushywhiskers. My suspicions were all confirmed by his peculiar action in typewriting his signature,which, of course, inferred thathis handwritingwas so familiarto her that shewould recogniseeven the smallest sample of it.You see all these isolated facts, together withmany minor ones, all pointed inthe same direction."

"And howdid you verify them?"

"Having once spotted my man, it was easyto get corroboration. I knew thefirm for whichthis man worked.Having taken the printed description. I eliminated everything from it which could be the resultof a disguise--the whiskers, the glasses, the voice, and I sentit to the firm,with a requestthat they wouldinform me whether it answered tothe descriptionof any of theirtravellers. I had already noticed the peculiarities of the typewriter, and I wrote to the man himself at his business address asking him if hewould come here.As I expected,his reply was typewritten and revealed the sametrivial but characteristic defects. The same post brought me a letter from Westhouse & Marbank,of Fenchurch Street, to say thatthe descriptiontallied in every respect with that of their employe, James Windibank. Voila tout!"

"And Miss Sutherland?"

"IfI tell her shewill not believeme. You may remember the old Persian saying, 'There is danger for him who taketh the tiger cub,and danger alsofor whoso snatches a delusion from a woman.' There is as much sense in Hafiz asin Horace, andas much knowledge of the world."ADVENTURE IV.THE BOSCOMBE VALLEY MYSTERY


Wewere seated atbreakfast one morning, my wife and I, when the maid brought in atelegram. It was from SherlockHolmes and ran in this way:

"Have you a coupleof days to spare? Have just beenwired for fromthe west of England in connection with BoscombeValley tragedy.Shall be glad ifyou will come with me. Air andscenery perfect.Leave Paddington by the 11:15.""What do you say, dear?" saidmy wife, lookingacross at me. "Will you go?"

"I really don't know what to say.I have a fairlylong list at present."

"Oh, Anstruther would do your work foryou. You have been looking a little pale lately.I think that the change would do you good, andyou are always so interested inMr. Sherlock Holmes' cases."

"Ishould be ungrateful if I werenot, seeing whatI gained through one of them,"I answered. "Butif I am to go,I must pack at once, for I haveonly half an hour."

My experience of camp lifein Afghanistan had at least hadthe effect of making me a promptand ready traveller. My wants were few and simple, so that in less than the time stated I was in a cab with myvalise, rattlingaway to Paddington Station. Sherlock Holmes waspacing up and down the platform, his tall, gaunt figure made even gaunter and taller by his long grey travelling-cloak and close-fitting clothcap.

"It is really very good ofyou to come, Watson," said he."It makes a considerable difference to me, having someone with me on whom I canthoroughly rely.Local aid is always either worthless or else biassed. If you will keep the twocorner seats I shall get the tickets."

We had the carriage to ourselves save for an immense litter of papers which Holmes had brought with him.Among these herummaged and read, with intervals of note-takingand of meditation, until we were past Reading.Then he suddenlyrolled them allinto a giganticball and tossedthem up onto the rack.

"Have you heard anything of the case?"he asked.

"Nota word. I have not seen a paperfor some days.""The London press has not had very full accounts. I have just been looking through all the recent papers in order to master theparticulars. Itseems, from what I gather, to be one of those simple cases which are so extremely difficult.""That sounds a little paradoxical."

"But it isprofoundly true.Singularity isalmost invariably a clue. The more featureless and commonplace acrime is, the more difficult itis to bring ithome. In this case, however, they have established a very serious case against the son of the murdered man."

"It is a murder, then?"

"Well, itis conjecturedto be so. I shall take nothing for granted untilI have the opportunity of looking personally into it. I will explain the stateof things to you, as far as I have been able tounderstand it, in a very few words.

"Boscombe Valley is a country district notvery far from Ross, in Herefordshire. The largest landed proprietor in that partis a Mr. John Turner, who madehis money in Australia and returned some years ago to the old country. One of the farms which heheld, that of Hatherley, was let to Mr. CharlesMcCarthy, who was also an ex-Australian. The men had known eachother in the colonies, so thatit was not unnatural that when they came to settle down they should do so as near each other aspossible. Turnerwas apparentlythe richer man,so McCarthy became his tenant but still remained, it seems, uponterms of perfect equality, as they were frequently together. McCarthy had one son, a lad of eighteen, and Turner had an only daughter of the same age, but neither of them hadwives living. They appear to have avoided the society of the neighbouring English families and to have led retired lives, thoughboth the McCarthys were fond ofsport and werefrequently seenat the race-meetings of the neighbourhood. McCarthy kept two servants--a man anda girl. Turnerhad a considerable household, some half-dozen atthe least. Thatis as much as Ihave been ableto gather aboutthe families. Now for the facts."On June 3rd,that is, on Monday last, McCarthy left his houseat Hatherley about three in theafternoon and walked down to the Boscombe Pool,which is a small lake formed bythe spreading out of the streamwhich runs downthe Boscombe Valley. He had been out with his serving-man in the morning at Ross, and he had told the man thathe must hurry, as he had an appointment of importance to keep atthree. From that appointment henever came backalive.

"From Hatherley Farmhouse to the Boscombe Pool is a quarter of a mile,and two people saw him as he passed over this ground. One was anold woman, whose name is not mentioned, and theother was William Crowder, a game-keeper in theemploy of Mr. Turner. Both these witnesses depose that Mr. McCarthy was walkingalone. The game-keeper adds that within a few minutes of his seeing Mr. McCarthy pass he had seen his son, Mr.James McCarthy,going the same way with a gun under his arm. Tothe best of hisbelief, the father was actuallyin sight at thetime, and the son was followinghim. He thoughtno more of the matter until he heard in the evening of the tragedy that had occurred.

"The twoMcCarthys were seen after the time when WilliamCrowder, the game-keeper, lost sight of them. The Boscombe Poolis thickly wooded round, with just a fringe of grass and of reeds round the edge. A girl of fourteen, Patience Moran, who is thedaughter of thelodge-keeper ofthe Boscombe Valley estate, wasin one of the woods picking flowers. She statesthat while shewas there she saw, at the borderof the wood andclose by the lake, Mr. McCarthyand his son, and that they appeared to be having a violent quarrel. She heard Mr. McCarthy theelder using verystrong languageto his son, andshe saw the latter raise up hishand as if to strike his father. She was so frightened by theirviolence that she ran away andtold her motherwhen she reachedhome that she had left the twoMcCarthys quarrelling near Boscombe Pool, and that she was afraid that they weregoing to fight.She had hardlysaid the words when young Mr. McCarthy came running up to the lodge to say thathe had found hisfather dead inthe wood, and toask for the help of the lodge-keeper. He was much excited, without either his gun or his hat, and his right hand and sleeve were observed to bestained with fresh blood. On following him theyfound the deadbody stretched out upon the grass beside the pool. The head hadbeen beaten in by repeated blowsof some heavy and blunt weapon.The injuries were such as mightvery well havebeen inflicted by the butt-end of his son's gun,which was foundlying on the grass within a fewpaces of the body. Under thesecircumstances the young man wasinstantly arrested, and a verdict of 'wilful murder' having beenreturned at theinquest on Tuesday, he was on Wednesday broughtbefore the magistrates at Ross,who have referred the case to the next Assizes.Those are the main facts of thecase as they came out before the coroner and the police-court.""I could hardly imagine a moredamning case,"I remarked. "Ifever circumstantial evidence pointed to a criminal it does so here."

"Circumstantial evidence is a very trickything," answeredHolmes thoughtfully. "It may seem to point verystraight to onething, but if you shift your own point of viewa little, you may find it pointing in an equallyuncompromisingmanner to something entirely different. It mustbe confessed, however, that thecase looks exceedingly grave against the young man, and it is very possible thathe is indeed the culprit. Thereare several people in the neighbourhood, however, and among them Miss Turner, the daughter of the neighbouringlandowner, who believe in his innocence, and whohave retained Lestrade, whom you may recollectin connection with the Study inScarlet, to workout the case inhis interest. Lestrade, being rather puzzled, has referred thecase to me, andhence it is thattwo middle-agedgentlemen are flying westward at fifty miles anhour instead ofquietly digesting their breakfasts at home."

"I am afraid," said I, "that thefacts are so obvious that you will find little credit to be gained out of this case."

"There isnothing more deceptive than anobvious fact," he answered, laughing. "Besides,we may chance tohit upon some other obvious facts which may have been by no means obvious to Mr. Lestrade. Youknow me too wellto think that Iam boasting when I say that I shall either confirm or destroy his theory by means which he is quite incapable of employing, oreven of understanding. To take the first exampleto hand, I veryclearly perceive that in your bedroom the window is upon the right-hand side, and yet I question whether Mr. Lestrade would have noted even soself-evident a thing as that.""How on earth--""My dear fellow, I know you well. I know the military neatnesswhich characterises you. You shave every morning, and in this season you shaveby the sunlight;but since yourshaving is lessand less complete as we get farther back on theleft side, untilit becomes positively slovenlyas we get roundthe angle of thejaw, it is surely very clear that that side isless illuminatedthan the other.I could not imagine a man of your habits looking at himself inan equal light and being satisfied with such a result. I only quote this as a trivial example ofobservation andinference. Therein lies my metier, and it is just possible thatit may be of some service in the investigationwhich lies before us. There areone or two minorpoints which were brought out in the inquest, and which are worth considering.""What are they?"

"It appearsthat his arrestdid not take place at once, butafter the returnto Hatherley Farm. On the inspector of constabulary informing him that he was aprisoner, he remarked that he was not surprisedto hear it, andthat it was nomore than his deserts. This observation of his had the natural effect of removing any traces ofdoubt which might have remainedin the minds ofthe coroner's jury."

"It was aconfession," I ejaculated.

"No,for it was followed by a protestation of innocence."

"Coming on the top of such a damning series of events, itwas at least amost suspiciousremark."

"On the contrary," said Holmes, "it isthe brightest rift which I canat present see in the clouds. However innocent he might be, he could not be suchan absolute imbecile as not tosee that the circumstances werevery black against him. Had he appeared surprised at his own arrest, or feignedindignation at it, I should havelooked upon itas highly suspicious, because such surprise or anger would not be natural underthe circumstances, and yet mightappear to be the best policy toa scheming man.His frank acceptance of the situation marks himas either an innocent man, or else as a man ofconsiderable self-restraint andfirmness. As tohis remark abouthis deserts, itwas also not unnatural if you consider that hestood beside thedead body of his father, and that there is no doubt that he hadthat very day so far forgottenhis filial dutyas to bandy words with him, andeven, accordingto the little girl whose evidence is so important, to raise hishand as if to strike him. The self-reproach andcontrition whichare displayed in his remark appear to me to bethe signs of a healthy mind rather than of a guilty one."

I shook my head. "Many men have beenhanged on far slighter evidence," I remarked.

"So they have. And many men havebeen wrongfullyhanged."

"Whatis the young man's own account of the matter?""It is, I am afraid, not very encouraging to hissupporters, though there are one or two pointsin it which aresuggestive. Youwill find it here, and may readit for yourself."

He picked outfrom his bundlea copy of the local Herefordshire paper, and having turned downthe sheet he pointed out the paragraph in whichthe unfortunateyoung man had given his own statement of what had occurred. I settled myself down in the cornerof the carriageand read it very carefully. Itran in this way:"Mr. James McCarthy, the onlyson of the deceased, was then called and gave evidence as follows: 'I had been away from home for three days atBristol, and hadonly just returned upon the morning of last Monday, the 3rd. Myfather was absent from home atthe time of my arrival, and I was informed by the maid that he had driven over to Ross with JohnCobb, the groom. Shortly aftermy return I heard the wheels ofhis trap in theyard, and, looking out of my window, I saw him get out and walkrapidly out of the yard, thoughI was not awarein which direction he was going.I then took mygun and strolledout in the direction of the Boscombe Pool, withthe intention of visiting the rabbit warren which is upon the other side. On myway I saw William Crowder, thegame-keeper, ashe had stated inhis evidence; but he is mistaken in thinking that I was following my father. Ihad no idea thathe was in frontof me. When about a hundred yards from the poolI heard a cry of "Cooee!" whichwas a usual signal between my father and myself. I then hurriedforward, and found him standingby the pool. Heappeared to bemuch surprised at seeing me andasked me ratherroughly what I was doing there.A conversation ensued which ledto high words and almost to blows, for my fatherwas a man of avery violent temper. Seeing thathis passion wasbecoming ungovernable, I left him and returnedtowards Hatherley Farm. I had not gone more than150 yards, however, when I heard a hideous outcry behind me, which caused me torun back again.I found my father expiring uponthe ground, with his head terribly injured. I dropped my gun and held him in myarms, but he almost instantly expired. I kneltbeside him for some minutes, andthen made my way to Mr. Turner's lodge-keeper,his house beingthe nearest, toask for assistance. I saw no onenear my fatherwhen I returned,and I have no idea how he cameby his injuries.He was not a popular man, beingsomewhat cold and forbidding inhis manners, but he had, as faras I know, no active enemies. Iknow nothing further of the matter.'

"The Coroner: Did your father make any statement to you before he died?"Witness: He mumbled a few words, but I could only catch some allusion to a rat."The Coroner:What did you understand by that?"Witness: It conveyed no meaning to me. I thought that he wasdelirious.

"TheCoroner: What was the point upon which you andyour father hadthis final quarrel?

"Witness: Ishould prefer not to answer.

"The Coroner: I am afraid that Imust press it."Witness: It isreally impossible for me to tellyou. I can assure you that it has nothing to dowith the sad tragedy which followed.

"The Coroner: That is forthe court to decide. I need notpoint out to you that your refusal to answer will prejudice your case considerably in any future proceedings which may arise."Witness: I muststill refuse."The Coroner: Iunderstand thatthe cry of 'Cooee' was a commonsignal between you and your father?

"Witness: It was.

"The Coroner: How was it, then, that heuttered it before he saw you, and before he evenknew that you had returned fromBristol?

"Witness (with considerable confusion): I do not know.

"A Juryman: Did you see nothing which arousedyour suspicionswhen you returned on hearing the cry and foundyour father fatally injured?

"Witness: Nothingdefinite.

"TheCoroner: What doyou mean?

"Witness: I was so disturbed and excited as I rushedout into the open, that I couldthink of nothing except of my father. Yet I have a vague impression that as I ran forward something lay upon the ground to theleft of me. It seemed to me to be something greyin colour, a coat of some sort,or a plaid perhaps. When I rosefrom my fatherI looked round for it, but it was gone.

" 'Do you mean that itdisappeared before you went forhelp?'

" 'Yes,it was gone.'

"'You cannot saywhat it was?'" 'No, I had a feeling somethingwas there.'

"'How far from the body?'

" 'A dozen yards or so.'

" 'And how far from the edgeof the wood?'" 'About the same.'

" 'Then ifit was removed it was while youwere within a dozen yards of it?'

" 'Yes, but with my back towards it.'

"Thisconcluded the examination of thewitness."

"I see," said I as Iglanced down the column, "thatthe coroner in his concluding remarks was rathersevere upon young McCarthy. Hecalls attention,and with reason, to the discrepancy about his father having signalled to him before seeing him,also to his refusal to give details of his conversation with his father, and his singular account of his father's dying words.They are all, ashe remarks, very much against the son."

Holmeslaughed softlyto himself and stretched himselfout upon the cushioned seat. "Both you and thecoroner have been at some pains," said he, "to single out the very strongest points in the youngman's favour. Don't you see that you alternately give him credit for having toomuch imagination and too little? Too little, ifhe could not invent a cause ofquarrel which would give him thesympathy of thejury; too much,if he evolved from his own inner consciousnessanything so outre as a dying reference to a rat,and the incident of the vanishing cloth. No, sir, I shall approach this case from the point ofview that what this young man says is true, andwe shall see whither that hypothesis will lead us. And now hereis my pocket Petrarch, and not another word shall I say of thiscase until we are on the scene of action. We lunch at Swindon, and I see that weshall be therein twenty minutes."

It was nearly four o'clockwhen we at last,after passing through the beautiful Stroud Valley, and over thebroad gleamingSevern, found ourselves at the pretty little country-town of Ross. A lean, ferret-like man, furtive and sly-looking, was waitingfor us upon theplatform. In spite of the lightbrown dustcoatand leather-leggings which he wore in deferenceto his rustic surroundings, I had no difficultyin recognising Lestrade, of Scotland Yard. Withhim we drove tothe Hereford Arms where a room had already beenengaged for us."I have ordereda carriage," said Lestrade as we sat over a cupof tea. "I knewyour energeticnature, and thatyou would not be happy until you had been on the scene of the crime."

"It wasvery nice and complimentary of you," Holmes answered. "It is entirely a questionof barometric pressure."

Lestrade looked startled. "I do not quite follow," hesaid.

"How isthe glass? Twenty-nine, I see. No wind, and nota cloud in the sky. I have a caseful of cigarettes here which need smoking, andthe sofa is verymuch superior to the usual country hotel abomination. I do notthink that it isprobable that Ishall use the carriage to-night."

Lestrade laughed indulgently. "You have, nodoubt, already formed your conclusions from thenewspapers," hesaid. "The caseis as plain as apikestaff, andthe more one goes into it the plainer it becomes. Still, of course, one can't refuse a lady, andsuch a very positive one, too.She has heard ofyou, and wouldhave your opinion, though I repeatedly told herthat there was nothing which youcould do whichI had not already done. Why, bless my soul! hereis her carriageat the door."He had hardly spoken before there rushed into the room one of the most lovely young women that Ihave ever seenin my life. Herviolet eyes shining, her lips parted, a pink flush upon her cheeks, all thoughtof her natural reserve lost in her overpoweringexcitement and concern.

"Oh, Mr. Sherlock Holmes!" she cried, glancing from oneto the other ofus, and finally, with a woman'squick intuition, fastening uponmy companion, "I am so glad that you have come.I have driven down to tell youso. I know thatJames didn't doit. I know it, and I want you tostart upon yourwork knowing it, too. Never letyourself doubtupon that point.We have known each other sincewe were little children, and I know his faults as no one else does; but he is too tender-heartedto hurt a fly.Such a charge isabsurd to anyone who really knows him."

"I hope we may clear him, Miss Turner," said SherlockHolmes. "You mayrely upon my doing all that I can."

"But you have read the evidence. You haveformed some conclusion? Do you not see some loophole, some flaw?Do you not yourself think thathe is innocent?""I think thatit is very probable."

"There, now!" she cried,throwing back her head and looking defiantly atLestrade. "You hear! He gives mehopes."

Lestrade shrugged hisshoulders. "I amafraid that mycolleague has been a little quick in forming hisconclusions," he said.

"But heis right. Oh! Iknow that he isright. James never did it. Andabout his quarrel with his father, I am sure that the reason whyhe would not speak about it tothe coroner wasbecause I was concerned in it.""In what way?"asked Holmes.

"It is no time for me to hide anything. James andhis father hadmany disagreements about me. Mr.McCarthy was very anxious thatthere should bea marriage between us. James andI have always loved each otheras brother and sister; but of course he is youngand has seen very little of life yet, and--and--well, he naturally did not wishto do anythinglike that yet. So there were quarrels, and this,I am sure, wasone of them."

"And your father?" asked Holmes."Was he in favour of such a union?"

"No, he wasaverse to it also. No one but Mr. McCarthy wasin favour of it." A quick blushpassed over herfresh young faceas Holmes shotone of his keen,questioning glances at her.

"Thank you for this information,"said he. "May Isee your fatherif I call to-morrow?"

"I am afraid the doctor won't allow it.""The doctor?""Yes, have you not heard? Poor father has neverbeen strong foryears back, butthis has brokenhim down completely. He has taken to his bed, and Dr. Willows says that he is awreck and that his nervous system is shattered.Mr. McCarthy wasthe only man alive who had known dad in the olddays in Victoria."

"Ha! In Victoria! That is important."

"Yes, at the mines.""Quite so; atthe gold-mines,where, as I understand, Mr. Turner made his money."

"Yes, certainly."

"Thank you, Miss Turner.You have been of material assistance to me."

"You will tell meif you have anynews to-morrow.No doubt you will go to the prison to see James. Oh, if you do,Mr. Holmes, dotell him that Iknow him to be innocent."

"I will, Miss Turner."

"I must go home now, for dadis very ill, andhe misses me soif I leave him.Good-bye, and God help you in your undertaking." She hurried from the room as impulsively as she had entered, and we heard thewheels of her carriage rattle off down the street.

"I am ashamed of you, Holmes," said Lestradewith dignity after a few minutes' silence. "Whyshould you raise up hopes whichyou are bound to disappoint? Iam not over-tender of heart, butI call it cruel."

"I think that I see my way to clearing JamesMcCarthy," saidHolmes. "Have you an order to see him in prison?"

"Yes, but only for you and me."

"Then I shall reconsider myresolution about going out. Wehave still timeto take a trainto Hereford andsee him to-night?"

"Ample."

"Then let us do so. Watson, I fearthat you will find it very slow, but I shall only be away a couple of hours."I walked down tothe station with them, and thenwandered through the streets ofthe little town, finally returning to the hotel, where I lay upon the sofa andtried to interest myself in a yellow-backed novel. The puny plotof the story was so thin, however, when compared to the deep mystery through which we were groping, and I foundmy attention wander so continually from the action to the fact,that I at lastflung it acrossthe room and gave myself up entirely to a consideration of the events of the day. Supposing thatthis unhappy young man's storywere absolutelytrue, then whathellish thing, what absolutely unforeseen and extraordinary calamity could haveoccurred betweenthe time when he parted from his father, and the moment when, drawn back by hisscreams, he rushed into the glade? It was something terrible and deadly. What could it be? Might not the natureof the injuriesreveal something to my medicalinstincts? I rang the bell and called for the weekly county paper, which contained a verbatim account of the inquest. In the surgeon's deposition it was statedthat the posterior third of theleft parietal bone and the lefthalf of the occipital bone had been shattered bya heavy blow from a blunt weapon. I marked thespot upon my ownhead. Clearly such a blow musthave been struckfrom behind. That was to some extent in favourof the accused,as when seen quarrelling he wasface to face with his father. Still, it did notgo for very much, for the olderman might have turned his back before the blow fell. Still, it might be worth while to call Holmes' attention toit. Then therewas the peculiardying referenceto a rat. Whatcould that mean?It could not bedelirium. A mandying from a sudden blow does not commonly become delirious. No, it was more likely to be an attempt to explainhow he met hisfate. But what could it indicate? I cudgelled mybrains to findsome possible explanation. And then the incidentof the grey cloth seen by youngMcCarthy. If that were true themurderer must have dropped somepart of his dress, presumably his overcoat, inhis flight, andmust have had the hardihood to return and to carry it away at the instant when the son was kneeling with his back turned not a dozen paces off.What a tissue ofmysteries and improbabilities the whole thing was! I did not wonder at Lestrade's opinion, andyet I had so much faith in Sherlock Holmes' insight that I couldnot lose hope as long as everyfresh fact seemed to strengthenhis conviction of young McCarthy's innocence.

It was late before Sherlock Holmes returned. He came back alone,for Lestrade wasstaying in lodgings in the town.

"The glass still keeps very high," he remarked as he sat down. "It is of importance that it should not rain before we are able to go over theground. On theother hand, a man should be at his very best andkeenest for such nice work as that, and I did not wish to do itwhen fagged bya long journey.I have seen young McCarthy."

"And what did youlearn from him?""Nothing."

"Could he throw nolight?"

"Noneat all. I was inclined to thinkat one time thathe knew who haddone it and wasscreening him or her, but I amconvinced now that he is as puzzled as everyoneelse. He is nota very quick-witted youth, though comely to lookat and, I should think, sound at heart."

"I cannot admire histaste," I remarked, "if it is indeed a fact thathe was averse to a marriage with so charming ayoung lady as this Miss Turner.""Ah, thereby hangs a rather painful tale. Thisfellow is madly, insanely, in love with her, but some two yearsago, when he was only a lad, and before he really knew her, forshe had been away five years ata boarding-school, what does the idiot do but get into the clutches of a barmaid in Bristol andmarry her at aregistry office?No one knows aword of the matter, but you canimagine how maddening it must beto him to be upbraided for notdoing what he would give his very eyes to do, but what he knowsto be absolutelyimpossible. Itwas sheer frenzyof this sort which made him throw his hands upinto the air when his father, attheir last interview, was goading him on to propose to Miss Turner. On the other hand, he had no means of supporting himself, and his father, who was by all accounts a very hard man, would have thrown him over utterly had he known the truth. It was with his barmaid wifethat he had spent the last threedays in Bristol, and his fatherdid not know where he was. Markthat point. Itis of importance. Good has comeout of evil, however, for the barmaid, finding from the papers that he is in serious trouble andlikely to be hanged, has thrownhim over utterly and has written to him to saythat she has a husband already in the Bermuda Dockyard, so thatthere is reallyno tie between them. I think that that bit of news has consoledyoung McCarthy for all that he has suffered."

"But if he is innocent, who has done it?"

"Ah! who? I would callyour attentionvery particularly to two points.One is that themurdered man had an appointmentwith someone atthe pool, and that the someonecould not have been his son, forhis son was away, and he did not know when he would return. Thesecond is thatthe murdered manwas heard to cry 'Cooee!' before he knew that his son had returned. Those are the crucial points upon which thecase depends. And now let us talk about GeorgeMeredith, if youplease, and weshall leave allminor matters until to-morrow."There was no rain, as Holmes had foretold, andthe morning broke bright and cloudless. At nineo'clock Lestradecalled for us with the carriage, and we set offfor Hatherley Farm and the Boscombe Pool.

"There is serious news this morning," Lestrade observed. "It is saidthat Mr. Turner, of the Hall, is so ill that his life is despaired of."

"An elderly man, I presume?" said Holmes.

"About sixty; but his constitution has beenshattered by his life abroad, and he has been in failing healthfor some time.This business has had a very badeffect upon him. He was an oldfriend of McCarthy's, and, I mayadd, a great benefactor to him,for I have learned that he gavehim Hatherley Farm rent free.""Indeed! That is interesting,"said Holmes.

"Oh, yes! In a hundred other wayshe has helped him. Everybody about here speaks of his kindness to him."

"Really! Does it not strike you as a little singular that this McCarthy, who appears tohave had littleof his own, andto have been under such obligations to Turner,should still talk of marrying his son to Turner's daughter, whois, presumably,heiress to the estate, and thatin such a very cocksure manner,as if it were merely a case of aproposal and all else would follow? It is the more strange, since we know thatTurner himself was averse to theidea. The daughter told us as much. Do you notdeduce somethingfrom that?"

"We have got to the deductions andthe inferences," said Lestrade,winking at me."I find it hardenough to tacklefacts, Holmes,without flying away after theories and fancies.""You are right," said Holmes demurely; "you dofind it very hard to tackle thefacts."

"Anyhow, I have grasped one fact whichyou seem to find it difficult to get hold of,"replied Lestradewith some warmth.

"And that is--"

"That McCarthy senior met his death from McCarthy junior and that all theories to the contrary are the merest moonshine.""Well, moonshineis a brighter thing than fog,"said Holmes, laughing. "But I amvery much mistaken if this is not Hatherley Farm upon the left."

"Yes, that isit." It was a widespread, comfortable-looking building, two-storied, slate-roofed, with great yellow blotches of lichen upon the grey walls. The drawn blinds and the smokelesschimneys, however, gave it a stricken look, asthough the weight of this horrorstill lay heavyupon it. We called at the door,when the maid,at Holmes' request, showed us the boots which her master wore atthe time of hisdeath, and alsoa pair of the son's, though notthe pair whichhe had then had.Having measuredthese very carefully from sevenor eight different points, Holmes desired to beled to the court-yard, from which we all followed the winding track which led to Boscombe Pool.Sherlock Holmes was transformed when he was hot upon such a scent as this. Menwho had only known the quiet thinker and logician of Baker Street would have failed to recognise him. His faceflushed and darkened. His browswere drawn intotwo hard black lines, while hiseyes shone out from beneath themwith a steely glitter. His facewas bent downward, his shoulders bowed, his lips compressed, and the veins stood out like whipcord in his long,sinewy neck. His nostrils seemed to dilate witha purely animallust for the chase, and his mind was so absolutely concentratedupon the matterbefore him thata question or remark fell unheeded upon his ears, or, at the most, only provoked a quick, impatient snarl in reply. Swiftly andsilently he made his way alongthe track whichran through themeadows, and soby way of the woods to the Boscombe Pool. It wasdamp, marshy ground, as is allthat district, and there were marks of many feet, both upon thepath and amid the short grass which bounded it on either side. Sometimes Holmeswould hurry on,sometimes stop dead, and once hemade quite a little detour intothe meadow. Lestrade and I walked behind him, the detective indifferent and contemptuous, whileI watched my friend with the interest which sprang from the conviction that every one of his actions was directed towards a definite end.

TheBoscombe Pool, which is a littlereed-girt sheetof water some fifty yards across, is situated at the boundary between the Hatherley Farm and the private park of the wealthy Mr. Turner. Abovethe woods whichlined it upon the farther side we could see thered, jutting pinnacles which marked the site ofthe rich landowner's dwelling. On the Hatherleyside of the poolthe woods grewvery thick, andthere was a narrow belt of sodden grass twenty paces across between the edge ofthe trees and the reeds which lined the lake. Lestrade showed usthe exact spotat which the body had been found, and, indeed, so moist was theground, that I could plainly seethe traces which had been leftby the fall of the stricken man.To Holmes, as Icould see by his eager face andpeering eyes, very many other things were to beread upon the trampled grass. He ran round, like a dog who is picking up a scent, and then turned upon my companion.

"What didyou go into thepool for?" he asked.

"I fishedabout with a rake. I thought there might be some weapon or other trace. But howon earth--"

"Oh, tut, tut! I have no time! That left foot of yours with its inward twist is all over the place. A mole could trace it, and there it vanishes among the reeds.Oh, how simple it would all havebeen had I beenhere before they came like a herd of buffalo and wallowed all over it. Here iswhere the partywith the lodge-keeper came, andthey have covered all tracks forsix or eight feet round the body. But here arethree separate tracks of the same feet." He drewout a lens andlay down upon his waterproof tohave a better view, talking allthe time ratherto himself thanto us. "These are young McCarthy's feet. Twice he was walking, and once he ran swiftly, so thatthe soles are deeply marked andthe heels hardlyvisible. That bears out his story. He ran whenhe saw his father on the ground.Then here are the father's feetas he paced upand down. What is this, then? Itis the butt-endof the gun as the son stood listening. And this? Ha, ha! What have we here? Tiptoes! tiptoes! Square, too, quite unusual boots!They come, theygo, they come again--of coursethat was for thecloak. Now where did they comefrom?" He ran upand down, sometimes losing, sometimes finding the track until we were well within the edge of the wood and under the shadow ofa great beech, the largest treein the neighbourhood. Holmes traced his way to the farther sideof this and laydown once more upon his face with a little cry of satisfaction.For a long timehe remained there, turning overthe leaves and dried sticks, gathering up what seemed to me to be dust into an envelope and examining with his lens not only theground but eventhe bark of thetree as far ashe could reach.A jagged stone was lying among the moss, and this also he carefully examined andretained. Thenhe followed a pathway through the wood until hecame to the highroad, where alltraces were lost.

"It has beena case of considerable interest," he remarked, returning to hisnatural manner."I fancy that this grey house onthe right mustbe the lodge. Ithink that I will go in and havea word with Moran, and perhapswrite a little note. Having donethat, we may drive back to ourluncheon. You may walk to the cab, and I shall be with you presently."

It was about ten minutesbefore we regained our cab anddrove back intoRoss, Holmes still carrying withhim the stone which he had picked up in the wood.

"This may interest you, Lestrade," he remarked, holding it out. "The murderwas done with it."

"I see no marks."

"There are none."

"How do you know, then?"

"The grass was growing underit. It had onlylain there a few days. There was no sign of a place whence it had been taken. It corresponds with the injuries.There is no sign of any other weapon."

"And the murderer?"

"Is a tall man, left-handed, limpswith the rightleg, wears thick-soled shooting-boots and a greycloak, smokes Indian cigars, uses a cigar-holder, and carries ablunt pen-knifein his pocket.There are several other indications, but these may be enough toaid us in our search."

Lestradelaughed. "I amafraid that I amstill a sceptic," he said. "Theories are all very well, but wehave to deal with a hard-headedBritish jury.""Nous verrons,"answered Holmescalmly. "You work your own method, and I shall work mine. I shall be busy this afternoon, and shall probably return to London bythe evening train."

"And leaveyour case unfinished?"

"No, finished."

"But the mystery?"

"It is solved."

"Who was the criminal, then?"

"The gentleman I describe."

"Butwho is he?"

"Surely it would not be difficult to find out. Thisis not such a populous neighbourhood."

Lestrade shrugged his shoulders. "I ama practical man," he said, "andI really cannotundertake to goabout the country looking for aleft-handed gentleman with a game leg. I shouldbecome the laughing-stock of Scotland Yard."

"All right," saidHolmes quietly."I have given you the chance. Here are your lodgings. Good-bye.I shall drop youa line before Ileave."

Havingleft Lestrade at his rooms, wedrove to our hotel, where we found lunch upon the table. Holmeswas silent and buried in thoughtwith a pained expression upon his face, as onewho finds himself in a perplexing position.

"Look here, Watson," he said when the cloth was cleared "just sit down in this chair and let me preach to you for alittle. I don'tknow quite whatto do, and I should value youradvice. Light acigar and let meexpound."

"Pray do so."

"Well, now, in considering this casethere are two points about youngMcCarthy's narrative which struck us both instantly, although they impressed mein his favour and you against him. One was thefact that his father should, according to his account, cry 'Cooee!' before seeing him. The otherwas his singular dying reference to a rat. He mumbled several words, you understand, but that was all that caught the son's ear. Now from thisdouble point ourresearch must commence, and wewill begin it bypresuming thatwhat the lad says is absolutelytrue."

"What ofthis 'Cooee!' then?"

"Well, obviously it couldnot have been meant for the son. The son, as far as he knew, was in Bristol. Itwas mere chancethat he was within earshot. The'Cooee!' was meant to attract the attention ofwhoever it was that he had the appointment with.But 'Cooee' isa distinctly Australian cry, andone which is used between Australians. There isa strong presumption that the person whom McCarthy expected tomeet him at Boscombe Pool was someone who had been in Australia."

"What of therat, then?"

Sherlock Holmes took a folded paperfrom his pocketand flattened it out on the table. "This is a map of the Colonyof Victoria," he said. "I wiredto Bristol forit last night."He put his handover part of themap. "What do you read?"

"ARAT," I read.

"Andnow?" He raisedhis hand.

"BALLARAT."

"Quiteso. That was theword the man uttered, and of which his son onlycaught the lasttwo syllables.He was trying toutter the nameof his murderer.So and so, of Ballarat."

"It is wonderful!" Iexclaimed.

"Itis obvious. Andnow, you see, Ihad narrowed thefield down considerably. The possession of a grey garment was athird point which, granting theson's statementto be correct,was a certainty.We have come now out of mere vagueness to the definite conception of an Australian from Ballarat with a grey cloak."

"Certainly."

"And one who was at home inthe district, for the pool canonly be approached by the farm or by the estate,where strangerscould hardly wander."

"Quite so."

"Then comesour expeditionof to-day. By anexamination ofthe ground I gained the triflingdetails which Igave to that imbecile Lestrade,as to the personality of the criminal."

"But how did you gainthem?"

"You know my method. Itis founded uponthe observationof trifles."

"His height I knowthat you mightroughly judge from the length ofhis stride. Hisboots, too, might be told fromtheir traces.""Yes, they werepeculiar boots.""But his lameness?"

"The impression of his right foot was always less distinct than his left.He put less weight upon it. Why? Because he limped--he was lame."

"But his left-handedness.""You were yourself struck by thenature of the injury as recorded by the surgeonat the inquest.The blow was struck from immediately behind, and yet was upon the left side. Now, how can thatbe unless it were by a left-handed man? He had stood behind thattree during theinterview between the father and son. He had even smoked there.I found the ashof a cigar, which my special knowledge of tobacco ashes enablesme to pronounceas an Indian cigar. I have, asyou know, devoted some attentionto this, and written a little monograph on theashes of 140 different varietiesof pipe, cigar,and cigarette tobacco. Having found the ash, Ithen looked round and discoveredthe stump amongthe moss wherehe had tossed it. It was an Indian cigar, of thevariety which are rolled in Rotterdam."

"And the cigar-holder?"

"I could seethat the end hadnot been in hismouth. Therefore he used a holder. The tip hadbeen cut off, not bitten off, but the cut was not a clean one, so I deduced a blunt pen-knife.""Holmes," I said, "you have drawn a net round this man from which he cannot escape, and you have saved an innocent human life as truly as if you had cut the cord which was hanging him. I seethe direction inwhich all thispoints. The culprit is--"

"Mr.John Turner," cried the hotel waiter, opening the door of our sitting-room, andushering in a visitor.

The manwho entered wasa strange and impressive figure.His slow, limping step and bowed shoulders gavethe appearanceof decrepitude,and yet his hard, deep-lined, craggy features, and his enormouslimbs showed that he was possessed of unusual strength of body and of character.His tangled beard, grizzled hair, and outstanding, drooping eyebrows combined to give an air ofdignity and power to his appearance, but his face was of an ashen white, whilehis lips and thecorners of hisnostrils were tinged with a shade of blue. It was clear to me ata glance that he was in the grip of some deadlyand chronic disease.

"Pray sitdown on the sofa," said Holmesgently. "You hadmy note?"

"Yes, the lodge-keeper brought it up. You said thatyou wished to see me here to avoid scandal."

"Ithought peoplewould talk if Iwent to the Hall."

"And why didyou wish to seeme?" He lookedacross at my companion with despair in his wearyeyes, as thoughhis question was already answered.

"Yes," saidHolmes, answering the look rather than the words. "It is so. Iknow all about McCarthy."

The old man sank hisface in his hands. "God help me!" he cried. "ButI would not have let the youngman come to harm. I give you myword that I would have spoken out if it went against him at theAssizes."

"I amglad to hear you say so," saidHolmes gravely."I would have spoken now had itnot been for mydear girl. It would break her heart--it will break her heart when she hears that I am arrested."

"It may not come to that," said Holmes.

"What?"

"I am no official agent. Iunderstand thatit was your daughter who required my presence here, and I am acting in her interests. Young McCarthy must be gotoff, however.""I am a dying man," said old Turner. "I have had diabetes for years. My doctorsays it is a question whether Ishall live a month. Yet I wouldrather die undermy own roof than in a gaol."

Holmes rose and sat down at the table with his pen in his hand and a bundle of paper before him."Just tell us the truth," he said. "I shall jotdown the facts.You will sign it, and Watson here can witness it. Then I could produce your confession at the last extremity tosave young McCarthy. I promise you that I shallnot use it unless it is absolutely needed."

"It's as well," said the old man; "it's a questionwhether I shalllive to the Assizes, so it matters little to me,but I should wish to spare Alice the shock. Andnow I will makethe thing clearto you; it hasbeen a long timein the acting,but will not take me long to tell.

"You didn'tknow this dead man, McCarthy. Hewas a devil incarnate. I tell you that. God keep you out of theclutches of such a man as he. His grip has beenupon me these twenty years, andhe has blastedmy life. I'll tell you first howI came to be inhis power.

"Itwas in the early '60's at the diggings. I was ayoung chap then, hot-blooded and reckless, ready to turn my hand at anything; Igot among bad companions, tookto drink, had noluck with my claim, took to thebush, and in aword became whatyou would callover here a highway robber. There were six of us, and we had a wild, free life of it, sticking up a station fromtime to time, or stopping the wagons on the road to the diggings. Black Jack ofBallarat was the name I went under, and our party is still remembered in the colony as the Ballarat Gang.

"Oneday a gold convoy came down from Ballarat to Melbourne, and welay in wait forit and attackedit. There were six troopers andsix of us, so itwas a close thing, but we emptied four of theirsaddles at thefirst volley. Three of our boyswere killed, however, before wegot the swag. Iput my pistol tothe head of thewagon-driver, who was this veryman McCarthy. Iwish to the Lord that I had shot him then, butI spared him, though I saw his wicked little eyes fixed on my face, as though toremember everyfeature. We gotaway with the gold, became wealthy men, and madeour way over toEngland withoutbeing suspected. There I partedfrom my old pals and determinedto settle downto a quiet and respectable life.I bought this estate, which chanced to be in the market, and Iset myself to doa little good with my money, tomake up for theway in which Ihad earned it. Imarried, too, and though my wife died young sheleft me my dearlittle Alice. Even when she wasjust a baby herwee hand seemedto lead me downthe right pathas nothing elsehad ever done. In a word, I turned over a new leaf and did my best to make up for the past. Allwas going well when McCarthy laid his grip uponme.

"I had goneup to town about an investment,and I met him in Regent Streetwith hardly a coat to his back or a boot to hisfoot.

" 'Here we are, Jack,' says he, touchingme on the arm; 'we'll be as goodas a family toyou. There's twoof us, me and my son, and you can have the keeping of us. If you don't--it's afine, law-abiding country is England, and there's always a policeman within hail.'

"Well, downthey came to thewest country, there was no shaking them off, and there they have lived rent free on my best land ever since. There was no restfor me, no peace, no forgetfulness; turn where Iwould, there was his cunning, grinning face atmy elbow. It grew worse as Alicegrew up, for hesoon saw I wasmore afraid of her knowing my past than of the police. Whateverhe wanted he must have, and whatever it was I gave him without question, land, money, houses, until at last he asked a thing which I could not give. He asked for Alice.

"His son, you see, hadgrown up, and so had my girl, and as I was known to be in weakhealth, it seemed a fine stroketo him that hislad should stepinto the whole property. But there I was firm. Iwould not havehis cursed stockmixed with mine; not that I hadany dislike tothe lad, but hisblood was in him, and that wasenough. I stoodfirm. McCarthy threatened. I braved him to do his worst. We wereto meet at thepool midway between our houses to talk it over."When I went down there I foundhim talking with his son, so Ismoked a cigar and waited behinda tree until heshould be alone. But as I listened to his talkall that was black and bitter inme seemed to come uppermost. Hewas urging hisson to marry mydaughter with aslittle regard for what she might think as if she were a slut from off the streets. It drove memad to think that I and all thatI held most dear should be in the power of sucha man as this.Could I not snapthe bond? I wasalready a dyingand a desperateman. Though clear of mind and fairly strong oflimb, I knew that my own fate was sealed. But mymemory and my girl! Both couldbe saved if I could but silencethat foul tongue. I did it, Mr.Holmes. I woulddo it again. Deeply as I have sinned, I have leda life of martyrdom to atone for it. But that my girl should beentangled in the same meshes which held me wasmore than I could suffer. I struck him down withno more compunction than if hehad been some foul and venomousbeast. His cry brought back hisson; but I had gained the coverof the wood, though I was forcedto go back to fetch the cloak which I had dropped in my flight.That is the true story, gentlemen, of all thatoccurred."

"Well, it is not forme to judge you," said Holmes as the old man signed the statement which had been drawn out. "Ipray that we maynever be exposed to such a temptation."

"I pray not, sir. Andwhat do you intend to do?"

"Inview of your health, nothing. You are yourself aware that you will soon have toanswer for yourdeed at a highercourt than theAssizes. I willkeep your confession, and if McCarthy is condemned I shall be forced to use it.If not, it shallnever be seen by mortal eye; and your secret, whether you be alive or dead, shall be safe withus."

"Farewell,then," said theold man solemnly. "Your own deathbeds, when they come, will bethe easier for the thought of the peace which you have given tomine." Totteringand shaking inall his giant frame, he stumbledslowly from theroom.

"God help us!" said Holmes after a longsilence. "Why does fate play such tricks with poor, helpless worms? I never hearof such a caseas this that I do not think of Baxter's words, and say, 'There,but for the grace of God, goes Sherlock Holmes.'"

James McCarthy was acquittedat the Assizeson the strengthof a number of objections whichhad been drawn out by Holmes andsubmitted to the defending counsel. Old Turnerlived for sevenmonths after ourinterview, buthe is now dead;and there is every prospect thatthe son and daughter may come to live happily together in ignorance of the black cloud which rests upon their past.

ADVENTUREV.  THE FIVE ORANGE PIPS


WhenI glance over my notes and records of the Sherlock Holmes casesbetween the years '82 and '90,I am faced by somany which present strange andinteresting features that it isno easy matter to know which tochoose and whichto leave. Some,however, have already gained publicity throughthe papers, andothers have notoffered a fieldfor those peculiar qualities which my friend possessed in so high a degree, andwhich it is theobject of thesepapers to illustrate. Some, too,have baffled his analytical skill, and would be, as narratives,beginnings without an ending, while others havebeen but partially cleared up,and have their explanations founded rather uponconjecture and surmise than on that absolute logical proof whichwas so dear tohim. There is, however, one of these last whichwas so remarkable in its detailsand so startling in its resultsthat I am tempted to give someaccount of it inspite of the fact that there are points in connection with it which never havebeen, and probably never will be, entirely cleared up.

The year'87 furnished us with a long series of cases ofgreater or lessinterest, of which I retain therecords. Amongmy headings under this one twelve months I findan account of the adventure of the Paradol Chamber, of the Amateur Mendicant Society, who held aluxurious clubin the lower vault of a furniture warehouse, ofthe facts connected with the loss of the Britishbarque Sophy Anderson, of the singular adventures of the GricePatersons in theisland of Uffa,and finally ofthe Camberwell poisoning case. In the latter, asmay be remembered, Sherlock Holmes was able, bywinding up thedead man's watch, to prove thatit had been wound up two hours before, and thattherefore the deceased had goneto bed within that time--a deduction which was of the greatest importance in clearing up the case. All these I may sketch out atsome future date, but none of them present suchsingular features as the strange train of circumstances which Ihave now takenup my pen to describe.

It was in the latter days of September,and the equinoctial gales had set in with exceptional violence.All day the windhad screamed and the rain had beaten against the windows, so that even here inthe heart of great, hand-made London we were forced to raise ourminds for the instant from theroutine of lifeand to recognisethe presence ofthose great elemental forces which shriek at mankind through the bars of his civilisation, likeuntamed beastsin a cage. As evening drew in, the storm grew higher and louder,and the wind cried and sobbed like a child in the chimney. Sherlock Holmes satmoodily at one side of the fireplace cross-indexing his recordsof crime, whileI at the other was deep in one of Clark Russell's fine sea-stories until the howl of the gale from without seemed to blend withthe text, and the splash of therain to lengthenout into the long swash of thesea waves. My wife was on a visit to her mother's, and for a fewdays I was a dweller once morein my old quarters at Baker Street.

"Why," saidI, glancing upat my companion,"that was surely the bell. Whocould come to-night? Some friendof yours, perhaps?"

"Except yourself I have none," he answered. "I do not encourage visitors.""A client, then?"

"If so, itis a serious case. Nothing lesswould bring a man out on such aday and at suchan hour. But I take it that it is more likely tobe some crony of the landlady's."

Sherlock Holmes was wrong inhis conjecture,however, for there came a stepin the passage and a tapping atthe door. He stretched out his long arm to turnthe lamp away from himself and towards the vacant chair upon which a newcomer must sit.

"Come in!" said he.

The man who entered was young, some two-and-twentyat the outside,well-groomed and trimly clad, with something ofrefinement anddelicacy in hisbearing. The streaming umbrellawhich he held inhis hand, and his long shiningwaterproof toldof the fierce weather through which he had come.He looked abouthim anxiously in the glare of the lamp, and I could see that his face was paleand his eyes heavy, like those of a man who is weighed down withsome great anxiety.

"I owe youan apology," hesaid, raising his golden pince-nez to his eyes."I trust that Iam not intruding. I fear that Ihave brought some traces of thestorm and raininto your snug chamber."

"Giveme your coat andumbrella," saidHolmes. "They may rest here onthe hook and will be dry presently. You have come up from the south-west, I see."

"Yes, from Horsham."

"That clay and chalk mixture which I see upon your toecaps is quite distinctive."

"Ihave come for advice."

"That iseasily got."

"And help."

"That is not alwaysso easy."

"I have heard of you,Mr. Holmes. I heard from MajorPrendergast howyou saved him inthe TankervilleClub scandal.""Ah, of course.He was wrongfully accused of cheating at cards."

"He said thatyou could solveanything."

"Hesaid too much.""That you arenever beaten.""I have been beaten four times--three times by men, and once bya woman."

"Butwhat is that compared with the number of your successes?"

"It is true that I have been generally successful.""Then you may beso with me."

"I beg that you will draw your chair up to the fire and favour mewith some details as to your case."

"It is noordinary one.""None of those which come to meare. I am the last court of appeal."

"And yet Iquestion, sir,whether, in allyour experience,you have ever listened to a more mysterious andinexplicable chain of events than those which have happened inmy own family.""You fill me with interest," said Holmes. "Praygive us the essential facts from the commencement, and I can afterwards question you as to those details whichseem to me to bemost important."

The young manpulled his chair up and pushedhis wet feet outtowards the blaze.

"My name,"said he, "is John Openshaw, butmy own affairs have, as far as Ican understand,little to do with this awful business. It is ahereditary matter; so in order to give you an idea of the facts,I must go backto the commencement of the affair.

"You must know that my grandfather had two sons--my uncle Elias and my father Joseph. My father had a smallfactory at Coventry, which he enlarged at the time of the invention of bicycling. He was a patentee of the Openshaw unbreakabletire, and his business met withsuch success that he was able tosell it and toretire upon a handsome competence.

"My uncle Elias emigrated toAmerica when hewas a young manand became a planter in Florida, where he was reported to havedone very well.At the time of the war he foughtin Jackson's army, and afterwards under Hood, where he rose tobe a colonel. When Lee laid downhis arms my uncle returned to his plantation, where he remainedfor three or four years. About1869 or 1870 hecame back to Europe and took a small estate in Sussex, near Horsham. He had madea very considerable fortune inthe States, andhis reason for leaving them washis aversion tothe negroes, andhis dislike ofthe Republican policy in extending the franchiseto them. He wasa singular man,fierce and quick-tempered, veryfoul-mouthed when he was angry,and of a most retiring disposition. During allthe years that he lived at Horsham, I doubt if ever he set footin the town. Hehad a garden andtwo or three fields round his house, and therehe would take his exercise, though very often for weeks on end he would never leave his room. Hedrank a great deal of brandy and smoked very heavily, but he would see no society and did not want any friends,not even his own brother.

"Hedidn't mind me;in fact, he tooka fancy to me,for at the timewhen he saw me first I was a youngster of twelveor so. This would be in the year 1878, after hehad been eightor nine years inEngland. He begged my father tolet me live with him and he wasvery kind to mein his way. When he was sober he used to be fond of playing backgammon and draughts with me, and he would makeme his representative both withthe servants andwith the tradespeople, so thatby the time thatI was sixteen Iwas quite master of the house.I kept all the keys and could gowhere I liked and do what I liked, so long as Idid not disturbhim in his privacy. There was one singular exception, however,for he had a single room, a lumber-room up amongthe attics, which was invariably locked, and which he would never permit eitherme or anyone else to enter. With a boy's curiosity I have peeped through the keyhole, but I wasnever able to see more than such a collection of old trunks andbundles as would be expected insuch a room.

"One day--it wasin March, 1883--a letter with aforeign stamp lay upon the tablein front of thecolonel's plate. It was not a common thing forhim to receive letters, for hisbills were all paid in ready money, and he had no friends of anysort. 'From India!' said he ashe took it up, 'Pondicherry postmark! What can this be?' Openingit hurriedly, out there jumpedfive little dried orange pips, which pattered down upon his plate. I began to laugh at this, butthe laugh was struck from my lips at the sightof his face. Hislip had fallen,his eyes were protruding, his skin the colour of putty, and heglared at the envelope which hestill held in his trembling hand, 'K. K. K.!' heshrieked, and then, 'My God, myGod, my sins have overtaken me!'

" 'What is it, uncle?' I cried.

" 'Death,' said he, and rising from the table he retired tohis room, leaving me palpitatingwith horror. Itook up the envelope and saw scrawled in red inkupon the innerflap, just abovethe gum, the letter K three times repeated. There was nothing else save the five dried pips. What could be thereason of his overpowering terror? I left the breakfast-table, and as I ascendedthe stair I methim coming downwith an old rusty key, which must have belongedto the attic, in one hand, anda small brass box, like a cashbox, in the other." 'They may dowhat they like,but I'll checkmate them still,'said he with anoath. 'Tell Mary that I shall want a fire in myroom to-day, and send down to Fordham, the Horsham lawyer.'

"Idid as he ordered, and when thelawyer arrivedI was asked to step up to the room. The fire wasburning brightly, and in the grate there was amass of black, fluffy ashes, asof burned paper,while the brassbox stood openand empty besideit. As I glanced at the box I noticed, with a start, that uponthe lid was printed the treble Kwhich I had read in the morningupon the envelope.

" 'I wish you, John,' saidmy uncle, 'to witness my will. Ileave my estate, with all its advantages and all its disadvantages, to my brother, your father,whence it will,no doubt, descend to you. If you can enjoy it in peace, well and good! If you find you cannot,take my advice,my boy, and leave it to your deadliest enemy. Iam sorry to giveyou such a two-edged thing, butI can't say what turn things are going to take.Kindly sign thepaper where Mr.Fordham shows you.'

"I signedthe paper as directed, and the lawyer took it away with him. Thesingular incident made, as youmay think, the deepest impression upon me, and Ipondered over it and turned itevery way in mymind without being able to makeanything of it.Yet I could notshake off the vague feeling of dread which it left behind, though the sensationgrew less keen as the weeks passed and nothing happened to disturb the usual routine of our lives. I could see achange in my uncle, however. Hedrank more thanever, and he was less inclinedfor any sort ofsociety. Most ofhis time he would spend in hisroom, with the door locked uponthe inside, butsometimes he would emerge in a sort of drunken frenzy and wouldburst out of thehouse and tearabout the gardenwith a revolverin his hand, screaming out thathe was afraid of no man, and that he was not tobe cooped up, like a sheep in apen, by man ordevil. When these hot fits wereover, however, he would rush tumultuously in atthe door and lock and bar it behind him, like aman who can brazen it out no longer against theterror which lies at the roots of his soul. At such times I haveseen his face,even on a cold day, glisten withmoisture, as though it were newraised from a basin.

"Well, tocome to an endof the matter, Mr. Holmes, and not to abuse yourpatience, therecame a night when he made one of those drunkensallies from which he never cameback. We foundhim, when we went to search forhim, face downward in a little green-scummed pool, which lay atthe foot of thegarden. There was no sign of anyviolence, and the water was buttwo feet deep,so that the jury, having regardto his known eccentricity, brought in a verdictof 'suicide.' But I, who knew how he winced fromthe very thought of death, hadmuch ado to persuade myself thathe had gone outof his way to meet it. The matter passed, however, and my father entered into possession of theestate, and ofsome $14,000, which lay to his credit at the bank."

"One moment," Holmes interposed, "your statement is, I foresee, one of themost remarkableto which I haveever listened. Let me have the date of the reception by your uncle of the letter, and the date of his supposed suicide."

"The letter arrived onMarch 10, 1883.His death was seven weeks later, upon the nightof May 2nd."

"Thank you. Prayproceed."

"Whenmy father tookover the Horshamproperty, he, at my request, made a careful examination of theattic, which hadbeen always locked up. We foundthe brass box there, although its contents hadbeen destroyed.On the inside ofthe cover was apaper label, with the initialsof K. K. K. repeated upon it, and 'Letters, memoranda, receipts,and a register'written beneath. These, we presume, indicated the nature of thepapers which had been destroyedby Colonel Openshaw. For the rest, there was nothing of much importance in theattic save a great many scattered papers and note-books bearingupon my uncle'slife in America.Some of them were of the war time and showed that he had done his duty well andhad borne the repute of a bravesoldier. Otherswere of a dateduring the reconstruction of theSouthern states, and were mostly concerned withpolitics, for he had evidentlytaken a strong part in opposingthe carpet-bag politicians who had been sent down from the North.

"Well, it wasthe beginning of '84 when my father came to live at Horsham, and all went as well as possible with us until theJanuary of '85.On the fourth day after the newyear I heard myfather give a sharp cry of surprise as we sat together at the breakfast-table.There he was, sitting with a newly opened envelope in one hand and five dried orange pips in theoutstretched palm of the otherone. He had always laughed at what he called mycock-and-bull story about the colonel, but he looked very scaredand puzzled nowthat the same thing had come upon himself.

" 'Why, what on earth does this mean, John?' he stammered.

"My heart had turned tolead. 'It is K.K. K.,' said I."He looked inside the envelope. 'So it is,' hecried. 'Here are the very letters. But what isthis written above them?'

" 'Put the papers onthe sundial,' Iread, peeping over his shoulder." 'What papers? What sundial?'he asked.

" 'The sundial in the garden. Thereis no other,' said I; 'but the papers must be those that are destroyed.'

" 'Pooh!' said he, gripping hard at his courage. 'We are in a civilised land here, andwe can't have tomfoolery of this kind. Where does the thing come from?'

" 'From Dundee,' I answered, glancingat the postmark." 'Some preposterous practicaljoke,' said he.'What have I todo with sundials and papers? Ishall take no notice of such nonsense.'

" 'I should certainly speak to the police,' I said.

"'And be laughedat for my pains.Nothing of thesort.'

" 'Thenlet me do so?'" 'No, I forbidyou. I won't have a fuss made about such nonsense.'

"It was invain to argue with him, for he was a very obstinate man. I wentabout, however,with a heart which was full of forebodings.

"Onthe third day after the comingof the letter myfather went from home to visitan old friend ofhis, Major Freebody, who is incommand of one of the forts uponPortsdown Hill.I was glad thathe should go, for it seemed tome that he was farther from danger when he was away from home. In that, however,I was in error.Upon the secondday of his absence I received atelegram from the major, imploring me to come at once. My father had fallen over one of the deep chalk-pits which abound in theneighbourhood,and was lying senseless, with ashattered skull.I hurried to him, but he passedaway without having ever recovered his consciousness. He had, as it appears, been returning from Fareham in thetwilight, and as the country was unknown to him, and the chalk-pit unfenced, the jury had no hesitation in bringing in a verdict of 'death fromaccidental causes.' Carefully as I examined every fact connected with his death, I was unable to find anythingwhich could suggest the idea ofmurder. There were no signs of violence, no footmarks, no robbery, no record ofstrangers havingbeen seen uponthe roads. And yet I need not tell you that my mind was far fromat ease, and that I was well-nigh certain thatsome foul plot had been woven round him.

"In this sinister wayI came into my inheritance. Youwill ask me whyI did not dispose of it? I answer, because I waswell convincedthat our troubles were in some way dependent upon an incident inmy uncle's life, and that the danger would be as pressing in one house as in another.

"It wasin January, '85,that my poor father met his end, and two yearsand eight monthshave elapsed since then. Duringthat time I have lived happilyat Horsham, andI had begun to hope that this curse had passed away from the family, and that ithad ended withthe last generation. I had begunto take comforttoo soon, however; yesterday morning the blow fell in the veryshape in which it had come uponmy father."

Theyoung man tookfrom his waistcoat a crumpled envelope, and turning to the tablehe shook out upon it five little dried orange pips.

"This is the envelope," hecontinued. "Thepostmark is London--eastern division. Within are the very wordswhich were uponmy father's last message: 'K. K. K.'; and then'Put the paperson the sundial.'"

"What have you done?" askedHolmes.

"Nothing."

"Nothing?""To tell the truth"--he sank his face into histhin, white hands--"I have felthelpless. I havefelt like one of those poor rabbits when the snake is writhingtowards it. I seem to be in thegrasp of some resistless, inexorable evil, whichno foresight and no precautionscan guard against."

"Tut! tut!" cried SherlockHolmes. "You must act, man, oryou are lost. Nothing but energycan save you. This is no time for despair."

"Ihave seen the police."

"Ah!""But they listened to my story with a smile. I am convinced thatthe inspector has formed the opinion that the letters are all practical jokes,and that the deaths of my relations were reallyaccidents, as the jury stated, and were not to be connected withthe warnings."Holmes shook his clenched handsin the air. "Incredible imbecility!" he cried."They have, however, allowed mea policeman, who may remain inthe house with me."

"Has he come with you to-night?"

"No. Hisorders were to stay in the house."

Again Holmesraved in the air.

"Why did youcome to me," hecried, "and, above all, why didyou not come atonce?"

"I didnot know. It wasonly to-day that I spoke to Major Prendergast about my troublesand was advisedby him to cometo you."

"It isreally two dayssince you had the letter. We should have actedbefore this. Youhave no furtherevidence, I suppose, than thatwhich you have placed before us--no suggestive detail which might help us?"

"There is one thing," said John Openshaw. He rummaged in his coat pocket, and, drawing out a pieceof discoloured,blue-tinted paper, he laid it out upon the table. "I have some remembrance," said he, "that on the day when my uncle burned thepapers I observed that the small, unburned margins which lay amid the ashes wereof this particular colour. I found this singlesheet upon the floor of his room, and I am inclined to think that it may be oneof the papers which has, perhaps, fluttered outfrom among the others, and in that way has escaped destruction.Beyond the mention of pips, I donot see that ithelps us much.I think myself that it is a pagefrom some private diary. The writing is undoubtedly my uncle's."

Holmes movedthe lamp, and weboth bent overthe sheet of paper, which showedby its ragged edge that it hadindeed been tornfrom a book. Itwas headed, "March, 1869," andbeneath were thefollowing enigmatical notices:"4th. Hudson came. Same old platform.

"7th. Set the pips on McCauley, Paramore, and

        John Swain, of St. Augustine.

"9th. McCauley cleared.

"10th. John Swain cleared.

"12th. Visited Paramore. Allwell."

"Thank you!" said Holmes, folding up thepaper and returning it to our visitor. "And nowyou must on noaccount lose another instant. Wecannot spare time even to discuss what you havetold me. You must get home instantly and act.""What shall I do?"

"There is but one thing todo. It must be done at once. Youmust put this piece of paper which you have shown us into the brass box which you have described. You must alsoput in a note to say that all the other paperswere burned by your uncle, and that this is theonly one which remains. You mustassert that insuch words as will carry conviction with them. Having done this,you must at once put the box out upon the sundial, as directed.Do you understand?"

"Entirely."

"Do not thinkof revenge, oranything of thesort, at present. I think that we may gain thatby means of thelaw; but we haveour web to weave, while theirsis already woven. The first consideration is toremove the pressing danger whichthreatens you.The second is toclear up the mystery and to punish the guilty parties."

"I thank you," said the young man, rising and pullingon his overcoat."You have givenme fresh life and hope. I shallcertainly do asyou advise."

"Do not lose an instant. And, above all, take care of yourself inthe meanwhile,for I do not think that there can be a doubt that you are threatened by a very real and imminentdanger. How doyou go back?"

"By train from Waterloo."

"It isnot yet nine. The streets willbe crowded, so Itrust that youmay be in safety. And yet you cannot guard yourself too closely."

"I am armed.""That is well.To-morrow I shall set to work upon your case.""I shall see you at Horsham, then?"

"No, yoursecret lies in London. It is there that I shallseek it."

"ThenI shall call upon you in a day,or in two days,with news as tothe box and thepapers. I shalltake your advice in every particular." He shookhands with us and took his leave. Outside the wind still screamed and the rainsplashed and pattered against the windows. Thisstrange, wild story seemed to have come to us from amid the madelements--blownin upon us likea sheet of sea-weed in a gale--and now to have been reabsorbed by them once more.

Sherlock Holmes sat for sometime in silence,with his head sunk forward andhis eyes bent upon the red glowof the fire. Then he lit his pipe, and leaning back in his chairhe watched theblue smoke-ringsas they chasedeach other up tothe ceiling.

"I think, Watson," he remarked atlast, "that ofall our cases wehave had none more fantastic than this."

"Save, perhaps, the Sign of Four."

"Well, yes. Save,perhaps, that.And yet this John Openshaw seemsto me to be walking amid even greater perils than did the Sholtos."

"But haveyou," I asked, "formed any definite conception as to what theseperils are?"

"There can be no question as to their nature," heanswered.

"Thenwhat are they?Who is this K. K. K., and why does he pursue this unhappy family?"

Sherlock Holmes closed his eyes and placed his elbows upon the arms of his chair, with his finger-tips together. "The idealreasoner," he remarked, "would,when he had oncebeen shown a single fact in allits bearings, deduce from it not only all the chain of events which led up to it but also all the results whichwould follow from it. As Cuviercould correctlydescribe a whole animal by thecontemplation ofa single bone,so the observerwho has thoroughly understood one link in a series of incidentsshould be able to accurately state all the otherones, both before and after. Wehave not yet grasped the results which the reason alone can attain to. Problemsmay be solved in the study which have baffled all those who have sought a solution by the aid of their senses.To carry the art, however, to its highest pitch,it is necessarythat the reasoner should be able to utilise allthe facts whichhave come to his knowledge; andthis in itselfimplies, as youwill readily see, a possession of all knowledge,which, even inthese days of free education andencyclopaedias,is a somewhat rare accomplishment. It is not soimpossible, however, that a manshould possessall knowledge which is likely tobe useful to him in his work, and this I have endeavoured in mycase to do. IfI remember rightly, you on one occasion, in theearly days of our friendship, defined my limitsin a very precise fashion."

"Yes," I answered,laughing. "It was a singular document. Philosophy, astronomy, and politics weremarked at zero,I remember. Botany variable, geology profound asregards the mud-stains from anyregion within fifty miles of town, chemistry eccentric, anatomyunsystematic, sensational literature and crimerecords unique,violin-player, boxer, swordsman,lawyer, and self-poisoner by cocaine and tobacco. Those, I think, were the mainpoints of my analysis."

Holmesgrinned at thelast item. "Well," he said, "I say now, as I said then, that a man should keep his little brain-attic stocked with all the furniture that he islikely to use, and the rest he can put away in the lumber-room of his library, where he can getit if he wants it. Now, for sucha case as the one which has been submitted to us to-night, we need certainly tomuster all ourresources. Kindly hand me down the letter K of the American Encyclopaedia whichstands upon theshelf beside you. Thank you. Nowlet us considerthe situation and see what maybe deduced fromit. In the firstplace, we may start with a strong presumption that Colonel Openshaw had some very strong reasonfor leaving America. Men at histime of life donot change alltheir habits andexchange willingly the charmingclimate of Florida for the lonely life of an English provincialtown. His extreme love of solitude in England suggests the ideathat he was infear of someoneor something, sowe may assume as a working hypothesis that it was fear of someone or somethingwhich drove himfrom America. Asto what it washe feared, we can only deduce that by considering the formidableletters which were received byhimself and hissuccessors. Didyou remark the postmarks of those letters?"

"The first was fromPondicherry, the second from Dundee, and the third from London."

"From East London. What do you deduce from that?"

"They areall seaports. That the writer was on board of aship."

"Excellent. We have already a clue. There can be no doubt that the probability--the strong probability--is that the writer was on boardof a ship. And now let us consider another point. In the case ofPondicherry, seven weeks elapsed between the threat and its fulfilment, in Dundee it was only some three or four days. Does that suggest anything?"

"A greaterdistance to travel."

"But theletter had alsoa greater distance to come."

"Then I do not seethe point."

"There is at leasta presumption that the vessel in which the manor men are is asailing-ship. Itlooks as if they always send their singular warning or token before them when starting upon their mission. Yousee how quicklythe deed followed the sign whenit came from Dundee. If they hadcome from Pondicherry in a steamer they would have arrived almost as soon as their letter. But,as a matter offact, seven weeks elapsed. I think that those seven weeks represented the difference between themail-boat whichbrought the letter and the sailing vessel whichbrought the writer."

"It is possible."

"Morethan that. It isprobable. And now you see the deadly urgency ofthis new case,and why I urgedyoung Openshaw to caution. The blow has always fallen at the endof the time which it would takethe senders totravel the distance. But this one comes from London, and therefore we cannot count upon delay.""Good God!" I cried. "What canit mean, this relentless persecution?"

"The papers which Openshaw carried are obviously of vital importance tothe person or persons in the sailing-ship. I think that it is quite clear that there must be more than one of them. A single mancould not havecarried out twodeaths in such away as to deceive a coroner's jury. There musthave been several in it, and they must have beenmen of resourceand determination. Their papersthey mean to have, be the holder of them who itmay. In this way you see K. K.K. ceases to bethe initials ofan individual and becomes the badge of a society."

"But of whatsociety?"

"Have you never--" said Sherlock Holmes, bending forward and sinkinghis voice--"have you never heard of the Ku KluxKlan?"

"I never have."

Holmesturned over theleaves of the book upon his knee. "Here it is,"said he presently:

" 'Ku KluxKlan. A name derived from the fanciful resemblance to the soundproduced by cocking a rifle. This terrible secret society was formed by some ex-Confederate soldiers in the Southern states after the Civil War,and it rapidlyformed local branches in different parts of thecountry, notablyin Tennessee, Louisiana, the Carolinas, Georgia, and Florida. Its power was used for politicalpurposes, principally for the terrorising of thenegro voters and the murderingand driving fromthe country ofthose who were opposed to its views. Its outrages were usually preceded by a warning sent to themarked man in some fantastic but generally recognised shape--asprig of oak-leaves in some parts, melon seeds or orange pips inothers. On receiving this the victim might either openly abjurehis former ways, or might fly from the country.If he braved the matter out, death would unfailingly come uponhim, and usuallyin some strangeand unforeseenmanner. So perfect was the organisation of the society, and so systematic its methods, that there is hardly a case upon record where any man succeeded in braving it with impunity, or in whichany of its outrages were tracedhome to the perpetrators. For some years the organisation flourished in spite ofthe efforts ofthe United States government andof the better classes of the community in the South. Eventually, in the year 1869, the movementrather suddenlycollapsed, although there havebeen sporadic outbreaks of the same sort since that date.'

"Youwill observe,"said Holmes, laying down the volume, "that the sudden breaking up of the societywas coincidentwith the disappearance of Openshaw from Americawith their papers. It may well have been cause and effect. It isno wonder thathe and his family have some of the more implacable spirits upontheir track. Youcan understandthat this register and diary mayimplicate someof the first menin the South, and that there may be many who will not sleep easy at night untilit is recovered."

"Then the page we have seen--"

"Is such aswe might expect.It ran, if I remember right, 'sent the pips toA, B, and C'--that is, sent thesociety's warning to them. Thenthere are successive entries that A and B cleared, or left the country, and finally that C was visited, with, Ifear, a sinisterresult for C. Well, I think, Doctor, that we may let some lightinto this darkplace, and I believe that the only chance youngOpenshaw has inthe meantime isto do what I have told him. There is nothing more to be said orto be done to-night, so hand meover my violin and let us try toforget for halfan hour the miserable weather and the still more miserable waysof our fellow men."

It had cleared in the morning, and the sunwas shining with a subdued brightness through the dim veil which hangs over thegreat city. Sherlock Holmes wasalready at breakfast when I came down.

"You will excuse me fornot waiting foryou," said he;"I have, I foresee, a very busyday before me inlooking into this case of youngOpenshaw's."

"What steps willyou take?" I asked.

"It will very much depend upon the resultsof my first inquiries. I may have to go down toHorsham, after all."

"You willnot go there first?"

"No, I shall commence withthe City. Justring the bell and the maid willbring up your coffee."

As I waited, I lifted the unopened newspaper from the table and glancedmy eye over it.It rested upon aheading which sent a chill to my heart.

"Holmes," I cried, "you are too late.""Ah!" said he,laying down hiscup, "I fearedas much. How wasit done?" He spoke calmly, butI could see thathe was deeply moved.

"My eye caught the name of Openshaw, andthe heading 'Tragedy Near Waterloo Bridge.' Hereis the account:" 'Between nine and ten last night Police-Constable Cook, of the H Division, on duty near Waterloo Bridge, heard a cry for help and a splash in the water. Thenight, however,was extremely dark and stormy,so that, in spite of the help ofseveral passers-by, it was quite impossible toeffect a rescue.The alarm, however, was given,and, by the aidof the water-police, the body was eventually recovered. It proved to be that ofa young gentleman whose name, asit appears froman envelope which was found inhis pocket, wasJohn Openshaw, and whose residence is near Horsham. It is conjectured that he may have been hurrying down to catch the last train from WaterlooStation, and that in his haste and the extreme darkness he missed his path and walked over the edge of one of the small landing-places for riversteamboats. Thebody exhibitedno traces of violence, and therecan be no doubtthat the deceased had been thevictim of an unfortunate accident, which shouldhave the effectof calling the attention of theauthorities to the condition ofthe riverside landing-stages.' "We sat in silence for some minutes, Holmes more depressed andshaken than I had ever seen him."That hurts mypride, Watson,"he said at last. "It is a pettyfeeling, no doubt, but it hurtsmy pride. It becomes a personalmatter with menow, and, if Godsends me health, I shall set myhand upon thisgang. That he should come to mefor help, and that I should sendhim away to hisdeath--!" He sprang from his chair and paced about the room inuncontrollable agitation, with aflush upon hissallow cheeks and a nervous clasping and unclasping of his longthin hands.

"They must be cunning devils," he exclaimed at last. "How could they have decoyed him down there? The Embankment isnot on the direct line to the station. The bridge, no doubt, was too crowded, even on such a night, for their purpose. Well, Watson, we shall see who will winin the long run.I am going outnow!"

"To the police?"

"No; Ishall be my ownpolice. When I have spun the webthey may take the flies, but not before."

Allday I was engaged in my professional work, and it was late in the evening beforeI returned to Baker Street. Sherlock Holmes hadnot come back yet. It was nearly ten o'clock before he entered,looking pale and worn. He walked up to the sideboard, and tearing a piece fromthe loaf he devoured it voraciously, washing itdown with a longdraught of water.

"You are hungry," I remarked.

"Starving. Ithad escaped mymemory. I have had nothing sincebreakfast."

"Nothing?"

"Not abite. I had notime to think ofit."

"And howhave you succeeded?"

"Well."

"You have a clue?"

"I have themin the hollow ofmy hand. YoungOpenshaw shall not long remain unavenged. Why, Watson, let us put their own devilish trade-markupon them. It iswell thought of!"

"What do youmean?"

He tookan orange fromthe cupboard, and tearing it topieces he squeezed out the pipsupon the table.Of these he tookfive and thrustthem into an envelope. On the inside of the flap he wrote "S. H. for J. O." Then he sealed it and addressed itto "Captain James Calhoun, Barque Lone Star, Savannah, Georgia.""That will await him when he enters port," said he, chuckling."It may give him a sleepless night. He will find it as sure a precursor of hisfate as Openshawdid before him."

"And who is this Captain Calhoun?"

"The leader of the gang.I shall have theothers, but hefirst."

"How did you trace it,then?"

He tooka large sheet ofpaper from hispocket, all covered with dates and names.

"I have spent the whole day," said he, "over Lloyd'sregisters and files of the old papers, followingthe future career of every vessel which touchedat Pondicherryin January and February in '83.There were thirty-six ships of fair tonnage which were reportedthere during those months. Of these, one, the Lone Star, instantly attracted myattention, since, although it was reported as having cleared from London, the name is that whichis given to oneof the states of the Union."

"Texas, I think.""I was not andam not sure which; but I knew that the ship must have an American origin."

"What then?"

"I searched the Dundee records, and when I found thatthe barque LoneStar was therein January, '85,my suspicion became a certainty. I then inquired as to the vessels which lay atpresent in theport of London.""Yes?"

"The Lone Star had arrived here last week. I went downto the Albert Dock and found that she had beentaken down the river by the early tide this morning, homeward bound to Savannah.I wired to Gravesend and learned that she had passed some timeago, and as thewind is easterlyI have no doubtthat she is nowpast the Goodwins and not veryfar from the Isle of Wight."

"What will you do,then?"

"Oh, Ihave my hand upon him. He and the two mates, areas I learn, theonly native-born Americans in the ship. The others are Finns and Germans. I know, also, that they were all three away from theship last night.I had it from the stevedore whohas been loading their cargo. By the time thattheir sailing-ship reaches Savannah the mail-boat will have carried this letter,and the cable will have informed the police ofSavannah that these three gentlemen are badly wanted here upon acharge of murder."

There is ever a flaw, however, in the bestlaid of human plans, and the murderers of John Openshaw were never to receive the orange pips which would show them that another, as cunning andas resolute asthemselves, wasupon their track. Very long andvery severe werethe equinoctialgales that year. We waited longfor news of theLone Star of Savannah, but noneever reached us. We did at lasthear that somewhere far out inthe Atlantic a shattered stern-post of a boat was seen swingingin the trough ofa wave, with the letters "L. S." carved upon it, and that is all which we shallever know of the fate of the Lone Star.

ADVENTURE  VI.  THE MAN WITH THE TWISTED LIP


Isa Whitney, brother ofthe late EliasWhitney, D.D., Principal of theTheological College of St. George's, was much addicted to opium.The habit grewupon him, as I understand, fromsome foolish freak when he was at college; for having read De Quincey's description of his dreams and sensations, he had drenched his tobacco with laudanum in an attempt to produce the same effects. He found,as so many morehave done, thatthe practice iseasier to attain than to get rid of, and for many years he continued to be a slave to the drug,an object of mingled horror andpity to his friends and relatives. I can see him now, with yellow, pasty face,drooping lids, and pin-point pupils, all huddledin a chair, thewreck and ruinof a noble man.One night--it was in June, '89--there came a ring to my bell, about the hour when a man gives his first yawn and glances at theclock. I sat upin my chair, and my wife laid her needle-work down in her lap and made a littleface of disappointment.

"A patient!" said she."You'll have togo out."

I groaned, for I wasnewly come backfrom a weary day.

We heard thedoor open, a fewhurried words,and then quick steps upon the linoleum. Our owndoor flew open,and a lady, cladin some dark-coloured stuff, with a black veil,entered the room.

"You will excuse my callingso late," she began, and then, suddenly losing her self-control,she ran forward, threw her armsabout my wife'sneck, and sobbed upon her shoulder. "Oh, I'm insuch trouble!"she cried; "I doso want a little help."

"Why,"said my wife, pulling up her veil, "it is KateWhitney. How youstartled me, Kate! I had not anidea who you were when you camein."

"I didn'tknow what to do, so I came straight to you." That was always the way. Folk whowere in grief came to my wife like birds to a light-house.

"Itwas very sweet of you to come. Now, you must have some wine andwater, and sit here comfortablyand tell us allabout it. Or should you rather that I sent Jamesoff to bed?"

"Oh, no, no! I want the doctor'sadvice and help,too. It's aboutIsa. He has notbeen home for two days. I am sofrightened about him!"

It wasnot the first time that she hadspoken to us ofher husband's trouble, to me asa doctor, to mywife as an old friend and schoolcompanion. We soothed and comforted her by suchwords as we could find. Did sheknow where herhusband was? Wasit possible that we could bringhim back to her?

It seems thatit was. She hadthe surest information that oflate he had, when the fit was onhim, made use of an opium den in the farthest east of the City.Hitherto his orgies had alwaysbeen confined toone day, and hehad come back,twitching and shattered, in theevening. But nowthe spell had been upon him eight-and-forty hours, and he lay there, doubtlessamong the dregsof the docks, breathing in the poison or sleeping off the effects. There he wasto be found, shewas sure of it,at the Bar of Gold, in Upper Swandam Lane. Butwhat was she todo? How could she, a young and timid woman, makeher way into such a place and pluck her husbandout from amongthe ruffians whosurrounded him?There was thecase, and of course there was but one way out ofit. Might I notescort her to this place? And then, as a secondthought, why should she come atall? I was IsaWhitney's medical adviser, and as such I had influence over him.I could manageit better if I were alone. I promised her on myword that I would send him homein a cab withintwo hours if hewere indeed at the address whichshe had given me. And so in tenminutes I had left my armchairand cheery sitting-room behind me, and was speeding eastward ina hansom on a strange errand, asit seemed to meat the time, though the futureonly could showhow strange it was to be.

But there was no great difficulty inthe first stageof my adventure.Upper Swandam Lane is a vile alley lurking behind the high wharves which line the north side ofthe river to the east of LondonBridge. Betweena slop-shop anda gin-shop, approached by a steep flight of steps leading downto a black gap like the mouth ofa cave, I foundthe den of which I was in search. Ordering my cab to wait, I passed down the steps, worn hollowin the centre by the ceaselesstread of drunkenfeet; and by the light of a flickering oil-lampabove the doorI found the latch and made my way into a long, low room, thick and heavy with the brown opium smoke, and terraced with wooden berths, like the forecastle of anemigrant ship.Through the gloom one could dimly catch a glimpse of bodies lying in strange fantastic poses, bowed shoulders, bent knees, headsthrown back, and chins pointingupward, with here and there a dark, lack-lustreeye turned uponthe newcomer. Out of the blackshadows there glimmered little red circles of light, now bright,now faint, as the burning poison waxed or wanedin the bowls ofthe metal pipes. The most lay silent, but somemuttered to themselves, and others talked together in a strange,low, monotonousvoice, their conversation coming in gushes, andthen suddenly tailing off intosilence, each mumbling out his own thoughts andpaying little heed to the wordsof his neighbour. At the fartherend was a smallbrazier of burning charcoal, beside which on athree-legged wooden stool theresat a tall, thinold man, with his jaw resting upon his two fists, and his elbows upon his knees, staring into the fire.

As I entered, a sallowMalay attendanthad hurried upwith a pipe forme and a supplyof the drug, beckoning me to anempty berth.

"Thank you. I havenot come to stay," said I. "There is a friend of mine here, Mr.Isa Whitney, and I wish to speak with him."

There was a movement and an exclamation from my right, and peeringthrough the gloom, I saw Whitney, pale, haggard, and unkempt, staring out at me.

"My God! It'sWatson," said he. He was in a pitiable state ofreaction, withevery nerve in atwitter. "I say, Watson, what o'clock is it?""Nearly eleven.""Of what day?""Of Friday, June 19th."

"Goodheavens! I thought it was Wednesday. It is Wednesday. What d'you want to frighten a chap for?"He sank his faceonto his arms and began to sobin a high treblekey.

"I tell you that it is Friday, man. Yourwife has been waiting this two days for you. Youshould be ashamed of yourself!""So I am. Butyou've got mixed, Watson, for Ihave only been here a few hours,three pipes, four pipes--I forget how many. ButI'll go home with you. I wouldn't frighten Kate--poor little Kate. Give me yourhand! Have youa cab?"

"Yes, Ihave one waiting."

"Then I shall go in it. ButI must owe something. Find whatI owe, Watson.I am all off colour. I can do nothing for myself."

I walked down the narrow passage between thedouble row of sleepers, holdingmy breath to keep out the vile,stupefying fumes of the drug, and looking aboutfor the manager. As I passed the tall man who sat by the brazier I felt a sudden pluck at my skirt, and a low voice whispered,"Walk past me, and then look back at me." The words fell quite distinctly upon my ear. I glanceddown. They could only have comefrom the old man at my side, and yet he sat nowas absorbed asever, very thin,very wrinkled,bent with age, an opium pipe dangling down frombetween his knees, as though ithad dropped in sheer lassitude from his fingers.I took two steps forward and looked back. It took all my self-control to prevent me from breaking out into a cry of astonishment. He had turnedhis back so that none could seehim but I. Hisform had filledout, his wrinkles were gone, thedull eyes had regained their fire, and there, sitting by the fire and grinningat my surprise,was none other than Sherlock Holmes. He made a slight motion tome to approach him, and instantly, as he turnedhis face half round to the company once more, subsided into a doddering, loose-lipped senility."Holmes!" I whispered, "what onearth are you doing in this den?"

"As low as you can," he answered; "I have excellent ears. Ifyou would havethe great kindness to get rid ofthat sottish friend of yours Ishould be exceedingly glad to have a little talkwith you."

"Ihave a cab outside."

"Then praysend him home in it. You may safely trust him,for he appears to be too limp toget into any mischief. I shouldrecommend you also to send a note by the cabmanto your wife tosay that you have thrown in your lot with me. If you will waitoutside, I shallbe with you infive minutes."It was difficultto refuse any of Sherlock Holmes' requests, forthey were always so exceedinglydefinite, and put forward withsuch a quiet airof mastery. I felt, however, that when Whitneywas once confined in the cab mymission was practically accomplished; and for the rest, I couldnot wish anything better than tobe associated with my friend inone of those singular adventures which were thenormal condition of his existence. In a few minutes I had written my note, paidWhitney's bill,led him out tothe cab, and seen him driven through the darkness. In a very short time a decrepit figure had emerged from the opium den, and Iwas walking downthe street withSherlock Holmes. For two streets he shuffled along with a bentback and an uncertain foot. Then, glancing quickly round, he straightened himself out and burstinto a hearty fit of laughter."I suppose, Watson," said he, "that you imaginethat I have added opium-smokingto cocaine injections, and all the other littleweaknesses on which you have favoured me with your medical views."

"I was certainly surprised to find you there."

"But not more so than I to find you."

"I came to find a friend."

"And I tofind an enemy.""An enemy?"

"Yes; one of my natural enemies,or, shall I say,my natural prey. Briefly, Watson, I am in the midst of a very remarkable inquiry, and I have hoped to find a clue in the incoherent ramblings of these sots, asI have done before now. Had I been recognised in that den my life would not have been worth anhour's purchase;for I have usedit before now for my own purposes, and the rascally Lascar whoruns it has sworn to have vengeance upon me. There is a trap-door at the back ofthat building,near the cornerof Paul's Wharf,which could tell some strange tales of what haspassed throughit upon the moonless nights."

"What! You do notmean bodies?""Ay, bodies, Watson. We should be rich men if wehad $1000 for every poor devilwho has been done to death in that den. It is the vilest murder-trap on the whole riverside, andI fear that Neville St. Clair has entered it never to leave itmore. But our trap should be here." He put his two forefingers between his teethand whistled shrilly--a signalwhich was answered by a similarwhistle from thedistance, followed shortly by the rattle of wheels and the clink of horses' hoofs.

"Now, Watson," said Holmes,as a tall dog-cart dashed up through the gloom,throwing out two golden tunnelsof yellow lightfrom its side lanterns. "You'llcome with me, won't you?"

"IfI can be of use."

"Oh, a trustycomrade is always of use; and achronicler still more so. My room at The Cedarsis a double-bedded one."

"TheCedars?"

"Yes;that is Mr. St.Clair's house. Iam staying there while I conduct the inquiry.""Where is it, then?"

"Near Lee, in Kent. We have a seven-miledrive before us."

"But I am allin the dark.""Of course you are. You'll knowall about it presently. Jump uphere. All right,John; we shallnot need you. Here's half a crown. Look out forme to-morrow, about eleven. Giveher her head. So long, then!"He flicked the horse with his whip, and we dashed away through the endless succession of sombreand deserted streets, which widened gradually, until we were flying across a broad balustraded bridge, with themurky river flowing sluggishly beneath us. Beyond lay another dull wilderness ofbricks and mortar, its silencebroken only by the heavy, regular footfall of the policeman, orthe songs and shouts of some belated party of revellers. A dullwrack was drifting slowly acrossthe sky, and astar or two twinkled dimly hereand there through the rifts of the clouds. Holmes drove in silence, with his head sunk upon hisbreast, and theair of a man whois lost in thought, while I satbeside him, curious to learn what this new quest might be whichseemed to tax his powers so sorely, and yet afraid to break inupon the currentof his thoughts. We had drivenseveral miles, and were beginning to get to thefringe of the belt of suburban villas, when he shook himself, shrugged his shoulders, and lit uphis pipe with the air of a manwho has satisfied himself that he is acting forthe best.

"Youhave a grand gift of silence, Watson," said he."It makes you quite invaluable as a companion. 'Pon my word, itis a great thingfor me to havesomeone to talkto, for my own thoughts are notover-pleasant. Iwas wondering what I should sayto this dear little woman to-night when she meets me at the door."

"You forgetthat I know nothing about it.""I shall just have time to tellyou the facts of the case before we get to Lee.It seems absurdly simple, and yet, somehow I can get nothing togo upon. There's plenty of thread, no doubt, but I can't get the end of it intomy hand. Now, I'll state the case clearly and concisely to you,Watson, and maybe you can see aspark where allis dark to me.""Proceed, then."

"Some yearsago--to be definite, in May, 1884--there came toLee a gentleman, Neville St. Clair by name, whoappeared to have plenty of money. He took a large villa, laid out the grounds very nicely, andlived generallyin good style. By degrees he made friends in theneighbourhood,and in 1887 he married the daughter of a local brewer, by whom he now has two children. He had no occupation, but was interestedin several companies and went into town as a rule in the morning, returning bythe 5:14 from Cannon Street every night. Mr. St.Clair is now thirty-seven yearsof age, is a man of temperate habits, a good husband, a very affectionate father, and a man whois popular withall who know him. I may add that his whole debts at the presentmoment, as faras we have beenable to ascertain, amount to $8810s., while hehas $220 standing to his creditin the Capital and Counties Bank. There is no reason, therefore,to think that money troubles have been weighingupon his mind."Last Monday Mr. Neville St. Clair went into town rather earlier than usual, remarking before he started that he had two important commissionsto perform, andthat he would bring his little boy home a box ofbricks. Now, bythe merest chance, his wife received a telegramupon this sameMonday, very shortly after his departure, to theeffect that a small parcel of considerable value which she hadbeen expecting was waiting for her at the offices of the Aberdeen Shipping Company. Now, if youare well up in your London, youwill know that the office of thecompany is in Fresno Street, which branches outof Upper Swandam Lane, where you found me to-night. Mrs. St. Clair had her lunch, started for the City, did some shopping, proceeded to the company's office, got her packet, and found herselfat exactly 4:35walking throughSwandam Lane onher way back tothe station. Have you followedme so far?"

"Itis very clear.""If you remember, Monday was an exceedingly hot day, and Mrs.St. Clair walkedslowly, glancing about in the hope of seeing acab, as she didnot like the neighbourhood in which she found herself. While shewas walking inthis way down Swandam Lane, shesuddenly heard an ejaculation orcry, and was struck cold to seeher husband looking down at herand, as it seemed to her, beckoning to her froma second-floorwindow. The window was open, andshe distinctlysaw his face, which she describes as being terribly agitated. Hewaved his handsfrantically toher, and then vanished from thewindow so suddenly that it seemed to her that hehad been plucked back by some irresistible force from behind. One singular point which struck her quick feminine eye was that although he woresome dark coat,such as he had started to town in, he had on neither collar nornecktie.

"Convinced that something was amiss with him, she rushed down the steps--for the housewas none otherthan the opium den in which youfound me to-night--and running through the frontroom she attempted to ascend the stairs which led to the firstfloor. At the foot of the stairs, however, she met this Lascar scoundrel of whomI have spoken,who thrust her back and, aided by a Dane, who acts as assistantthere, pushed her out into the street. Filled with the most maddening doubts andfears, she rushed down the laneand, by rare good-fortune, metin Fresno Streeta number of constables with aninspector, all on their way to their beat. The inspector and twomen accompaniedher back, and in spite of the continued resistance of the proprietor, they madetheir way to the room in whichMr. St. Clair had last been seen. There was no sign of him there. In fact, in the whole of thatfloor there wasno one to be found save a crippled wretch of hideous aspect, who, it seems, madehis home there.Both he and theLascar stoutlyswore that no one else had beenin the front room during the afternoon. So determined was theirdenial that theinspector was staggered, and hadalmost come tobelieve that Mrs. St. Clair hadbeen deluded when, with a cry, she sprang at a small deal box which lay upon thetable and torethe lid from it.Out there fella cascade of children's bricks.It was the toy which he had promised to bring home.

"This discovery, and the evident confusionwhich the cripple showed, made the inspector realise that the matter was serious. The rooms werecarefully examined, and resultsall pointed toan abominable crime. The front room was plainlyfurnished as a sitting-room andled into a smallbedroom, whichlooked out uponthe back of oneof the wharves.Between the wharf and the bedroom window is a narrow strip, which is dry at lowtide but is covered at high tidewith at least four and a half feet of water. The bedroom windowwas a broad oneand opened frombelow. On examination traces ofblood were to be seen upon thewindowsill, andseveral scattered drops were visible upon the wooden floor of the bedroom. Thrust away behind acurtain in the front room were all the clothes of Mr. Neville St. Clair, with the exception of his coat. His boots, his socks, his hat, and hiswatch--all werethere. There were no signs of violence upon anyof these garments, and there were no other traces of Mr. NevilleSt. Clair. Outof the window hemust apparentlyhave gone for no other exit could be discovered, and the ominous bloodstains upon the sill gavelittle promisethat he could save himself by swimming, for thetide was at itsvery highest atthe moment of the tragedy.

"Andnow as to the villains who seemed to be immediately implicatedin the matter. The Lascar was known to be a manof the vilest antecedents, but as, by Mrs. St. Clair's story, hewas known to have been at the foot of the stairwithin a very few seconds of her husband's appearance at the window, he could hardly have beenmore than an accessory to the crime. His defencewas one of absolute ignorance,and he protestedthat he had noknowledge as tothe doings of Hugh Boone, his lodger, and that he could not account in any way for the presenceof the missing gentleman's clothes.

"So much for the Lascar manager. Now for the sinister cripple who lives upon the second floor of the opiumden, and who wascertainly the last human beingwhose eyes rested upon Neville St. Clair. His name is Hugh Boone, and his hideous face is one which is familiarto every man whogoes much to the City. He is aprofessional beggar, though in order to avoid the police regulations he pretendsto a small trade in wax vestas.Some little distance down Threadneedle Street,upon the left-hand side, there is, as you may have remarked, a small angle in the wall. Here itis that this creature takes hisdaily seat, cross-legged with his tiny stock ofmatches on his lap, and as he isa piteous spectacle a small rain of charity descends into the greasy leather cap which lies upon the pavement beside him. I have watched the fellow more than once before everI thought of making his professional acquaintance, and I have been surprised atthe harvest which he has reapedin a short time.His appearance,you see, is soremarkable thatno one can passhim without observing him. A shock of orange hair, a pale face disfigured by a horrible scar, which, by its contraction, has turned up the outeredge of his upper lip, a bulldog chin, and a pair of very penetrating dark eyes, which presenta singular contrast to the colour of his hair, all mark him outfrom amid the common crowd of mendicants and so,too, does his wit, for he is ever ready with areply to any piece of chaff which may be thrownat him by the passers-by. This is the man whom we now learn to have been the lodger at the opiumden, and to have been the lastman to see the gentleman of whomwe are in quest."

"But a cripple!" said I. "What could he havedone single-handed against a man in the prime of life?"

"He isa cripple in the sense that hewalks with a limp; but in otherrespects he appears to be a powerful and well-nurtured man. Surely your medicalexperience wouldtell you, Watson, that weaknessin one limb isoften compensated for by exceptional strength inthe others."

"Pray continue your narrative.""Mrs. St. Clairhad fainted at the sight of theblood upon the window, and she was escorted homein a cab by thepolice, as herpresence could be of no help tothem in their investigations. Inspector Barton,who had charge of the case, madea very carefulexamination of the premises, butwithout findinganything whichthrew any lightupon the matter.One mistake hadbeen made in not arresting Boone instantly, ashe was allowed some few minutesduring which hemight have communicated with hisfriend the Lascar, but this fault was soon remedied, and he wasseized and searched, without anything being found which could incriminate him.There were, it is true, some blood-stains upon his right shirt-sleeve, but he pointed to his ring-finger, whichhad been cut near the nail, andexplained that the bleeding camefrom there, adding that he hadbeen to the window not long before, and that thestains which had been observedthere came doubtless from the same source. He denied strenuouslyhaving ever seen Mr. Neville St. Clair and swore that the presence of the clothes in his room was as much a mystery to him as to the police. Asto Mrs. St. Clair's assertion that she had actually seen her husband at the window, he declaredthat she must have been eithermad or dreaming.He was removed,loudly protesting, to the police-station, whilethe inspector remained upon thepremises in thehope that the ebbing tide mightafford some fresh clue.

"And it did, though they hardly foundupon the mud-bank what they hadfeared to find.It was Neville St. Clair's coat,and not NevilleSt. Clair, which lay uncoveredas the tide receded. And what doyou think theyfound in the pockets?"

"I cannot imagine."

"No, I don't thinkyou would guess.Every pocket stuffed with pennies and half-pennies--421 penniesand 270 half-pennies. It was nowonder that ithad not been swept away by the tide. But a humanbody is a different matter. There is a fierce eddy between thewharf and the house. It seemed likely enough that the weighted coat had remainedwhen the stripped body had beensucked away into the river."

"But I understandthat all the other clothes werefound in the room. Would the body be dressed ina coat alone?""No, sir, but the facts might be met speciouslyenough. Supposethat this man Boone had thrustNeville St. Clair through the window, there is no human eye which could have seen the deed. Whatwould he do then? It would of course instantlystrike him thathe must get ridof the tell-talegarments. He would seize the coat, then, and bein the act of throwing it out,when it would occur to him thatit would swim and not sink. He has little time,for he has heardthe scuffle downstairs when thewife tried to force her way up,and perhaps hehas already heard from his Lascar confederate that the police are hurrying up the street. Thereis not an instant to be lost. Herushes to somesecret hoard, where he has accumulated the fruits of his beggary, and he stuffsall the coins upon which he canlay his hands into the pockets to make sure of the coat's sinking. He throws itout, and would have done the same with the othergarments had not he heard the rush of steps below, and only just had time to close the window when the police appeared."

"It certainly soundsfeasible."

"Well, we will takeit as a workinghypothesis for want of a better.Boone, as I have told you, wasarrested and taken to the station, but it couldnot be shown that there had everbefore been anything against him. He had for years been known as a professionalbeggar, but hislife appeared to have been a very quiet and innocent one. Therethe matter stands at present, and the questionswhich have to be solved--what Neville St. Clairwas doing in the opium den, what happened to him when there, where is he now, and what Hugh Boone had to do with his disappearance--are all asfar from a solution as ever. I confess that I cannot recall anycase within my experience whichlooked at the first glance so simple and yet which presented such difficulties."While SherlockHolmes had beendetailing thissingular seriesof events, we had been whirlingthrough the outskirts of the great town until the last straggling houses had been left behind, and we rattled along with a country hedge upon either side of us.Just as he finished, however, we drove throughtwo scattered villages, where afew lights stillglimmered in the windows.

"Weare on the outskirts of Lee," said my companion."We have touched on three English counties in our short drive,starting in Middlesex, passing over an angle ofSurrey, and ending in Kent. Seethat light amongthe trees? Thatis The Cedars,and beside thatlamp sits a woman whose anxiousears have already, I have littledoubt, caught the clink of ourhorse's feet.""But why are younot conductingthe case from Baker Street?" I asked.

"Becausethere are many inquiries which must be made outhere. Mrs. St. Clair has most kindly put two rooms at my disposal, and you may rest assured thatshe will have nothing but a welcome for my friend and colleague. I hate to meether, Watson, when I have no news of her husband. Here we are. Whoa, there, whoa!"

We had pulled up in front ofa large villa which stood within its own grounds. A stable-boyhad run out to the horse's head,and springing down, I followedHolmes up the small, winding gravel-drive whichled to the house. As we approached, the door flew open, and a little blonde woman stood in the opening, clad insome sort of light mousseline desoie, with a touch of fluffy pink chiffon at her neck and wrists. She stood with her figure outlined against the flood of light, one hand uponthe door, one half-raised in hereagerness, herbody slightly bent, her head andface protruded,with eager eyesand parted lips, a standing question.

"Well?"she cried, "well?" And then, seeing that there were two of us, she gave a cry ofhope which sankinto a groan asshe saw that mycompanion shookhis head and shrugged his shoulders.

"No goodnews?"

"None.""No bad?"

"No."

"Thank God for that. But comein. You must beweary, for youhave had a longday."

"This ismy friend, Dr. Watson. He has been of most vitaluse to me in several of my cases, and a lucky chance has made it possible for me to bring him out and associatehim with this investigation.""I am delightedto see you," said she, pressingmy hand warmly."You will, I amsure, forgive anything that maybe wanting in our arrangements,when you consider the blow whichhas come so suddenly upon us.""My dear madam," said I, "I aman old campaigner, and if I werenot I can verywell see that noapology is needed. If I can beof any assistance, either to youor to my friendhere, I shall be indeed happy.""Now, Mr. Sherlock Holmes," said the lady as we entered a well-lit dining-room, upon the tableof which a coldsupper had beenlaid out, "I should very much like to ask you one or two plainquestions, to which I beg that you will give a plain answer."

"Certainly, madam."

"Do not trouble about my feelings. I am nothysterical, norgiven to fainting. I simply wishto hear your real, real opinion."

"Upon what point?"

"In yourheart of hearts, do you think that Neville is alive?"

SherlockHolmes seemed to be embarrassedby the question. "Frankly, now!" she repeated,standing upon the rug and looking keenly down athim as he leaned back in a basket-chair.

"Frankly, then, madam, I do not."

"You think that heis dead?"

"I do."

"Murdered?""I don't say that. Perhaps.""And on what daydid he meet hisdeath?"

"On Monday."

"Then perhaps, Mr. Holmes, you will be good enough to explain how it isthat I have received a letter from him to-day."Sherlock Holmessprang out of his chair as if he had been galvanised.

"What!"he roared.

"Yes, to-day." She stood smiling, holding up a little slip of paperin the air.

"May I see it?"

"Certainly."

He snatched it fromher in his eagerness, and smoothing it out uponthe table he drew over the lampand examined itintently. I hadleft my chair and was gazing atit over his shoulder. The envelope was a very coarse one and wasstamped with the Gravesend postmark and with the date of that very day, or rather of the day before, for it wasconsiderably after midnight.

"Coarse writing,"murmured Holmes. "Surely this is not your husband's writing, madam."

"No, butthe enclosure is."

"I perceivealso that whoever addressed theenvelope had togo and inquire as to the address."

"How can youtell that?"

"The name, you see, is in perfectly black ink, which has dried itself. The rest isof the greyishcolour, which shows that blotting-paper has beenused. If it hadbeen written straight off, andthen blotted, none would be of adeep black shade. This man haswritten the name, and there hasthen been a pause before he wrote the address, which can only mean that he was not familiar withit. It is, of course, a trifle,but there is nothing so important as trifles. Let us now see the letter. Ha! there has been anenclosure here!""Yes, there was a ring. His signet-ring."

"And you are sure that this is yourhusband's hand?"

"One of his hands."

"One?""His hand when he wrote hurriedly. It is very unlike his usual writing, and yetI know it well."" 'Dearest donot be frightened. All will comewell. There isa huge error which it may take some little timeto rectify. Waitin patience.--NEVILLE.' Writtenin pencil uponthe fly-leaf ofa book, octavo size, no water-mark. Hum! Postedto-day in Gravesend by a man with a dirty thumb.Ha! And the flap has been gummed, if I am not very much in error, by a person who had been chewing tobacco. Andyou have no doubt that it is your husband's hand, madam?"

"None. Neville wrotethose words.""And they were posted to-day atGravesend. Well,Mrs. St. Clair,the clouds lighten, though I should not ventureto say that thedanger is over."

"But he mustbe alive, Mr. Holmes."

"Unlessthis is a cleverforgery to putus on the wrongscent. The ring,after all, proves nothing. It may have been taken from him."

"No, no; it is, it is his very own writing!"

"Very well. It may,however, have been written on Monday and only posted to-day.""That is possible."

"If so, much may have happened between."

"Oh, you must notdiscourage me,Mr. Holmes. I know that all is well with him. There is so keen asympathy between us that I should know if evilcame upon him. On the very day that I saw him last he cut himself in the bedroom, and yet I in the dining-room rushed upstairs instantly with the utmost certainty that something had happened.Do you think that I would respond to such a trifle and yet be ignorant of his death?"

"I have seen too much notto know that the impression ofa woman may be more valuable than the conclusionof an analytical reasoner. Andin this letter you certainly have a very strongpiece of evidence to corroborateyour view. Butif your husbandis alive and able to write letters, why should he remain away from you?"

"I cannot imagine. Itis unthinkable.""And on Mondayhe made no remarks before leaving you?"

"No.""And you were surprised to seehim in Swandam Lane?"

"Very much so."

"Was thewindow open?""Yes."

"Then hemight have called to you?"

"Hemight."

"He only, as I understand, gave an inarticulate cry?""Yes."

"A callfor help, you thought?"

"Yes.He waved his hands."

"But it might have been acry of surprise.Astonishment atthe unexpectedsight of you might cause him tothrow up his hands?"

"It is possible."

"And you thought he waspulled back?""He disappearedso suddenly."

"He might have leaped back. You did not see anyone else in the room?"

"No, but this horrible manconfessed to having been there,and the Lascarwas at the footof the stairs.""Quite so. Yourhusband, as faras you could see, had his ordinary clothes on?""But without his collar or tie. I distinctly saw his bare throat."

"Had he ever spoken of Swandam Lane?"

"Never."

"Had he ever showed any signs of having taken opium?"

"Never."

"Thank you, Mrs. St. Clair. Those are the principal points about which Iwished to be absolutely clear.We shall now have a little supper and then retire, for we may have a very busy day to-morrow."A large and comfortable double-bedded room had been placed at our disposal, andI was quickly between the sheets, for I was weary after my nightof adventure. Sherlock Holmes was a man, however, who, when hehad an unsolvedproblem upon hismind, would gofor days, and even for a week, without rest, turning it over, rearranging his facts, looking atit from every point of view until he had eitherfathomed it or convinced himselfthat his data were insufficient. It was soon evident to me thathe was now preparing for an all-night sitting.He took off hiscoat and waistcoat, put on a large blue dressing-gown, and thenwandered about the room collecting pillows fromhis bed and cushions from the sofa and armchairs. With these heconstructed a sort of Eastern divan, upon whichhe perched himself cross-legged,with an ounce of shag tobacco and a box of matches laid out infront of him. Inthe dim light of the lamp I sawhim sitting there, an old briarpipe between his lips, his eyesfixed vacantlyupon the cornerof the ceiling,the blue smoke curling up from him, silent, motionless, with thelight shining upon his strong-set aquiline features. So he satas I dropped offto sleep, and so he sat when asudden ejaculation caused me towake up, and I found the summersun shining intothe apartment.The pipe was still between his lips, the smoke still curled upward, and the roomwas full of a dense tobacco haze, but nothing remained of the heap of shag which I had seen upon the previous night.

"Awake, Watson?" he asked.

"Yes."

"Gamefor a morning drive?"

"Certainly."

"Then dress. No one is stirring yet, but Iknow where thestable-boy sleeps, and we shallsoon have the trap out." He chuckled to himselfas he spoke, hiseyes twinkled,and he seemed adifferent man tothe sombre thinker of the previous night.

As Idressed I glanced at my watch.It was no wonderthat no one wasstirring. It was twenty-five minutes past four.I had hardly finished when Holmes returned withthe news that the boy was putting in the horse."I want to test a little theory of mine," saidhe, pulling onhis boots. "I think, Watson, that you are now standing in the presence of one ofthe most absolute fools in Europe. I deserve tobe kicked fromhere to CharingCross. But I think I have the key of the affairnow."

"And where is it?" I asked, smiling.

"Inthe bathroom,"he answered. "Oh, yes, I am notjoking," he continued, seeing mylook of incredulity. "I have just been there, and I have takenit out, and I have got it in this Gladstone bag.Come on, my boy, and we shall see whether it will not fit the lock."

We made our way downstairs as quietly aspossible, and out into the bright morning sunshine. In the roadstood our horseand trap, with the half-clad stable-boy waitingat the head. Weboth sprang in,and away we dashed down the London Road. A few country carts were stirring, bearing in vegetables to the metropolis, but the lines of villas oneither side wereas silent and lifeless as somecity in a dream."It has been in some points asingular case,"said Holmes, flicking the horseon into a gallop. "I confess that I have been asblind as a mole, but it is better to learn wisdom late than never to learn it at all."

In townthe earliest risers were just beginning to looksleepily from their windows aswe drove throughthe streets ofthe Surrey side.Passing down the Waterloo Bridge Road we crossed over the river, and dashing upWellington Street wheeled sharply to the rightand found ourselves in Bow Street. Sherlock Holmes was well known to the force,and the two constables at the door saluted him.One of them heldthe horse's head while the other led us in.

"Who is on duty?"asked Holmes.

"Inspector Bradstreet, sir."

"Ah, Bradstreet, how are you?" A tall, stout official had come downthe stone-flagged passage, in apeaked cap andfrogged jacket."I wish to havea quiet word with you, Bradstreet." "Certainly,Mr. Holmes. Stepinto my room here." It was a small, office-likeroom, with a huge ledger upon the table, and atelephone projecting from the wall. The inspector sat down at his desk.

"What can I do for you,Mr. Holmes?"

"I called about that beggarman, Boone--the one who was charged with being concerned in the disappearance of Mr. Neville St. Clair, of Lee."

"Yes. He was broughtup and remandedfor further inquiries."

"So Iheard. You havehim here?"

"Inthe cells."

"Ishe quiet?"

"Oh, he gives no trouble. But he isa dirty scoundrel."

"Dirty?""Yes, it is allwe can do to make him wash his hands, and his face is as black as a tinker's. Well, when once his case has beensettled, he willhave a regularprison bath; andI think, if yousaw him, you would agree with me that he neededit."

"I shouldlike to see himvery much."

"Would you? That is easily done. Come this way. You can leave yourbag."

"No, I think that I'll take it."

"Verygood. Come thisway, if you please." He led us down a passage, opened a barred door, passed downa winding stair, and brought usto a whitewashed corridor witha line of doorson each side.

"The third on theright is his,"said the inspector. "Here it is!" He quietly shot back a panel in the upper partof the door andglanced through.

"He is asleep," said he. "Youcan see him very well."

We both put our eyes to the grating. The prisoner laywith his face towards us, in a very deep sleep,breathing slowlyand heavily. Hewas a middle-sized man, coarsely clad as becamehis calling, with a coloured shirt protruding through the rentin his tatteredcoat. He was, asthe inspector had said, extremely dirty, but the grime which covered his face could not concealits repulsive ugliness. A broadwheal from an old scar ran right across it fromeye to chin, and by its contraction had turnedup one side of the upper lip, sothat three teeth were exposed in a perpetual snarl. A shock ofvery bright redhair grew low over his eyes andforehead.

"He'sa beauty, isn'the?" said the inspector.

"He certainly needs awash," remarkedHolmes. "I hadan idea that hemight, and I took the liberty ofbringing the tools with me." Heopened the Gladstone bag as hespoke, and tookout, to my astonishment, a verylarge bath-sponge.

"He! he! Youare a funny one," chuckled theinspector.

"Now, if you will have the great goodness to open that door very quietly, we will soon make him cuta much more respectable figure.""Well, I don'tknow why not,"said the inspector. "He doesn'tlook a credit tothe Bow Streetcells, does he?"He slipped hiskey into the lock, and we all very quietly entered the cell. Thesleeper half turned, and then settled down oncemore into a deep slumber. Holmes stooped to thewater-jug, moistened his sponge, and then rubbed it twice vigorously across anddown the prisoner's face.

"Letme introduce you," he shouted,"to Mr. NevilleSt. Clair, of Lee, in the countyof Kent."

Never in my life have I seen such asight. The man'sface peeled offunder the sponge like the barkfrom a tree. Gone was the coarsebrown tint! Gone, too, was thehorrid scar which had seamed itacross, and thetwisted lip which had given therepulsive sneerto the face! A twitch brought away the tangled red hair, and there, sitting up in his bed, was apale, sad-faced, refined-looking man, black-haired and smooth-skinned, rubbinghis eyes and staring about him with sleepy bewilderment. Then suddenly realisingthe exposure, he broke into a scream and threwhimself down with his face to the pillow.

"Great heavens!" cried the inspector,"it is, indeed,the missing man. I know him from the photograph."

The prisonerturned with thereckless air ofa man who abandons himself to his destiny. "Beit so," said he."And pray whatam I charged with?"

"With making away with Mr.Neville St.-- Oh, come, you can't be charged with that unless they make a case of attempted suicide of it," saidthe inspector with a grin. "Well, I have been twenty-seven years in the force,but this reallytakes the cake.""If I am Mr. Neville St. Clair, then it is obvious that no crime has been committed, and that,therefore, I amillegally detained."

"No crime, but a very great error has been committed," said Holmes. "Youwould have donebetter to have trusted you wife."

"It was not the wife; it wasthe children," groaned the prisoner. "God help me, I would not have them ashamedof their father. My God! What an exposure! Whatcan I do?"

Sherlock Holmes satdown beside himon the couch and patted him kindly on the shoulder.

"If you leave it to a court of law to clear the matter up," said he, "of course you can hardly avoid publicity. On the other hand, if youconvince the police authoritiesthat there is nopossible case against you, I donot know that there is any reason that the details should findtheir way into the papers. Inspector Bradstreetwould, I am sure, make notes upon anything whichyou might tellus and submit itto the proper authorities. Thecase would thennever go into court at all."

"God bless you!" cried the prisoner passionately."I would have endured imprisonment, ay, even execution, rather than have left mymiserable secret as a family blot to my children.

"You are thefirst who haveever heard my story. My father was a schoolmaster in Chesterfield, where I received an excellenteducation. I travelled in my youth, took to thestage, and finally became a reporter on an evening paper in London. One day myeditor wished tohave a series of articles uponbegging in the metropolis, and Ivolunteered tosupply them. There was the pointfrom which allmy adventures started. It was only by trying begging as an amateur that I couldget the facts upon which to basemy articles. When an actor I had, of course, learned all the secrets of makingup, and had beenfamous in the green-room for myskill. I took advantage now ofmy attainments.I painted my face, and to make myself as pitiable as possible Imade a good scarand fixed one side of my lip ina twist by theaid of a small slip of flesh-coloured plaster. Then with a red head of hair, andan appropriatedress, I took mystation in thebusiness part ofthe city, ostensibly as a match-seller but really as a beggar.For seven hoursI plied my trade, and when I returned home in the evening I found to my surprisethat I had received no less than 26s. 4d.

"I wrote my articlesand thought little more of thematter until, some time later, Ibacked a bill for a friend andhad a writ served upon me for $25. I was at my wit's end where to get the money,but a sudden idea came to me. Ibegged a fortnight's grace fromthe creditor, asked for a holiday from my employers, and spentthe time in begging in the Cityunder my disguise. In ten days Ihad the money and had paid thedebt.

"Well, you can imagine how hard it was tosettle down toarduous work at$2 a week when Iknew that I could earn as muchin a day by smearing my face with a little paint, laying my capon the ground, and sitting still. It was a longfight between mypride and the money, but the dollars won at last, and I threw up reporting andsat day after day in the cornerwhich I had first chosen, inspiring pity by my ghastly face andfilling my pockets with coppers.Only one man knew my secret. Hewas the keeperof a low den inwhich I used tolodge in SwandamLane, where I could every morning emerge as a squalid beggar and in the evenings transform myself into a well-dressed man abouttown. This fellow, a Lascar, was well paid by me for his rooms,so that I knewthat my secret was safe in his possession.

"Well, very soon I found that I wassaving considerable sums of money. I do not meanthat any beggarin the streetsof London couldearn $700 a year--which is lessthan my averagetakings--but I had exceptional advantages in mypower of makingup, and also ina facility of repartee, which improved by practice and made me quite a recognised character in the City. All daya stream of pennies, varied bysilver, poured in upon me, and it was a very badday in which Ifailed to take $2.

"As I grew richer I grew more ambitious, took a house in thecountry, and eventually married, without anyonehaving a suspicion as to my real occupation. Mydear wife knewthat I had business in the City.She little knewwhat.

"Last Monday I had finished for the dayand was dressingin my room above the opium denwhen I looked out of my window and saw, to my horror and astonishment, that my wife was standingin the street,with her eyes fixed full upon me. I gave a cry of surprise, threw up my arms tocover my face, and, rushing to my confidant, theLascar, entreated him to prevent anyone from coming up to me. Iheard her voicedownstairs, butI knew that shecould not ascend. Swiftly I threw off my clothes, pulled on those of a beggar,and put on my pigments and wig.Even a wife's eyes could not pierce so completea disguise. Butthen it occurredto me that there might be a search in the room,and that the clothes might betray me. I threw open the window,reopening by myviolence a smallcut which I hadinflicted uponmyself in the bedroom that morning. Then I seized my coat, whichwas weighted bythe coppers which I had just transferred to itfrom the leatherbag in which Icarried my takings. I hurled itout of the window, and it disappeared into the Thames. The otherclothes would have followed, but at that momentthere was a rush of constablesup the stair, and a few minutesafter I found, rather, I confess, to my relief,that instead ofbeing identifiedas Mr. NevilleSt. Clair, I wasarrested as hismurderer.

"I do not know thatthere is anything else for me toexplain. I wasdetermined to preserve my disguise as long as possible, and hence my preferencefor a dirty face. Knowing that my wife would beterribly anxious, I slipped offmy ring and confided it to the Lascar at a moment when no constable was watchingme, together with a hurried scrawl, telling herthat she had nocause to fear.""That note only reached her yesterday," said Holmes.

"Good God! What a week she must have spent!"

"The police have watched this Lascar," said Inspector Bradstreet, "and I can quite understand that he might find it difficult to post a letter unobserved.Probably he handed it to some sailor customer of his, who forgot all about it for some days.""That was it," said Holmes, nodding approvingly;"I have no doubt of it. But have you never beenprosecuted forbegging?"

"Manytimes; but whatwas a fine to me?"

"It must stop here, however," said Bradstreet. "If the police are to hush this thing up, there must be no more of Hugh Boone."

"I have sworn it by the most solemn oaths which a man can take."

"In thatcase I think that it is probablethat no furthersteps may be taken. But if youare found again,then all must come out. I am sure, Mr. Holmes,that we are verymuch indebted to you for havingcleared the matter up. I wish Iknew how you reach your results."

"I reached this one," said my friend, "by sitting upon fivepillows and consuming an ounce of shag. I think,Watson, that ifwe drive to Baker Street we shall just be in time for breakfast."

VII.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE BLUE CARBUNCLEI had called upon my friend Sherlock Holmes uponthe second morning after Christmas, with the intention of wishing him the compliments of the season. He was lounging upon the sofa in a purpledressing-gown, apipe-rack within his reach uponthe right, anda pile of crumpled morning papers, evidently newly studied, nearat hand. Besidethe couch was awooden chair, and on the angleof the back hunga very seedy and disreputable hard-felt hat, much the worse forwear, and cracked in several places. A lens anda forceps lyingupon the seat of the chair suggested that the hat had been suspended in this manner for the purpose of examination.

"You are engaged," said I;"perhaps I interrupt you."

"Not at all. I am glad to have a friend with whom Ican discuss myresults. The matter is a perfectly trivial one"--he jerked his thumb in the direction of the oldhat--"but thereare points in connection with it which are notentirely devoidof interest andeven of instruction."

I seatedmyself in his armchair and warmed my hands before his cracklingfire, for a sharp frost had setin, and the windows were thick with the ice crystals. "I suppose," I remarked, "that, homely asit looks, this thing has some deadly story linked on to it--thatit is the cluewhich will guideyou in the solution of some mystery and the punishment of somecrime."

"No, no. No crime," said Sherlock Holmes, laughing. "Only one of thosewhimsical littleincidents whichwill happen when you have fourmillion human beings all jostling each other within the space ofa few square miles. Amid the action and reaction of so dense aswarm of humanity, every possible combination ofevents may be expected to takeplace, and manya little problemwill be presented which may bestriking and bizarre without being criminal. Wehave already hadexperience of such."

"So muchso," I remarked,"that of the last six cases which I have addedto my notes, three have been entirely free of any legal crime.""Precisely. Youallude to my attempt to recoverthe Irene Adlerpapers, to thesingular case ofMiss Mary Sutherland, and to the adventure of the man with thetwisted lip. Well, I have no doubt that this small matter will fall into the same innocent category. You know Peterson, the commissionaire?"

"Yes."

"It is tohim that this trophy belongs.""It is his hat.""No, no, he found it. Its owner is unknown. Ibeg that you will look upon it not as a batteredbillycock but as an intellectual problem. And,first, as to howit came here. It arrived upon Christmas morning, in company with a good fat goose, which is, Ihave no doubt, roasting at thismoment in frontof Peterson's fire. The facts are these: about four o'clock on Christmas morning, Peterson, who,as you know, isa very honest fellow, was returning from some small jollification and was making his way homeward down Tottenham Court Road. Infront of him hesaw, in the gaslight, a tallishman, walking with a slight stagger, and carrying a white gooseslung over his shoulder. As he reached the corner of Goodge Street, a row brokeout between thisstranger and alittle knot of roughs. One of the latter knockedoff the man's hat, on which heraised his stickto defend himself and, swingingit over his head, smashed the shop window behind him. Petersonhad rushed forward to protect the stranger fromhis assailants;but the man, shocked at having broken the window, and seeing anofficial-lookingperson in uniform rushing towards him, droppedhis goose, tookto his heels, and vanished amidthe labyrinth ofsmall streets which lie at theback of Tottenham Court Road. The roughs had also fled at the appearance of Peterson, so that hewas left in possession of the field of battle,and also of thespoils of victory in the shape of this batteredhat and a most unimpeachable Christmas goose.""Which surely herestored to their owner?"

"Mydear fellow, there lies the problem. It is truethat 'For Mrs. Henry Baker' wasprinted upon a small card whichwas tied to thebird's left leg,and it is alsotrue that the initials 'H. B.' are legible uponthe lining of this hat, but as there are some thousands of Bakers, and some hundreds of Henry Bakers in this city of ours, it isnot easy to restore lost property to any one ofthem."

"What,then, did Peterson do?"

"He brought round bothhat and goose tome on Christmasmorning, knowing that even thesmallest problems are of interest to me. The goose we retained until this morning, when there were signs that, in spite of the slight frost, itwould be well that it should beeaten without unnecessary delay.Its finder hascarried it off,therefore, to fulfil the ultimate destiny of a goose, while I continue to retainthe hat of theunknown gentleman who lost his Christmas dinner."

"Did he not advertise?"

"No."

"Then, what clue could you have as to his identity?"

"Only as much as we candeduce."

"Fromhis hat?"

"Precisely."

"But you are joking. What can you gather from this oldbattered felt?""Here is my lens. You know mymethods. What can you gather yourself as to theindividuality ofthe man who hasworn this article?"

I took thetattered objectin my hands andturned it overrather ruefully.It was a very ordinary black hat of the usual round shape, hardand much the worse for wear. The lining had been of red silk, but was a good deal discoloured.There was no maker's name; but,as Holmes had remarked, the initials "H. B." were scrawled uponone side. It waspierced in thebrim for a hat-securer, but theelastic was missing. For the rest, it was cracked, exceedingly dusty, and spotted in several places, although there seemed to have been some attempt to hide thediscoloured patches by smearingthem with ink."I can see nothing," said I, handing it back tomy friend.

"Onthe contrary, Watson, you can see everything. You fail, however, to reason fromwhat you see. You are too timidin drawing yourinferences."

"Then, pray tellme what it is that you can inferfrom this hat?"He picked it up and gazed at it in the peculiar introspectivefashion which was characteristicof him. "It isperhaps less suggestive than itmight have been," he remarked, "and yet there are a few inferences which are very distinct, anda few others which represent atleast a strong balance of probability. That theman was highly intellectual is of course obviousupon the face of it, and also that he was fairly well-to-do within the last three years, although he has now fallen upon evil days. He had foresight, but has less now than formerly, pointingto a moral retrogression, which,when taken withthe decline ofhis fortunes, seems to indicatesome evil influence, probably drink, at work upon him. This mayaccount also forthe obvious fact that his wifehas ceased to love him."

"My dear Holmes!"

"Hehas, however, retained some degree of self-respect," he continued, disregardingmy remonstrance. "He is a man who leads a sedentary life, goesout little, is out of training entirely, is middle-aged, has grizzled hair whichhe has had cutwithin the lastfew days, and which he anoints with lime-cream.These are the more patent factswhich are to bededuced from hishat. Also, by the way, that itis extremely improbable that hehas gas laid onin his house.""You are certainly joking, Holmes."

"Not in theleast. Is it possible that evennow, when I give you these results, you are unable to see how they are attained?"

"I have no doubt that I am very stupid, butI must confess that I am unableto follow you. For example, howdid you deduce that this man wasintellectual?"For answer Holmes clapped the hat upon his head. It came rightover the forehead and settled upon the bridge ofhis nose. "It is a question ofcubic capacity,"said he; "a manwith so large abrain must havesomething in it."

"The declineof his fortunes, then?"

"Thishat is three years old. These flat brims curledat the edge camein then. It isa hat of the very best quality.Look at the bandof ribbed silkand the excellent lining. If this man could afford to buy so expensive a hat three years ago, and has had no hatsince, then hehas assuredly gone down in the world."

"Well, that is clear enough, certainly.But how about the foresight andthe moral retrogression?"

Sherlock Holmes laughed. "Here is theforesight," said he putting hisfinger upon thelittle disc andloop of the hat-securer. "Theyare never sold upon hats. If this man ordered one, it is a signof a certain amount of foresight, since he wentout of his way to take this precaution against the wind. But since we see that he has broken theelastic and hasnot troubled toreplace it, itis obvious thathe has less foresight now than formerly, which is a distinct proof of a weakening nature. On theother hand, hehas endeavouredto conceal someof these stainsupon the felt bydaubing them with ink, which isa sign that hehas not entirelylost his self-respect."

"Yourreasoning is certainly plausible."

"The furtherpoints, that heis middle-aged,that his hair is grizzled, thatit has been recently cut, and that he uses lime-cream, are allto be gathered from a close examination of the lower part of thelining. The lens discloses a large number of hair-ends, clean cut by the scissors of the barber. They all appear to be adhesive, and there is adistinct odourof lime-cream. This dust, you will observe, is not the gritty, grey dust of thestreet but the fluffy brown dustof the house, showing that it has been hung upindoors most ofthe time, whilethe marks of moisture upon the inside are proofpositive that the wearer perspired very freely,and could therefore, hardly be in the best of training."

"But his wife--you said that she had ceased to love him."

"This hat has not been brushed for weeks. When I see you, my dear Watson, with a week's accumulation of dust upon your hat,and when your wife allows you to go out in sucha state, I shall fear that youalso have been unfortunate enough to lose your wife's affection."

"But he mightbe a bachelor.""Nay, he was bringing home thegoose as a peace-offering to his wife. Rememberthe card upon the bird's leg.""You have an answer to everything. But how on earth do you deduce that the gasis not laid on in his house?"

"One tallow stain, or even two, might come by chance; but when Isee no less thanfive, I think that there can belittle doubt that the individual must be brought into frequentcontact with burning tallow--walks upstairs at night probably with his hat in one hand and a guttering candle inthe other. Anyhow, he never gottallow-stains from a gas-jet. Are you satisfied?"

"Well, it isvery ingenious," said I, laughing; "but since,as you said justnow, there hasbeen no crime committed, and noharm done save the loss of a goose, all this seems to be rathera waste of energy."

Sherlock Holmes had openedhis mouth to reply, when the door flew open, andPeterson, the commissionaire, rushed into the apartment with flushed cheeks andthe face of a man who is dazedwith astonishment.

"The goose,Mr. Holmes! Thegoose, sir!" hegasped.

"Eh? What of it, then?Has it returnedto life and flapped off throughthe kitchen window?" Holmes twisted himself round upon the sofato get a fairerview of the man's excited face."See here, sir!See what my wife found in its crop!" He held out his hand and displayed upon the centre of thepalm a brilliantly scintillatingblue stone, rather smaller thana bean in size,but of such purity and radiancethat it twinkled like an electric point in thedark hollow of his hand.

Sherlock Holmes sat upwith a whistle."By Jove, Peterson!" said he, "this is treasuretrove indeed. Isuppose you know what you havegot?"

"A diamond, sir? A precious stone. It cuts into glass asthough it were putty."

"It's more than a precious stone. It isthe precious stone."

"Not the Countess of Morcar's blue carbuncle!" I ejaculated.

"Precisely so. I ought to know its size andshape, seeing that I have read the advertisementabout it in TheTimes every daylately. It is absolutely unique, and its valuecan only be conjectured, but thereward offeredof $1000 is certainly not withina twentieth part of the marketprice."

"A thousand pounds! Great Lord of mercy!" The commissionaire plumped down into a chairand stared fromone to the otherof us.

"That is the reward, and I have reasonto know that there are sentimental considerations in the background which wouldinduce the Countess to part withhalf her fortune if she could but recover the gem."

"It was lost, if I remember aright, at theHotel Cosmopolitan," I remarked.

"Precisely so, on December 22nd, just five days ago. John Horner, a plumber,was accused of having abstractedit from the lady's jewel-case.The evidence against him was sostrong that thecase has been referred to the Assizes. I have some account of the matter here, Ibelieve." He rummaged amid hisnewspapers, glancing over the dates, until at last he smoothed one out, doubledit over, and read the followingparagraph:

"Hotel CosmopolitanJewel Robbery. John Horner, 26,plumber, was brought up upon thecharge of having upon the 22ndinst., abstracted from the jewel-case of the Countess of Morcarthe valuable gemknown as the blue carbuncle. James Ryder, upper-attendant at the hotel, gave his evidence to the effect that hehad shown Horner up to the dressing-room of theCountess of Morcar upon the dayof the robberyin order that hemight solder the second bar ofthe grate, whichwas loose. He had remained withHorner some little time, but had finally been called away. On returning, he found that Horner had disappeared,that the bureauhad been forcedopen, and that the small moroccocasket in which, as it afterwards transpired, the Countess wasaccustomed to keep her jewel, was lying empty upon the dressing-table. Ryder instantly gave thealarm, and Horner was arrested the same evening;but the stone could not be found either upon his person or in his rooms. Catherine Cusack, maidto the Countess, deposed to having heard Ryder's cry of dismayon discovering the robbery, andto having rushedinto the room,where she foundmatters as described by the lastwitness. Inspector Bradstreet,B division, gaveevidence as tothe arrest of Horner, who struggled frantically,and protested his innocence inthe strongest terms. Evidence ofa previous conviction for robbery having been given against theprisoner, the magistrate refused to deal summarily with the offence, but referred it to the Assizes. Horner, who had shown signs of intense emotion during theproceedings, fainted away at theconclusion andwas carried outof court."

"Hum! So much for the police-court,"said Holmes thoughtfully, tossing aside the paper. "The question for us now tosolve is the sequence of eventsleading from a rifled jewel-caseat one end to the crop of a goose in TottenhamCourt Road at the other. You see, Watson, our little deductionshave suddenly assumed a much more important andless innocent aspect. Here is the stone; the stone came from thegoose, and thegoose came fromMr. Henry Baker,the gentleman with the bad hatand all the other characteristics with which I have bored you. So now we must set ourselves veryseriously to finding this gentleman and ascertaining what parthe has played inthis little mystery. To do this, we must try the simplest meansfirst, and these lie undoubtedly in an advertisement in all theevening papers.If this fail, Ishall have recourse to other methods."

"What will you say?"

"Give me a penciland that slip of paper. Now, then: 'Found at the corner of Goodge Street, a goose and a black felt hat. Mr. Henry Baker can have the same by applying at 6:30 this evening at 221B, Baker Street.' That is clear and concise.""Very. But willhe see it?"

"Well, he is sureto keep an eye on the papers, since, to a poor man, the loss wasa heavy one. Hewas clearly soscared by his mischance in breaking the window and by the approach of Peterson that he thought of nothing but flight, but sincethen he must have bitterly regretted the impulsewhich caused him to drop his bird. Then, again,the introduction of his name will cause him tosee it, for everyone who knows him will direct his attention toit. Here you are, Peterson, rundown to the advertising agency and have this putin the eveningpapers."

"In which, sir?"

"Oh,in the Globe, Star, Pall Mall,St. James's, Evening News, Standard, Echo, and any others that occur to you."

"Very well, sir.And this stone?""Ah, yes, I shall keep the stone. Thank you. And, I say, Peterson, just buy agoose on your way back and leaveit here with me, for we must have one to give to this gentlemanin place of theone which yourfamily is now devouring."

Whenthe commissionaire had gone, Holmes took up thestone and held it against the light. "It's a bonny thing," saidhe. "Just see how it glints andsparkles. Of course it is a nucleus and focus ofcrime. Every good stone is. They are the devil's pet baits. Inthe larger and older jewels every facet may stand for a bloody deed. This stoneis not yet twenty years old. Itwas found in thebanks of the Amoy River in southern China and is remarkable inhaving every characteristic of the carbuncle, save that it is blue in shade instead of ruby red.In spite of itsyouth, it has already a sinister history. Therehave been two murders, a vitriol-throwing, a suicide, and several robberies brought about for the sake of thisforty-grain weight of crystallised charcoal. Whowould think that so pretty a toy would be a purveyor to the gallows and the prison? I'll lock it up in my strong box now and drop a line to theCountess to saythat we have it."

"Do you think that this manHorner is innocent?"

"I cannottell."

"Well, then, do you imagine that this other one, Henry Baker, had anything to do with the matter?"

"Itis, I think, much more likely that Henry Baker is an absolutelyinnocent man, who had no idea that the bird which he was carrying was of considerably more valuethan if it weremade of solid gold. That, however, I shall determine by a verysimple test if we have an answerto our advertisement."

"And you can do nothinguntil then?"

"Nothing."

"In that case I shallcontinue my professional round.But I shall come back in the evening at the hour you have mentioned, for I should like to see the solution of so tangled a business."

"Very glad to see you. Idine at seven.There is a woodcock, I believe.By the way, in view of recent occurrences, perhaps I ought to ask Mrs. Hudson toexamine its crop."

I had beendelayed at a case, and it was alittle after half-past six whenI found myself in Baker Street once more. As I approached the house I saw a tallman in a Scotchbonnet with a coat which was buttoned up to hischin waiting outside in the bright semicircle which was thrownfrom the fanlight. Just as I arrived the door was opened, and wewere shown up together to Holmes' room.

"Mr. Henry Baker, I believe," said he,rising from hisarmchair and greeting his visitor with the easyair of geniality which he couldso readily assume. "Pray take this chair by thefire, Mr. Baker. It is a cold night, and I observe that your circulation is more adapted for summer than for winter. Ah, Watson, you have justcome at the right time. Is thatyour hat, Mr. Baker?"

"Yes, sir, that is undoubtedly my hat."He was a large man with roundedshoulders, a massive head, and abroad, intelligent face, sloping down to a pointed beard of grizzled brown. A touch of red in nose and cheeks,with a slight tremor of his extended hand, recalled Holmes' surmise as to his habits. His rustyblack frock-coatwas buttoned right up in front,with the collarturned up, andhis lank wristsprotruded from his sleeves without a sign of cuff or shirt. He spoke in a slow staccato fashion,choosing his words with care, and gave the impression generallyof a man of learning and letters who had had ill-usage at the hands of fortune."We have retained these thingsfor some days,"said Holmes, "because we expected to see an advertisement fromyou giving youraddress. I am ata loss to knownow why you didnot advertise."Our visitor gave a rather shamefaced laugh. "Shillings have notbeen so plentiful with me as they once were," he remarked. "I had no doubt thatthe gang of roughs who assaulted me had carriedoff both my hatand the bird. Idid not care tospend more money in a hopelessattempt at recovering them."

"Very naturally. By the way, aboutthe bird, we were compelled toeat it."

"To eat it!" Our visitor half rose from his chair in his excitement."Yes, it would have been of no use to anyone hadwe not done so.But I presume that this other goose upon the sideboard, which is about the sameweight and perfectly fresh, will answer your purpose equally well?"

"Oh, certainly, certainly," answered Mr. Baker with a sighof relief.

"Ofcourse, we still have the feathers, legs, crop,and so on of your own bird, soif you wish--"The man burst into a hearty laugh. "They might be useful to me as relics of my adventure," saidhe, "but beyondthat I can hardly see what use the disjecta membra of my late acquaintance are going to be to me. No, sir, I think that, with your permission, Iwill confine myattentions to the excellent bird which I perceive upon the sideboard."

Sherlock Holmes glancedsharply acrossat me with a slight shrug of hisshoulders.

"There is your hat,then, and thereyour bird," said he. "By the way, would it boreyou to tell mewhere you got the other one from? I am somewhatof a fowl fancier, and I have seldom seen a better grown goose.""Certainly, sir," said Baker,who had risen and tucked his newly gained property under his arm. "There are a few of us who frequent the AlphaInn, near the Museum--we are tobe found in theMuseum itself during the day, you understand. This year our goodhost, Windigateby name, instituted a goose club, by which, onconsideration ofsome few penceevery week, we were each to receive a bird at Christmas. My pence were duly paid, and the rest is familiar to you. I am much indebted to you, sir, for a Scotchbonnet is fittedneither to my years nor my gravity." With a comical pomposity of manner he bowed solemnly to both of us and strode off upon hisway.

"So muchfor Mr. Henry Baker," said Holmes when he had closed the door behind him. "It isquite certain that he knows nothing whatever about the matter.Are you hungry,Watson?"

"Not particularly."

"Then I suggest that we turn ourdinner into a supper and followup this clue while it is still hot."

"By all means."

It was abitter night, sowe drew on ourulsters and wrapped cravats about our throats. Outside, the stars were shining coldly in a cloudless sky, and the breath of thepassers-by blewout into smoke like so many pistol shots. Our footfalls rang outcrisply and loudly as we swungthrough the doctors' quarter, Wimpole Street, Harley Street, andso through Wigmore Street intoOxford Street. In a quarter of an hour we were in Bloomsbury atthe Alpha Inn, which is a smallpublic-house atthe corner of one of the streetswhich runs downinto Holborn. Holmes pushed open the door of the private bar and ordered two glasses of beer from the ruddy-faced, white-aproned landlord.

"Your beer should be excellent if it is as good asyour geese," said he.

"My geese!" The man seemed surprised.

"Yes. I was speaking only half anhour ago to Mr.Henry Baker, whowas a member ofyour goose club."

"Ah! yes, Isee. But you see, sir, them's not our geese."

"Indeed! Whose, then?"

"Well, Igot the two dozen from a salesman in Covent Garden."

"Indeed? Iknow some of them. Which was it?"

"Breckinridge is his name.""Ah! I don't know him. Well, here's your good health landlord,and prosperity to your house. Good-night."

"Nowfor Mr. Breckinridge," he continued, buttoningup his coat as we came out intothe frosty air."Remember, Watson that though wehave so homelya thing as a goose at one end ofthis chain, wehave at the other a man who willcertainly get seven years' penal servitude unless we can establish his innocence. It is possible that our inquiry may but confirm his guilt; but, in any case,we have a line of investigationwhich has been missed by the police, and which asingular chancehas placed in our hands. Let usfollow it out to the bitter end. Faces to the south, then, andquick march!"

We passed acrossHolborn, down Endell Street, andso through a zigzag of slums toCovent Garden Market. One of the largest stallsbore the name of Breckinridge upon it, and theproprietor a horsey-looking man,with a sharp face and trim side-whiskers was helping a boy to put up the shutters.

"Good-evening. It's a coldnight," said Holmes.

The salesman nodded and shot a questioningglance at my companion.

"Soldout of geese, Isee," continuedHolmes, pointingat the bare slabs of marble.

"Let you have five hundred to-morrow morning."

"That's no good.""Well, there are some on the stall with the gas-flare."

"Ah,but I was recommended to you.""Who by?"

"Thelandlord of theAlpha."

"Oh, yes; I sent him acouple of dozen."

"Fine birds they were, too. Now where did youget them from?"To my surprisethe question provoked a burst of anger from thesalesman.

"Now, then, mister,"said he, with his head cocked and his arms akimbo, "what are you driving at? Let's have it straight, now."

"Itis straight enough. I should like to know who sold you the geese which you supplied to the Alpha."

"Well then,I shan't tell you. So now!"

"Oh, it is a matter of no importance; but I don'tknow why you should be so warm over such a trifle."

"Warm! You'd be as warm, maybe, if you wereas pestered asI am. When I paygood money fora good article there should be an end of the business; but it's'Where are the geese?' and 'Whodid you sell thegeese to?' and'What will you take for the geese?' One would think they were the only geese inthe world, to hear the fuss thatis made over them."

"Well, I have no connection with any otherpeople who havebeen making inquiries," said Holmes carelessly."If you won't tell us the bet is off, that is all. But I'm always ready to backmy opinion on amatter of fowls, and I have a fiver on it thatthe bird I ate is country bred.""Well, then, you've lost yourfiver, for it'stown bred," snapped the salesman.

"It's nothingof the kind.""I say it is.""I don't believeit."

"D'you think you know more about fowls than I, who have handled them eversince I was a nipper? I tell you, all those birds that went tothe Alpha were town bred."

"You'll never persuade me to believethat."

"Will you bet, then?""It's merely taking your money,for I know thatI am right. ButI'll have a sovereign on with you, just to teachyou not to be obstinate."

Thesalesman chuckled grimly. "Bringme the books, Bill," said he.The small boy brought round a small thin volumeand a great greasy-backed one, laying them out together beneaththe hanging lamp.

"Now then, Mr. Cocksure," said the salesman,"I thought thatI was out of geese, but before Ifinish you'll find that there is still one leftin my shop. Yousee this littlebook?"

"Well?""That's the list of the folk from whom I buy.D'you see? Well,then, here on this page are thecountry folk, and the numbers after their namesare where theiraccounts are inthe big ledger.Now, then! Yousee this other page in red ink?Well, that is alist of my townsuppliers. Now,look at that third name. Just read it out to me."

"Mrs. Oakshott, 117, BrixtonRoad--249," readHolmes.

"Quiteso. Now turn that up in the ledger."

Holmes turned to the pageindicated. "Here you are, 'Mrs.Oakshott, 117,Brixton Road, egg and poultry supplier.' "

"Now, then, what's the last entry?"" 'December 22nd. Twenty-four geese at 7s. 6d.'"

"Quite so. There you are. And underneath?"" 'Sold to Mr. Windigate of theAlpha, at 12s.'"

"What have you to say now?"Sherlock Holmeslooked deeply chagrined. He drewa sovereign from his pocket andthrew it down upon the slab, turning away withthe air of a manwhose disgust is too deep for words. A few yards off he stoppedunder a lamp-post and laughed in the hearty, noiseless fashionwhich was peculiar to him.

"When you see a manwith whiskers ofthat cut and the 'Pink 'un' protruding out of his pocket, you can always draw him by a bet," said he. "I daresay that if I hadput $100 down infront of him, that man would not have given mesuch complete information as wasdrawn from himby the idea thathe was doing meon a wager. Well, Watson, we are, I fancy, nearing the end of our quest, and the only point which remains to bedetermined is whether we shouldgo on to this Mrs. Oakshott to-night, or whether we should reserve it for to-morrow. It is clear from what thatsurly fellow said that there are others besidesourselves who are anxious aboutthe matter, andI should--"

His remarks were suddenly cut short by a loud hubbub which broke out from the stall which we had just left. Turning round we saw alittle rat-faced fellow standing in the centreof the circle ofyellow light which was thrown by the swinging lamp, while Breckinridge, the salesman, framed inthe door of hisstall, was shaking his fists fiercely at the cringing figure."I've had enoughof you and yourgeese," he shouted. "I wish youwere all at thedevil together.If you come pestering me any more with your silly talk I'll setthe dog at you.You bring Mrs.Oakshott here and I'll answer her, but what haveyou to do withit? Did I buy the geese off you?"

"No; but oneof them was mineall the same,"whined the little man.

"Well, then, ask Mrs. Oakshott for it.""She told me toask you."

"Well, you can ask the King of Proosia, for all I care. I've had enough of it. Get out of this!" Herushed fiercelyforward, and theinquirer flitted away into thedarkness.

"Ha!this may save usa visit to Brixton Road," whispered Holmes. "Come with me, andwe will see whatis to be made of this fellow."Striding throughthe scattered knots of people who lounged roundthe flaring stalls, my companion speedily overtook the little man and touched him upon the shoulder. He spranground, and I could see in the gas-light that every vestige of colour had been driven from his face.

"Who are you, then? What doyou want?" he asked in a quavering voice.

"Youwill excuse me," said Holmes blandly, "but I could not help overhearing the questions which youput to the salesman just now. Ithink that I could be of assistance to you."

"You? Who are you? How could youknow anything ofthe matter?"

"My name is Sherlock Holmes. It is my business toknow what otherpeople don't know."

"But you can know nothingof this?"

"Excuse me, I know everything of it.You are endeavouring to trace some geese which were sold by Mrs.Oakshott, of Brixton Road, to asalesman namedBreckinridge, byhim in turn toMr. Windigate, of the Alpha, andby him to his club, of which Mr. Henry Baker isa member."

"Oh, sir, you are the very man whomI have longed to meet," cried the little fellowwith outstretched hands and quivering fingers."I can hardly explain to you howinterested I amin this matter."

Sherlock Holmes hailed a four-wheeler which was passing. "Inthat case we hadbetter discussit in a cosy room rather than inthis wind-sweptmarket-place,"said he. "But pray tell me, before we go farther, who it is thatI have the pleasure of assisting."

The man hesitated for an instant. "My nameis John Robinson," he answered with a sidelong glance.

"No, no;the real name,"said Holmes sweetly. "It is always awkward doing business withan alias."

A flush sprang to the white cheeks of the stranger."Well then," said he, "my real name is James Ryder."

"Preciselyso. Head attendant at the HotelCosmopolitan. Pray step into the cab, and I shall soon be ableto tell you everything which youwould wish to know."

The little man stood glancing from one tothe other of uswith half-frightened, half-hopeful eyes, as onewho is not surewhether he is on the verge of awindfall or ofa catastrophe. Then he stepped into the cab, andin half an hourwe were back inthe sitting-room at Baker Street. Nothing had been said duringour drive, but the high, thin breathing of our new companion, and the claspingsand unclaspingsof his hands, spoke of the nervous tension within him.

"Here weare!" said Holmes cheerily as we filed into theroom. "The firelooks very seasonable in this weather. You lookcold, Mr. Ryder. Pray take thebasket-chair. Iwill just put onmy slippers before we settle this little matterof yours. Now,then! You want to know what became of those geese?"

"Yes, sir.""Or rather, Ifancy, of that goose. It was onebird, I imaginein which you were interested--white, with a black bar across the tail."

Ryderquivered with emotion. "Oh, sir," he cried, "canyou tell me where it went to?""It came here.""Here?"

"Yes,and a most remarkable bird it proved. I don't wonder that you should take an interest in it. Itlaid an egg after it was dead--the bonniest, brightest little blue egg that ever was seen. I have it here in mymuseum."

Our visitor staggeredto his feet andclutched the mantelpiece with his right hand. Holmes unlocked his strong-box and held up the blue carbuncle, which shone out like a star, witha cold, brilliant, many-pointedradiance. Ryderstood glaring with a drawn face,uncertain whether to claim or to disown it.

"The game's up, Ryder," said Holmes quietly. "Holdup, man, or you'll be into thefire! Give him an arm back intohis chair, Watson. He's not gotblood enough togo in for felonywith impunity.Give him a dashof brandy. So! Now he looks a little more human.What a shrimp it is, to be sure!"

For a momenthe had staggered and nearly fallen, but the brandy brought a tinge of colour into his cheeks, and he sat staring with frightened eyes at his accuser.

"I havealmost every link in my hands, and all the proofs which I couldpossibly need, so there is little which you needtell me. Still,that little mayas well be cleared up to make the case complete. You had heard,Ryder, of thisblue stone of the Countess of Morcar's?"

"It was Catherine Cusack who told me of it," said he in a crackling voice.

"I see--her ladyship's waiting-maid. Well,the temptationof sudden wealthso easily acquired was too muchfor you, as ithas been for better men before you; but you werenot very scrupulous in the means you used. It seems to me, Ryder, that there isthe making of avery pretty villain in you. Youknew that thisman Horner, theplumber, had been concerned in some such matterbefore, and thatsuspicion wouldrest the more readily upon him.What did you do, then? You madesome small jobin my lady's room--you and yourconfederate Cusack--and you managed that he should be the man sent for. Then, when he had left,you rifled the jewel-case, raised the alarm, andhad this unfortunate man arrested. You then--"Ryder threw himself down suddenly upon the rugand clutched atmy companion's knees. "For God'ssake, have mercy!" he shrieked."Think of my father! Of my mother! It would break their hearts.I never went wrong before! I never will again.I swear it. I'llswear it on a Bible. Oh, don'tbring it into court! For Christ's sake, don't!""Get back intoyour chair!" said Holmes sternly. "It is very well to cringe andcrawl now, butyou thought little enough of this poor Horner inthe dock for acrime of which he knew nothing.""I will fly, Mr. Holmes. I will leave the country, sir. Then the charge against him will breakdown."

"Hum! We will talk about that. And nowlet us hear a true account of the next act. Howcame the stone into the goose, and how came thegoose into the open market? Tellus the truth, for there lies your only hope ofsafety."

Ryderpassed his tongue over his parched lips. "I willtell you it just as it happened, sir," said he."When Horner had been arrested,it seemed to methat it would be best for me toget away with the stone at once, for I did notknow at what moment the police might not take itinto their heads to search me and my room. There was no place about the hotel where it would besafe. I went out, as if on somecommission, andI made for my sister's house. She had married aman named Oakshott, and lived in Brixton Road,where she fattened fowls for themarket. All theway there everyman I met seemed to me to be apoliceman or a detective; and, for all that it was a cold night,the sweat was pouring down my face before I came to the BrixtonRoad. My sisterasked me what was the matter, and why I was sopale; but I toldher that I hadbeen upset by the jewel robberyat the hotel. Then I went into the back yard andsmoked a pipe and wondered whatit would be best to do.

"I hada friend once called Maudsley,who went to thebad, and has just been serving his time in Pentonville. One dayhe had met me, and fell into talk about the waysof thieves, andhow they couldget rid of whatthey stole. I knew that he wouldbe true to me,for I knew one or two things about him; so I made up my mind togo right on to Kilburn, where helived, and takehim into my confidence. He would show me how toturn the stoneinto money. Buthow to get to him in safety? I thought of the agonies I had gonethrough in coming from the hotel. I might at any moment be seized and searched,and there wouldbe the stone inmy waistcoat pocket. I was leaning against thewall at the timeand looking atthe geese whichwere waddling about round my feet, and suddenlyan idea came into my head whichshowed me how Icould beat the best detective that ever lived."My sister had told me some weeks before that Imight have the pick of her geesefor a Christmaspresent, and Iknew that she was always as goodas her word. Iwould take my goose now, and init I would carrymy stone to Kilburn. There wasa little shed inthe yard, and behind this I drove one of the birds--a fine bigone, white, witha barred tail.I caught it, andprying its billopen, I thrustthe stone down its throat as faras my finger could reach. The bird gave a gulp,and I felt thestone pass alongits gullet anddown into its crop. But the creature flapped andstruggled, andout came my sister to know whatwas the matter.As I turned to speak to her thebrute broke loose and flutteredoff among the others.

" 'Whatever were you doing with that bird, Jem?' says she.

" 'Well,' said I, 'you said you'd give me onefor Christmas,and I was feeling which was thefattest.'

" 'Oh,' says she, 'we've set yours aside for you--Jem's bird, we callit. It's the big white one overyonder. There'stwenty-six of them, which makesone for you, and one for us, and two dozen forthe market.'

"'Thank you, Maggie,' says I; 'but if it is all the same to you,I'd rather havethat one I was handling just now.'

" 'The otheris a good threepound heavier,'said she, 'andwe fattened it expressly for you.'

" 'Never mind. I'll have theother, and I'lltake it now,' said I.

" 'Oh, just as you like,' said she, a little huffed. 'Which is it you want, then?'

" 'That white one with the barred tail, right in themiddle of the flock.'

" 'Oh, very well. Kill it and take it with you.'

"Well,I did what shesaid, Mr. Holmes, and I carriedthe bird all theway to Kilburn.I told my pal what I had done,for he was a manthat it was easy to tell a thing like that to.He laughed untilhe choked, andwe got a knife and opened the goose. My heart turned to water, for there was nosign of the stone, and I knew that some terriblemistake had occurred. I left the bird, rushed back to my sister's, and hurriedinto the back yard. There was not a bird to be seen there.

" 'Where are they all, Maggie?' I cried.

" 'Gone tothe dealer's, Jem.'

" 'Which dealer's?'

" 'Breckinridge, of Covent Garden.'" 'But was thereanother with abarred tail?' Iasked, 'the sameas the one I chose?'

" 'Yes, Jem; there were two barred-tailedones, and I could never tell them apart.'

"Well, then, of course I saw it all,and I ran off as hard as my feet would carry meto this man Breckinridge; but he had sold the lot at once, andnot one word would he tell me asto where they had gone. You heard him yourselves to-night. Well, he has alwaysanswered me likethat. My sisterthinks that I am going mad. Sometimes I think that I am myself.And now--and now I am myself abranded thief, without ever having touched the wealth for whichI sold my character. God help me! God help me!"He burst into convulsive sobbing, with his faceburied in his hands.

There wasa long silence,broken only by his heavy breathing and by the measured tapping of Sherlock Holmes' finger-tips upon the edge ofthe table. Thenmy friend rose and threw open the door.

"Get out!" said he.

"What, sir! Oh, Heaven bless you!""No more words. Get out!"

Andno more words were needed. There was a rush, aclatter upon thestairs, the bang of a door, andthe crisp rattle of running footfalls from thestreet.

"Afterall, Watson," said Holmes, reaching up his handfor his clay pipe, "I am not retained by the police to supply their deficiencies. If Horner werein danger it would be another thing; but this fellow will not appear against him, and the casemust collapse. Isuppose that Iam commuting a felony, but it isjust possible that I am savinga soul. This fellow will not gowrong again; heis too terriblyfrightened. Sendhim to gaol now, and you make him a gaol-bird for life. Besides, it is the season of forgiveness. Chance has put in our way a most singular andwhimsical problem, and its solution is its ownreward. If you will have the goodness to touch the bell, Doctor,we will begin another investigation, in which,also a bird willbe the chief feature."

VIII.THE ADVENTURE OFTHE SPECKLED BAND


On glancingover my notes of the seventy odd cases in whichI have during the last eight years studied themethods of my friend Sherlock Holmes, I find many tragic, some comic, a large number merely strange, but none commonplace; for,working as he did rather for thelove of his artthan for the acquirement of wealth, he refusedto associate himself with any investigation which did not tend towards the unusual, and even thefantastic. Of all these variedcases, however,I cannot recallany which presented more singular features thanthat which was associated with the well-known Surrey family of the Roylotts of Stoke Moran. Theevents in question occurred in the early days ofmy associationwith Holmes, when we were sharing rooms as bachelors in Baker Street. It is possible that I might have placed them upon record before, but a promise of secrecywas made at thetime, from whichI have only been freed during the last month bythe untimely death of the ladyto whom the pledge was given. Itis perhaps as well that the facts should now come to light, forI have reasonsto know that there are widespread rumours as tothe death of Dr.Grimesby Roylott which tend tomake the mattereven more terrible than the truth.

It was earlyin April in theyear '83 that Iwoke one morning to find Sherlock Holmes standing, fully dressed, by the side of my bed. He wasa late riser, as a rule, and asthe clock on the mantelpiece showed me that itwas only a quarter-past seven, Iblinked up at him in some surprise, and perhapsjust a little resentment, for Iwas myself regular in my habits.

"Very sorry to knock you up,Watson," said he, "but it's thecommon lot thismorning. Mrs. Hudson has been knocked up, she retorted upon me,and I on you.""What is it, then--a fire?"

"No; a client. It seems that a young lady has arrived in a considerable state of excitement, who insists upon seeing me. She is waiting now in thesitting-room. Now, when young ladies wander about the metropolisat this hour ofthe morning, and knock sleepy people up out oftheir beds, I presume that it issomething verypressing which they have to communicate. Shouldit prove to be an interesting case, you would, Iam sure, wish to follow it fromthe outset. I thought, at any rate, that I should call you andgive you the chance."

"My dearfellow, I wouldnot miss it foranything."

I had no keener pleasure than in following Holmes inhis professional investigations, and in admiring the rapid deductions, as swiftas intuitions,and yet always founded on a logical basis with which he unravelled the problemswhich were submitted to him. I rapidly threw onmy clothes and was ready in a few minutes to accompany my frienddown to the sitting-room. A lady dressed in black and heavily veiled, who had been sitting in the window, roseas we entered."Good-morning, madam," said Holmes cheerily. "Myname is Sherlock Holmes. This is my intimate friend and associate, Dr. Watson,before whom youcan speak as freely as before myself. Ha! I am glad to see thatMrs. Hudson hashad the good sense to light thefire. Pray drawup to it, and Ishall order youa cup of hot coffee, for I observe that you areshivering."

"Itis not cold which makes me shiver," said the woman in a low voice, changing herseat as requested.

"What, then?"

"It is fear,Mr. Holmes. Itis terror." Sheraised her veilas she spoke, and we could see that she was indeed in a pitiablestate of agitation, her face all drawn and grey, with restlessfrightened eyes,like those of some hunted animal. Her featuresand figure werethose of a womanof thirty, buther hair was shot with prematuregrey, and her expression was weary and haggard.Sherlock Holmesran her over with one of his quick, all-comprehensive glances."You must not fear," said he soothingly, bending forward and patting her forearm. "We shall soon set matters right, I have no doubt. You have come in by trainthis morning, Isee."

"You knowme, then?"

"No, but I observethe second halfof a return ticket in the palm of your left glove. You must havestarted early,and yet you hada good drive ina dog-cart, along heavy roads, before you reached the station."The lady gave aviolent start and stared in bewilderment at mycompanion.

"There is no mystery, my dear madam," said he, smiling. "The left arm of your jacketis spattered with mud in no less than seven places. The marks are perfectly fresh. There is novehicle save a dog-cart which throws up mud in that way, and then only when yousit on the left-hand side of thedriver."

"Whatever your reasons may be, you are perfectly correct," said she."I started fromhome before six,reached Leatherhead at twenty past, and came inby the first train to Waterloo.Sir, I can stand this strain nolonger; I shallgo mad if it continues. I haveno one to turn to--none, save only one, who cares for me, and he, poor fellow, can be of littleaid. I have heard of you, Mr. Holmes; I have heard of you from Mrs. Farintosh, whom you helped in the hour of her sore need. Itwas from her that I had your address. Oh, sir, do you not thinkthat you could help me, too, andat least throwa little light through the densedarkness whichsurrounds me? Atpresent it is out of my power to reward you foryour services,but in a month or six weeks I shall be married,with the controlof my own income, and then at least you shall not find me ungrateful."

Holmesturned to his desk and, unlocking it, drew out asmall case-book, which he consulted.

"Farintosh," said he. "Ahyes, I recall the case; it wasconcerned with an opal tiara. Ithink it was before your time, Watson. I can only say, madam, that I shall be happy to devote the same care to your case as I did to that of your friend. As toreward, my profession is its ownreward; but youare at libertyto defray whatever expenses I may be put to, atthe time which suits you best. And now I beg that you will lay before us everything that may help us in formingan opinion uponthe matter."

"Alas!" replied our visitor, "thevery horror of my situation liesin the fact that my fears are so vague, and mysuspicions depend so entirely upon small points,which might seem trivial to another, that evenhe to whom of all others I havea right to lookfor help and advice looks upon all that I tell him about it as the fancies of anervous woman. He does not say so, but I can read it from his soothing answers and averted eyes.But I have heard, Mr. Holmes, that you can seedeeply into themanifold wickedness of the humanheart. You mayadvise me how towalk amid the dangers which encompass me."

"Iam all attention, madam."

"My name is Helen Stoner, and I am living with my stepfather, who isthe last survivor of one of theoldest Saxon families in England, the Roylotts of Stoke Moran, on the western border of Surrey."Holmes noddedhis head. "The name is familiarto me," said he."The family was at one time among the richestin England, andthe estates extended over the borders into Berkshire in the north, and Hampshirein the west. Inthe last century, however, foursuccessive heirs were of a dissolute and wasteful disposition,and the family ruin was eventually completed bya gambler in thedays of the Regency. Nothing was left save a few acres of ground, and the two-hundred-year-oldhouse, which isitself crushed under a heavy mortgage. The lastsquire dragged out his existencethere, living the horrible lifeof an aristocratic pauper; buthis only son, mystepfather, seeing that he mustadapt himself to the new conditions, obtained an advance from arelative, whichenabled him totake a medical degree and went out to Calcutta,where, by his professional skilland his force of character, heestablished a large practice. Ina fit of anger,however, causedby some robberies which had been perpetrated inthe house, he beat his native butler to death and narrowly escaped a capital sentence. As it was, he suffered along term of imprisonment and afterwards returned to England amorose and disappointed man.

"When Dr. Roylottwas in India hemarried my mother, Mrs. Stoner,the young widowof Major-GeneralStoner, of theBengal Artillery. My sister Julia and I were twins, and we wereonly two years old at the time of my mother's re-marriage. She had a considerable sum of money--not less than $1000 a year--andthis she bequeathed to Dr. Roylott entirely while we resided with him, with a provision that a certain annual sum should be allowed to each of us in the event of our marriage.Shortly after our return to England my mother died--she was killed eight years ago in a railwayaccident near Crewe. Dr. Roylottthen abandonedhis attempts toestablish himself in practice inLondon and tookus to live withhim in the oldancestral houseat Stoke Moran.The money whichmy mother had left was enough for all our wants,and there seemed to be no obstacle to our happiness.

"But a terrible change came over our stepfather about this time. Insteadof making friends and exchangingvisits with ourneighbours, whohad at first been overjoyed tosee a Roylott ofStoke Moran back in the old family seat, he shut himself up inhis house and seldom came out save to indulge inferocious quarrels with whoevermight cross hispath. Violenceof temper approaching to mania has been hereditary in the men ofthe family, andin my stepfather's case it had,I believe, beenintensified byhis long residence in the tropics. A series of disgraceful brawls took place, two of which endedin the police-court, until at last he became the terror of thevillage, and thefolks would flyat his approach, for he is a man of immense strength, and absolutely uncontrollable in his anger.

"Last week he hurled the local blacksmith over a parapet into a stream, andit was only by paying over all the money which Icould gather together that I was able to avertanother public exposure. He hadno friends at all save the wandering gipsies, and he would givethese vagabondsleave to encampupon the few acres of bramble-covered land whichrepresent the family estate, and would accept in return the hospitality of their tents, wandering away with them sometimes forweeks on end. Hehas a passion also for Indian animals, which are sent over to him by a correspondent, and he has at this momenta cheetah and ababoon, which wander freely over his grounds and are feared bythe villagers almost as much astheir master.

"You can imaginefrom what I saythat my poor sister Julia and Ihad no great pleasure in our lives. No servant would stay with us, and for a long time we did all the work of the house. She wasbut thirty at the time of her death, and yet her hair had already begun to whiten, even as minehas."

"Your sister is dead, then?"

"She diedjust two years ago, and it is ofher death thatI wish to speakto you. You canunderstand that,living the lifewhich I have described, we werelittle likely to see anyone ofour own age andposition. We had, however, an aunt, my mother'smaiden sister, Miss Honoria Westphail, who livesnear Harrow, and we were occasionally allowed to pay short visits at this lady's house. Julia went there at Christmas two yearsago, and met there a half-pay major of marines,to whom she became engaged. Mystepfather learned of the engagement when my sister returned andoffered no objection to the marriage; but within a fortnight ofthe day which had been fixed for the wedding, the terrible event occurred whichhas deprived meof my only companion."

Sherlock Holmes had been leaning back in his chair withhis eyes closedand his head sunk in a cushion,but he half opened his lids nowand glanced across at his visitor.

"Pray be precise as to details," said he."It is easy forme to be so, forevery event ofthat dreadful time is seared into my memory. Themanor-house is,as I have already said, very old, and only onewing is now inhabited. The bedrooms in this wingare on the ground floor, the sitting-rooms being in the centralblock of the buildings. Of these bedrooms the first is Dr. Roylott's, the second my sister's, and the third myown. There is nocommunication between them, butthey all open out into the samecorridor. Do Imake myself plain?"

"Perfectlyso."

"The windows of the threerooms open out upon the lawn. That fatal night Dr. Roylott had gone to his roomearly, though weknew that he had not retired torest, for my sister was troubled by the smell of the strong Indian cigars whichit was his custom to smoke. Sheleft her room,therefore, and came into mine, where she sat forsome time, chatting about her approaching wedding. At eleven o'clock she rose to leave me, butshe paused at the door and looked back.

" 'Tellme, Helen,' said she, 'have youever heard anyone whistle in the dead of the night?'

" 'Never,' said I.

" 'Isuppose that youcould not possibly whistle, yourself, in your sleep?'

" 'Certainly not. But why?'

" 'Becauseduring the lastfew nights I have always, aboutthree in the morning, heard a low, clear whistle. I am a light sleeper, and it has awakened me.I cannot tell where it came from--perhaps from the next room, perhaps from the lawn. I thought that I would justask you whetheryou had heard it.'

" 'No, I have not. It mustbe those wretched gipsies in theplantation.'

"'Very likely. And yet if it were on the lawn, Iwonder that youdid not hear italso.'

" 'Ah,but I sleep moreheavily than you.'

" 'Well, itis of no greatconsequence, atany rate.' She smiled back at me, closed my door, and a few moments later I heard her key turn in the lock."

"Indeed," said Holmes. "Was it your custom alwaysto lock yourselves in at night?""Always."

"And why?"

"I think that I mentioned to you that the doctor kept acheetah and a baboon. We had nofeeling of security unless ourdoors were locked."

"Quite so.Pray proceed with your statement."

"I could notsleep that night. A vague feeling of impendingmisfortune impressed me. My sister and I, you will recollect, were twins, and you know how subtle are the linkswhich bind two souls which are so closely allied. It was a wildnight. The windwas howling outside, and the rain was beating and splashing against the windows.Suddenly, amidall the hubbub of the gale, there burst forth the wild scream ofa terrified woman. I knew thatit was my sister's voice. I sprang from my bed,wrapped a shawlround me, and rushed into the corridor. As I opened my door I seemed to hear a low whistle, suchas my sister described, and a few moments latera clanging sound, as if a massof metal had fallen. As I ran down the passage,my sister's doorwas unlocked, and revolved slowly upon its hinges. I stared atit horror-stricken, not knowingwhat was about to issue from it.By the light ofthe corridor-lamp I saw my sister appear at theopening, her face blanched withterror, her hands groping for help, her whole figure swaying toand fro like that of a drunkard. I ran to her and threw my armsround her, butat that moment her knees seemedto give way andshe fell to theground. She writhed as one who is in terrible pain, and her limbs were dreadfully convulsed. Atfirst I thoughtthat she had notrecognised me,but as I bent over her she suddenly shrieked outin a voice which I shall neverforget, 'Oh, myGod! Helen! It was the band! Thespeckled band!'There was something else whichshe would fain have said, and she stabbed with her finger into the air in the direction of the doctor's room, but a fresh convulsion seized herand choked her words. I rushed out, calling loudly for my stepfather, and I methim hastening from his room in his dressing-gown. When he reached my sister's side she was unconscious, and though he poured brandy down her throat and sent formedical aid from the village, all efforts werein vain, for sheslowly sank anddied without having recovered her consciousness. Such was the dreadful end of my beloved sister."

"One moment," said Holmes, "are you sure about this whistleand metallic sound? Could you swear to it?"

"That was what thecounty coroner asked me at the inquiry. It is mystrong impression that I heardit, and yet, among the crash ofthe gale and thecreaking of anold house, I maypossibly have been deceived.""Was your sisterdressed?"

"No,she was in hernight-dress. Inher right hand was found the charred stump of amatch, and in her left a match-box."

"Showing that she had struck a light and looked about herwhen the alarm took place. Thatis important. And what conclusions did the coroner come to?"

"He investigated the case with great care, for Dr.Roylott's conduct had long beennotorious in the county, but hewas unable to find any satisfactory cause of death. My evidenceshowed that thedoor had been fastened upon theinner side, andthe windows were blocked by old-fashioned shutters with broad iron bars, whichwere secured every night. The walls were carefully sounded, andwere shown to bequite solid allround, and theflooring was also thoroughly examined, with thesame result. Thechimney is wide, but is barredup by four largestaples. It iscertain, therefore, that my sister was quite alone when she mether end. Besides, there were nomarks of any violence upon her.""How about poison?"

"The doctors examined herfor it, but without success.""What do you think that this unfortunate lady died of, then?"

"It is my beliefthat she died ofpure fear and nervous shock, though what it wasthat frightenedher I cannot imagine."

"Were there gipsies inthe plantation at the time?"

"Yes, there are nearly always somethere."

"Ah, and what did yougather from thisallusion to a band--a speckledband?"

"Sometimes I have thought that it was merely the wild talk of delirium,sometimes that it may have referred to some bandof people, perhaps to these very gipsies in theplantation. I do not know whether the spotted handkerchiefs which so many of them wear over their heads might have suggested the strange adjective which she used."

Holmes shook his head likea man who is far from being satisfied.

"Theseare very deep waters," said he;"pray go on withyour narrative."

"Two years have passed sincethen, and my life has been untillately lonelierthan ever. A month ago, however, a dear friend,whom I have known for many years, has done me the honour to askmy hand in marriage. His name is Armitage--Percy Armitage--thesecond son of Mr. Armitage, of Crane Water, nearReading. My stepfather has offered no opposition to the match,and we are to bemarried in thecourse of the spring. Two days ago some repairswere started inthe west wing ofthe building, and my bedroom wall has been pierced, so that I have had to moveinto the chamberin which my sister died, and tosleep in the very bed in whichshe slept. Imagine, then, my thrill of terror when last night, as I lay awake, thinking over herterrible fate,I suddenly heardin the silenceof the night thelow whistle which had been theherald of her own death. I sprang up and lit thelamp, but nothing was to be seen in the room. Iwas too shakento go to bed again, however, soI dressed, and as soon as it wasdaylight I slipped down, got adog-cart at theCrown Inn, whichis opposite, and drove to Leatherhead, from whence I have comeon this morningwith the one object of seeing you and asking your advice."

"Youhave done wisely," said my friend. "But have you told me all?""Yes, all."

"Miss Roylott, youhave not. You are screening your stepfather.""Why, what do you mean?"

For answer Holmes pushed back the frill of black lacewhich fringed the hand that layupon our visitor's knee. Five little livid spots, the marks of four fingers anda thumb, were printed upon the white wrist.

"You have been cruelly used," saidHolmes.

The lady coloured deeply and covered over her injured wrist. "He is a hard man," she said, "and perhapshe hardly knowshis own strength."

There was along silence, during which Holmes leaned his chin upon his hands and stared into the cracklingfire.

"This isa very deep business," he said at last. "There are a thousand details which I should desire to know before I decide upon our course of action. Yet we have not amoment to lose.If we were to come to Stoke Moran to-day, wouldit be possiblefor us to see over these rooms without the knowledge of your stepfather?"

"As it happens, he spoke of coming into town to-day upon some most important business. It is probablethat he will beaway all day, and that there would be nothing to disturb you. We have a housekeeper now, but she is old and foolish, and I could easily get herout of the way."

"Excellent. You are not averse to this trip,Watson?"

"By nomeans."

"Thenwe shall both come. What are yougoing to do yourself?"

"I haveone or two things which I wouldwish to do nowthat I am in town. But I shall return by the twelve o'clock train, so as to be there in time foryour coming.""And you may expect us early inthe afternoon. Ihave myself some small businessmatters to attend to. Will younot wait and breakfast?"

"No, Imust go. My heart is lightenedalready since Ihave confided mytrouble to you.I shall look forward to seeingyou again this afternoon." She dropped her thickblack veil overher face and glided from the room.

"And what do you think of it all, Watson?"asked Sherlock Holmes, leaning back in his chair.

"It seems tome to be a mostdark and sinister business."

"Dark enough and sinister enough.""Yet if the lady is correct insaying that theflooring and walls are sound, and that the door, window, and chimney are impassable, then her sister must havebeen undoubtedlyalone when shemet her mysterious end."

"Whatbecomes, then, of these nocturnal whistles, andwhat of the verypeculiar wordsof the dying woman?"

"I cannotthink."

"When you combine the ideas of whistlesat night, the presence of a band of gipsies whoare on intimateterms with thisold doctor, thefact that we have every reasonto believe thatthe doctor has an interest in preventing his stepdaughter's marriage, the dyingallusion to a band, and, finally, the fact thatMiss Helen Stoner heard a metallic clang, whichmight have beencaused by one ofthose metal bars that secured the shutters falling back into its place, I thinkthat there is good ground to think that the mystery may be cleared along thoselines."

"But what, then, did the gipsies do?""I cannot imagine."

"I see manyobjections to any such theory.""And so do I.It is preciselyfor that reasonthat we are going to Stoke Moranthis day. I want to see whetherthe objectionsare fatal, or ifthey may be explained away. Butwhat in the name of the devil!"The ejaculation had been drawnfrom my companion by the fact that our door hadbeen suddenly dashed open, andthat a huge manhad framed himself in the aperture. His costumewas a peculiar mixture of the professional and of the agricultural, having a black top-hat, a long frock-coat, and a pair of high gaiters, witha hunting-crop swinging in his hand. So tall washe that his hatactually brushed the cross barof the doorway,and his breadthseemed to span it across from side to side. A large face, searedwith a thousandwrinkles, burned yellow with the sun, and marked with every evil passion, was turned from one to the other of us, while his deep-set, bile-shoteyes, and his high, thin, fleshless nose, gavehim somewhat theresemblance toa fierce old bird of prey.

"Which of you is Holmes?" asked thisapparition.

"My name, sir; butyou have the advantage of me,"said my companion quietly.

"I am Dr. Grimesby Roylott, of StokeMoran."

"Indeed, Doctor," saidHolmes blandly."Pray take a seat."

"I will donothing of thekind. My stepdaughter has been here. I have traced her. What hasshe been sayingto you?"

"It is a little coldfor the time ofthe year," saidHolmes.

"What has she been saying to you?" screamed the old manfuriously.

"But I have heard that the crocusespromise well,"continued my companion imperturbably.

"Ha! Youput me off, do you?" said our new visitor, taking a step forwardand shaking hishunting-crop. "I know you, youscoundrel! I have heard of you before. You are Holmes, the meddler."

My friendsmiled.

"Holmes, the busybody!"His smile broadened.

"Holmes,the Scotland Yard Jack-in-office!"

Holmes chuckled heartily. "Your conversation is most entertaining," said he. "When you go out close the door, for there isa decided draught."

"I will gowhen I have saidmy say. Don't you dare to meddle with my affairs. I know that Miss Stoner has been here. I traced her! I am a dangerous man tofall foul of! See here." He stepped swiftly forward, seized thepoker, and bentit into a curvewith his huge brown hands.

"Seethat you keep yourself out of my grip," he snarled, and hurlingthe twisted poker into the fireplace he strodeout of the room."He seems a very amiable person," said Holmes,laughing. "I amnot quite so bulky, but if he had remained I might have shown him that my gripwas not much more feeble than his own." As he spoke he picked upthe steel pokerand, with a sudden effort, straightened it outagain.

"Fancy his having the insolence to confound me with theofficial detective force! This incident gives zest to our investigation, however, and I only trust that our little friend will not suffer from her imprudence inallowing this brute to trace her. And now, Watson, we shall order breakfast, and afterwards I shall walk down to Doctors' Commons, where I hopeto get some data which may helpus in this matter."

It was nearly one o'clockwhen Sherlock Holmes returned from his excursion. He held in hishand a sheet ofblue paper, scrawled over withnotes and figures.

"I have seenthe will of thedeceased wife,"said he. "To determine its exact meaning I havebeen obliged towork out the present prices ofthe investmentswith which it isconcerned. Thetotal income, which at the timeof the wife's death was little short of $1100, is now, through the fall in agricultural prices,not more than $750. Each daughter can claim an income of $250, in case of marriage. It is evident, therefore, that if both girlshad married, this beauty wouldhave had a merepittance, whileeven one of themwould cripple him to a very serious extent. Mymorning's work has not been wasted, since it hasproved that hehas the very strongest motives for standing in the way of anything of the sort.And now, Watson,this is too serious for dawdling, especially asthe old man isaware that we are interesting ourselves in his affairs; so if you are ready, weshall call a caband drive to Waterloo. I shouldbe very much obliged if you would slip your revolver into yourpocket. An Eley's No. 2 is an excellent argumentwith gentlemenwho can twist steel pokers intoknots. That anda tooth-brush are, I think, allthat we need."At Waterloo we were fortunate incatching a train for Leatherhead, where we hired a trap at thestation inn anddrove for four or five miles through the lovelySurrey lanes. Itwas a perfect day, with a bright sun and a fewfleecy clouds inthe heavens. The trees and wayside hedges werejust throwing out their first green shoots, andthe air was fullof the pleasantsmell of the moist earth. To meat least therewas a strange contrast between the sweet promiseof the spring and this sinisterquest upon which we were engaged. My companionsat in the frontof the trap, his arms folded, his hat pulled down over his eyes, and his chin sunk upon his breast, buried in the deepest thought. Suddenly, however, he started, tapped me onthe shoulder, and pointed over the meadows.

"Look there!" saidhe.

A heavily timbered park stretched up in a gentle slope, thickening into a grove at the highest point. Fromamid the branches there jutted out the grey gables and high roof-tree of a veryold mansion.

"Stoke Moran?" said he.

"Yes, sir, that be the house of Dr. Grimesby Roylott," remarked the driver.

"There is some building going on there," said Holmes; "thatis where we aregoing."

"There's the village,"said the driver,pointing to a cluster of roofssome distance tothe left; "butif you want to get to the house,you'll find itshorter to get over this stile,and so by the foot-path over thefields. There it is, where thelady is walking."

"And the lady, I fancy, is Miss Stoner," observed Holmes, shading his eyes. "Yes, I think wehad better do asyou suggest."We got off, paidour fare, and the trap rattledback on its wayto Leatherhead."I thought it as well," said Holmes as we climbed the stile, "that this fellowshould think wehad come here asarchitects, oron some definitebusiness. It may stop his gossip. Good-afternoon, Miss Stoner.You see that wehave been as good as our word."Our client of the morning had hurried forward to meet us with aface which spoke her joy. "I have been waitingso eagerly for you," she cried,shaking hands with us warmly. "All has turned out splendidly. Dr. Roylott has gone to town, andit is unlikely that he will be back before evening."

"We have had the pleasureof making the doctor's acquaintance," said Holmes, and in a fewwords he sketched out what had occurred. Miss Stoner turned white to the lips asshe listened."Good heavens!"she cried, "he has followed me,then."

"So it appears."

"He isso cunning thatI never know when I am safe from him. What willhe say when hereturns?"

"He must guard himself, for he may find that there issomeone more cunning than himself upon his track. You must lockyourself up from him to-night.If he is violent, we shall takeyou away to youraunt's at Harrow. Now, we mustmake the best use of our time, so kindly take usat once to therooms which we are to examine."The building was of grey, lichen-blotched stone, with a high central portion and two curving wings, like the claws of a crab, thrown out on each side. In one of these wings the windows were broken and blocked with wooden boards, while theroof was partlycaved in, a picture of ruin. Thecentral portionwas in little better repair, but the right-handblock was comparatively modern,and the blindsin the windows,with the blue smoke curling up from the chimneys, showed that this was where thefamily resided.Some scaffolding had been erected against the end wall, and thestone-work hadbeen broken into, but there wereno signs of anyworkmen at themoment of our visit. Holmes walked slowly up anddown the ill-trimmed lawn and examined with deep attention theoutsides of thewindows.

"This,I take it, belongs to the roomin which you used to sleep, thecentre one to your sister's, andthe one next tothe main building to Dr. Roylott's chamber?"

"Exactly so. ButI am now sleeping in the middleone."

"Pendingthe alterations,as I understand. By the way, there does not seem to be any verypressing need for repairs at that end wall."

"There were none.I believe thatit was an excuseto move me frommy room."

"Ah!that is suggestive. Now, on theother side of this narrow wingruns the corridor from which these three rooms open. There are windows in it, ofcourse?"

"Yes,but very smallones. Too narrowfor anyone to pass through."

"As you both locked your doors atnight, your rooms were unapproachable from thatside. Now, would you have the kindness to go into your room andbar your shutters?"

Miss Stoner did so, and Holmes, after a careful examination through the open window, endeavoured in everyway to force theshutter open, but without success. There was noslit through which a knife could be passed to raise the bar. Then with his lenshe tested the hinges, but theywere of solid iron, built firmlyinto the massive masonry. "Hum!" said he, scratching his chin in some perplexity, "my theory certainly presentssome difficulties. No one couldpass these shutters if they were bolted. Well,we shall see ifthe inside throws any light uponthe matter."

Asmall side doorled into the whitewashed corridor from which the three bedroomsopened. Holmesrefused to examine the third chamber, so we passed at once to the second, that in which Miss Stoner was now sleeping, and in which her sister had met with her fate. It was a homely little room, with a low ceiling and a gaping fireplace, after the fashion of old country-houses. A brown chest of drawers stood in one corner, a narrow white-counterpanedbed in another,and a dressing-table on the left-hand side of the window. Thesearticles, with two small wicker-work chairs, made up all the furniture in the room save for a square of Wilton carpet in the centre. The boardsround and the panelling of the walls were of brown, worm-eaten oak, so old and discoloured thatit may have dated from the original building ofthe house. Holmes drew one of the chairs into acorner and sat silent, while hiseyes travelledround and roundand up and down,taking in everydetail of the apartment.

"Where does that bellcommunicate with?" he asked atlast pointing toa thick bell-rope which hung down beside the bed, the tassel actually lying upon the pillow.

"It goes to the housekeeper's room."

"It looks newer than the other things?"

"Yes, it was onlyput there a couple of years ago."

"Your sisterasked for it, Isuppose?"

"No,I never heard ofher using it. We used always toget what we wanted for ourselves."

"Indeed, itseemed unnecessary to put so nice a bell-pull there. You will excuse me for a few minutes whileI satisfy myself as to this floor." He threw himself down uponhis face with his lens in his hand and crawled swiftly backwardand forward, examining minutelythe cracks between the boards. Then he did the same with the wood-work with which the chamber was panelled. Finally he walked over to the bed and spent some time in staring atit and in running his eye up anddown the wall.Finally he tookthe bell-rope inhis hand and gave it a brisk tug.

"Why, it's adummy," said he.

"Won't it ring?"

"No, it isnot even attached to a wire. This is very interesting. You can see now that it is fastened to ahook just abovewhere the littleopening for theventilator is.""How very absurd! I never noticed that before."

"Very strange!" muttered Holmes, pulling at the rope. "Thereare one or two very singular points about this room. For example, what a fool abuilder must beto open a ventilator into another room, when, with the same trouble, he might have communicatedwith the outsideair!"

"That isalso quite modern," said the lady.

"Done aboutthe same time as the bell-rope?" remarked Holmes.

"Yes, therewere several little changes carried out about that time."

"Theyseem to have been of a most interesting character--dummy bell-ropes, and ventilators which do not ventilate. With your permission, Miss Stoner,we shall now carry our researches into the inner apartment."

Dr. Grimesby Roylott's chamber was larger than that of his step-daughter, but wasas plainly furnished. A camp-bed, a small wooden shelf full ofbooks, mostly ofa technical character, an armchair beside the bed, a plain wooden chair againstthe wall, a round table, and alarge iron safewere the principal things whichmet the eye. Holmes walked slowly round and examined each and all of them with the keenest interest.

"What's inhere?" he asked, tapping the safe.

"My stepfather's business papers."

"Oh! you have seen inside, then?"

"Only once, some years ago. I remember that it was full of papers.""There isn't acat in it, for example?"

"No. What a strange idea!"

"Well, look at this!" He took up a small saucer of milk which stood on thetop of it.

"No; we don't keepa cat. But thereis a cheetah and a baboon."

"Ah, yes, of course! Well, a cheetah is just a bigcat, and yet asaucer of milk does not go veryfar in satisfying its wants, I daresay. There isone point whichI should wish to determine." Hesquatted down in front of the wooden chair andexamined the seat of it with thegreatest attention.

"Thank you. That is quitesettled," said he, rising and putting his lens in his pocket. "Hullo! Here is something interesting!"

The object which had caught his eye was asmall dog lashhung on one corner of the bed. The lash, however, was curled upon itself and tied so as to makea loop of whipcord.

"What do you make of that,Watson?"

"It'sa common enoughlash. But I don't know why it should be tied.""That is not quite so common, isit? Ah, me! it's a wicked world, and when a clever man turns his brains to crime it is the worst of all. I think that I have seen enough now, Miss Stoner, andwith your permission we shall walk out upon thelawn."

I had never seen my friend's face so grim or his brow sodark as it waswhen we turned from the scene ofthis investigation. We had walked several timesup and down thelawn, neither Miss Stoner nor myself liking tobreak in upon his thoughts before he roused himself from his reverie.

"It is very essential, Miss Stoner," saidhe, "that you should absolutelyfollow my advice in every respect."

"I shall most certainly doso."

"The matter is too serious for any hesitation. Your lifemay depend uponyour compliance."

"I assure youthat I am in your hands."

"Inthe first place,both my friendand I must spendthe night in your room."

BothMiss Stoner andI gazed at him in astonishment."Yes, it must be so. Let me explain. I believethat that is thevillage inn over there?"

"Yes,that is the Crown."

"Very good. Your windows would be visiblefrom there?"

"Certainly."

"Youmust confine yourself to your room, on pretenceof a headache,when your stepfather comes back.Then when you hear him retire for the night, you must open theshutters of yourwindow, undo the hasp, put yourlamp there as asignal to us, and then withdrawquietly with everything which you are likely towant into the room which you used to occupy. Ihave no doubt that, in spite ofthe repairs, youcould manage there for one night."

"Oh, yes, easily."

"The rest you will leave in our hands.""But what willyou do?"

"We shall spend the night in your room, and we shallinvestigate thecause of this noise which has disturbed you."

"I believe, Mr. Holmes, that youhave already made up your mind,"said Miss Stoner, laying her hand upon my companion's sleeve."Perhaps I have."

"Then, for pity's sake, tellme what was thecause of my sister's death."

"Ishould prefer to have clearer proofs before I speak."

"You canat least tell me whether my ownthought is correct, and if shedied from some sudden fright.""No, I do not think so. I thinkthat there was probably some more tangible cause. And now, MissStoner, we mustleave you for ifDr. Roylott returned and saw usour journey would be in vain. Good-bye, and bebrave, for if you will do what Ihave told you,you may rest assured that we shall soon drive away the dangers that threaten you."

Sherlock Holmes and I had nodifficulty in engaging a bedroom and sitting-room at the CrownInn. They were on the upper floor, and from ourwindow we couldcommand a view of the avenue gate, and of the inhabited wing ofStoke Moran Manor House. At duskwe saw Dr. Grimesby Roylott drive past, his huge form looming up beside the little figure of the lad who drovehim. The boy hadsome slight difficulty in undoing the heavy iron gates, and weheard the hoarseroar of the doctor's voice andsaw the fury with which he shookhis clinched fists at him. Thetrap drove on, and a few minuteslater we saw asudden light spring up among thetrees as the lamp was lit in one of the sitting-rooms.

"Do youknow, Watson,"said Holmes as we sat together in the gatheringdarkness, "I have really some scruples as to taking you to-night. There is a distinct element ofdanger."

"CanI be of assistance?"

"Your presence might be invaluable."

"Then I shall certainly come."

"Itis very kind ofyou."

"You speak of danger. Youhave evidentlyseen more in these rooms than was visible to me."

"No, but I fancy that I may have deduced a little more. I imagine that you saw all that I did."

"I saw nothing remarkable save the bell-rope, and what purpose that could answer I confess is more than I can imagine."

"You saw the ventilator, too?"

"Yes, but I do notthink that it issuch a very unusual thing to have a small opening between two rooms. It was sosmall that a ratcould hardly pass through."

"Iknew that we should find a ventilator before ever we came to Stoke Moran."

"Mydear Holmes!""Oh, yes, I did.You remember inher statement she said that hersister could smell Dr. Roylott's cigar. Now, ofcourse that suggested at once that there must be a communication between the two rooms. It could only be a small one, or it would have been remarked upon at the coroner's inquiry. I deduced aventilator."

"But what harm can there be in that?"

"Well, there is at least acurious coincidence of dates. Aventilator is made, a cord is hung, and a ladywho sleeps in the bed dies. Doesnot that strikeyou?"

"I cannot as yet see anyconnection."

"Did you observeanything very peculiar about that bed?"

"No.""It was clampedto the floor. Did you ever see abed fastened like that before?""I cannot saythat I have."

"The lady could not move her bed.It must alwaysbe in the same relative positionto the ventilator and to the rope--or so we maycall it, sinceit was clearly never meant for abell-pull."

"Holmes," I cried,"I seem to seedimly what you are hinting at. We are only justin time to prevent some subtle and horrible crime."

"Subtle enough and horribleenough. When adoctor does go wrong he is the first of criminals. He has nerveand he has knowledge. Palmer andPritchard wereamong the headsof their profession. This man strikes even deeper, but I think,Watson, that weshall be able tostrike deeper still. But we shall have horrorsenough before the night is over;for goodness' sake let us havea quiet pipe andturn our mindsfor a few hoursto something more cheerful."

About nine o'clockthe light amongthe trees was extinguished, andall was dark inthe direction of the Manor House. Two hours passed slowly away,and then, suddenly, just at thestroke of eleven, a single bright light shone out right in front of us.

"Thatis our signal,"said Holmes, springing to his feet; "it comes from the middle window."

As we passed out he exchanged a few words with the landlord, explainingthat we were going on a late visit to an acquaintance, and thatit was possiblethat we might spend the night there. A moment later we were outon the dark road, a chill wind blowing in our faces, and one yellow light twinkling in front ofus through the gloom to guide uson our sombre errand.

There was little difficulty in enteringthe grounds, forunrepaired breaches gaped in the old park wall.Making our wayamong the trees,we reached thelawn, crossed it, and were aboutto enter through the window when out from a clump of laurel bushes there dartedwhat seemed tobe a hideous anddistorted child, who threw itself upon the grass with writhinglimbs and then ran swiftly across the lawn intothe darkness.

"My God!" I whispered; "did you see it?"

Holmeswas for the moment as startled as I. His hand closed like a viceupon my wrist in his agitation.Then he broke into a low laughand put his lipsto my ear.

"Itis a nice household," he murmured. "That is thebaboon."

I hadforgotten the strange pets which the doctor affected. There wasa cheetah, too;perhaps we might find it upon our shoulders atany moment. I confess that I felt easier in my mind when, afterfollowing Holmes' example and slipping off my shoes, I found myself inside the bedroom. My companion noiselesslyclosed the shutters, moved thelamp onto the table, and cast his eyes round theroom. All was as we had seen itin the daytime.Then creeping up to me and making a trumpet ofhis hand, he whispered into my ear again so gently that it was all that I coulddo to distinguish the words:

"The least sound would be fatal toour plans."

Inodded to show that I had heard."We must sit without light. Hewould see it through the ventilator."

I noddedagain.

"Do notgo asleep; yourvery life may depend upon it. Have your pistolready in case weshould need it.I will sit on the side of the bed, and you in that chair."

I took out my revolver and laid iton the corner ofthe table.

Holmes had broughtup a long thin cane, and this heplaced upon thebed beside him.By it he laid the box of matches and the stumpof a candle. Then he turned downthe lamp, and we were left in darkness.

How shall I ever forget that dreadfulvigil? I could not hear a sound,not even the drawing of a breath, and yet I knew that my companion sat open-eyed, within a fewfeet of me, in the same state ofnervous tensionin which I wasmyself. The shutters cut off theleast ray of light, and we waited in absolute darkness.

From outside came theoccasional cry of a night-bird,and once at ourvery window a long drawn catlikewhine, which told us that the cheetah was indeed at liberty. Far away we couldhear the deep tones of the parish clock, which boomed out everyquarter of an hour. How long they seemed, thosequarters! Twelvestruck, and oneand two and three, and still wesat waiting silently for whatever might befall.Suddenly therewas the momentary gleam of a light up in the direction of the ventilator, whichvanished immediately, but was succeeded by a strong smell of burning oil and heated metal. Someone in the nextroom had lit a dark-lantern. I heard a gentle sound of movement,and then all was silent once more, though the smell grew stronger. For half anhour I sat withstraining ears.Then suddenly another sound became audible--a very gentle, soothing sound, likethat of a smalljet of steam escaping continually from a kettle.The instant that we heard it, Holmes sprang from the bed, struck a match, and lashed furiouslywith his cane atthe bell-pull."You see it, Watson?" he yelled. "You see it?"But I saw nothing. At the moment when Holmes struck the light Iheard a low, clear whistle, butthe sudden glare flashing intomy weary eyes made it impossiblefor me to tellwhat it was at which my friend lashed so savagely. I could, however, see that his face was deadly pale and filled with horror and loathing. He had ceased to strike and was gazing up at the ventilator when suddenly there broke from the silence of the nightthe most horrible cry to which Ihave ever listened. It swelledup louder and louder, a hoarse yell of pain andfear and anger all mingled in the one dreadful shriek. They saythat away down in the village, and even in the distant parsonage, that cry raised the sleepers from their beds.It struck cold to our hearts, and I stood gazingat Holmes, andhe at me, untilthe last echoesof it had died away into the silence from whichit rose.

"Whatcan it mean?" Igasped.

"It means that it is all over," Holmesanswered. "And perhaps, after all, it is for thebest. Take yourpistol, and wewill enter Dr. Roylott's room."With a grave face he lit the lamp and led the way down the corridor. Twice he struck at the chamber door without any reply fromwithin. Then heturned the handle and entered,I at his heels,with the cockedpistol in my hand.

It was a singular sight which met our eyes.On the table stood a dark-lantern with the shutter half open, throwing a brilliant beam of lightupon the iron safe, the door ofwhich was ajar.Beside this table, on the wooden chair, sat Dr.Grimesby Roylott clad in a longgrey dressing-gown, his bare ankles protrudingbeneath, and hisfeet thrust into red heelless Turkish slippers.Across his laplay the short stock with the long lash which wehad noticed during the day. Hischin was cockedupward and his eyes were fixed in a dreadful, rigid stare at thecorner of the ceiling. Round his brow he had apeculiar yellowband, with brownish speckles, which seemed to bebound tightly round his head. As we entered hemade neither sound nor motion."The band! the speckled band!" whispered Holmes.I took a stepforward. In an instant his strange headgear began to move, and there reared itself from among his hair the squatdiamond-shapedhead and puffedneck of a loathsome serpent.

"It is a swamp adder!" cried Holmes; "the deadliest snake in India. He has died within ten secondsof being bitten. Violence does,in truth, recoil upon the violent, and the schemer falls into the pit which hedigs for another. Let us thrustthis creature back into its den,and we can thenremove Miss Stoner to some place of shelter andlet the countypolice know whathas happened."As he spoke hedrew the dog-whip swiftly from the dead man's lap, and throwingthe noose roundthe reptile's neck he drew it from its horrid perch and, carrying it at arm's length, threw it into the iron safe, which he closed upon it.

Such are the true facts of the death of Dr. Grimesby Roylott, of Stoke Moran. It isnot necessary that I should prolong a narrativewhich has already run to too great a length bytelling how we broke the sad news to the terrified girl, how weconveyed her bythe morning train to the care ofher good aunt at Harrow, of howthe slow process of official inquiry came to the conclusion that the doctor methis fate whileindiscreetly playing with a dangerous pet. The little which I had yet to learn of the case was told me by Sherlock Holmes as wetravelled back next day.

"I had," said he, "come to an entirelyerroneous conclusion which shows, my dear Watson, how dangerousit always is toreason from insufficient data.The presence ofthe gipsies, andthe use of theword 'band,' which was used by the poor girl, nodoubt, to explain the appearance which she hadcaught a hurriedglimpse of by the light of hermatch, were sufficient to put meupon an entirely wrong scent. Ican only claimthe merit that Iinstantly reconsidered my position when, however, it became clear to me that whatever danger threatened an occupant of the roomcould not comeeither from thewindow or the door. My attentionwas speedily drawn, as I have already remarkedto you, to thisventilator, andto the bell-ropewhich hung downto the bed. Thediscovery thatthis was a dummy, and that the bed was clamped to the floor, instantly gave riseto the suspicion that the ropewas there as a bridge for something passing through the hole andcoming to the bed. The idea ofa snake instantly occurred to me, and when I coupled it with myknowledge that the doctor was furnished with a supply of creatures from India, Ifelt that I wasprobably on theright track. The idea of usinga form of poisonwhich could notpossibly be discovered by any chemical test wasjust such a oneas would occurto a clever andruthless man whohad had an Eastern training. The rapidity withwhich such a poison would take effect would also, from his pointof view, be anadvantage. It would be a sharp-eyed coroner, indeed, who could distinguish the two little dark punctures which would show wherethe poison fangshad done theirwork. Then I thought of the whistle. Of course he must recall the snake before the morning lightrevealed it tothe victim. He had trained it, probably by the use of the milk which we saw, toreturn to him when summoned. Hewould put it through this ventilator at the hourthat he thoughtbest, with thecertainty that it would crawl down the rope andland on the bed.It might or might not bite theoccupant, perhaps she might escape every night for a week, but sooner or later she must fall a victim.

"I had come to these conclusions beforeever I had entered his room. Aninspection of his chair showed me that he had been in the habitof standing on it, which of course would be necessary in order that he should reach the ventilator. The sight ofthe safe, the saucer of milk, and the loop of whipcord were enough to finally dispel any doubtswhich may haveremained. The metallic clang heard by Miss Stoner was obviouslycaused by her stepfather hastilyclosing the door of his safe upon its terribleoccupant. Havingonce made up mymind, you knowthe steps whichI took in orderto put the matter to the proof.I heard the creature hiss as I have no doubt that you did also,and I instantlylit the light and attacked it.""With the result of driving itthrough the ventilator."

"And also with the result of causing it to turn upon its master at theother side. Some of the blows of my cane came home and roused its snakish temper, so that it flew upon the first person it saw.In this way I am no doubt indirectly responsible for Dr. Grimesby Roylott's death, and I cannotsay that it islikely to weighvery heavily upon my conscience."

IX.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE ENGINEER'S THUMBOf all the problems which have been submitted tomy friend, Mr.Sherlock Holmes,for solution during the years of our intimacy,there were onlytwo which I wasthe means of introducing to hisnotice--that ofMr. Hatherley'sthumb, and thatof Colonel Warburton's madness.Of these the latter may have afforded a finer field for an acuteand original observer, but theother was so strange in its inception and so dramatic in its details that it maybe the more worthy of being placed upon record,even if it gavemy friend feweropenings for those deductive methods of reasoning by which he achieved such remarkable results.The story has,I believe, beentold more than once in the newspapers, but, likeall such narratives, its effectis much less striking when setforth en bloc ina single half-column of print than when the facts slowly evolvebefore your owneyes, and the mystery clears gradually away aseach new discovery furnishes a step which leadson to the complete truth. At thetime the circumstances made a deep impression upon me, and thelapse of two years has hardly served to weaken the effect.

It was in the summerof '89, not long after my marriage, that the events occurred which I am now about to summarise.I had returnedto civil practice and had finally abandoned Holmes in his BakerStreet rooms, although I continually visited himand occasionally even persuadedhim to forgo his Bohemian habits so far as to come and visit us. My practice had steadily increased, and as I happened to liveat no very greatdistance from Paddington Station, I got a few patients from among the officials. One of these,whom I had curedof a painful and lingering disease, was never weary of advertising my virtues and of endeavouring to send me onevery suffererover whom he might have any influence.

One morning, at a littlebefore seven o'clock, I was awakened by the maid tapping at thedoor to announce that two men had come from Paddington and werewaiting in theconsulting-room.I dressed hurriedly, for I knewby experience that railway cases were seldom trivial, and hastened downstairs.As I descended,my old ally, theguard, came outof the room andclosed the doortightly behindhim.

"I've gothim here," he whispered, jerkinghis thumb overhis shoulder; "he's all right.""What is it, then?" I asked, for his manner suggested that it was some strangecreature which he had caged up in my room.

"It's a new patient," he whispered."I thought I'd bring him round myself; then he couldn't slip away. There he is,all safe and sound. I must go now, Doctor; I have my dooties, just the same as you." And off hewent, this trusty tout, withouteven giving me time to thank him.

I entered myconsulting-roomand found a gentleman seated bythe table. He was quietly dressed in a suit of heather tweed with a soft cloth cap which he hadlaid down upon my books. Round one of his handshe had a handkerchief wrapped, which was mottledall over with bloodstains. He was young, not more than five-and-twenty, I should say, with a strong, masculineface; but he wasexceedingly pale and gave me the impression ofa man who was suffering from some strong agitation, which it took all his strength of mind to control.

"I am sorry to knock youup so early, Doctor," said he,"but I have hada very serious accident during the night. I camein by train this morning, and on inquiring at Paddington as towhere I might find a doctor, a worthy fellow very kindly escorted me here. I gave the maid a card, but I see that she has left it upon the side-table."

I tookit up and glanced at it. "Mr. Victor Hatherley,hydraulic engineer, 16A, Victoria Street (3rd floor)." That wasthe name, style,and abode of mymorning visitor. "I regret thatI have kept youwaiting," saidI, sitting downin my library-chair. "You are fresh from a nightjourney, I understand, which isin itself a monotonous occupation."

"Oh, my night could not becalled monotonous," said he, and laughed. He laughed very heartily, with a high, ringing note,leaning back inhis chair and shaking his sides.All my medicalinstincts rose up against that laugh.

"Stop it!" I cried; "pullyourself together!" and I poured out some waterfrom a caraffe.It was useless, however. He was off in one ofthose hystericaloutbursts whichcome upon a strong nature whensome great crisis is over and gone. Presently hecame to himselfonce more, veryweary and pale-looking.

"I have been making afool of myself,"he gasped.

"Not at all. Drinkthis." I dashedsome brandy intothe water, andthe colour beganto come back tohis bloodless cheeks.

"That'sbetter!" said he. "And now, Doctor, perhaps youwould kindly attend to my thumb,or rather to the place where mythumb used to be."

He unwoundthe handkerchiefand held out his hand. It gaveeven my hardenednerves a shudder to look at it.There were fourprotruding fingers and a horridred, spongy surface where the thumb should havebeen. It had been hacked or torn right out fromthe roots.

"Good heavens!" I cried, "this is aterrible injury. It must have bled considerably."

"Yes, it did. I fainted whenit was done, and I think that Imust have beensenseless for along time. WhenI came to I found that it was still bleeding, soI tied one endof my handkerchief very tightlyround the wristand braced it upwith a twig.""Excellent! Youshould have beena surgeon."

"It is a questionof hydraulics, you see, and camewithin my own province."

"Thishas been done,"said I, examining the wound, "by a very heavy and sharp instrument."

"A thinglike a cleaver,"said he.

"An accident, I presume?"

"By no means."

"What! a murderous attack?"

"Very murderous indeed."

"You horrify me."I sponged the wound, cleaned it,dressed it, andfinally coveredit over with cotton wadding andcarbolised bandages. He lay back without wincing, though he bithis lip from time to time.

"How is that?" I asked when I had finished.

"Capital! Between yourbrandy and yourbandage, I feela new man. I was very weak, butI have had a good deal to go through."

"Perhaps you had betternot speak of the matter. It isevidently tryingto your nerves."

"Oh, no, notnow. I shall have to tell my tale to the police;but, between ourselves, if it were not for theconvincing evidence of this wound of mine, I should be surprisedif they believed my statement,for it is a veryextraordinary one, and I have not much in the way of proof withwhich to back it up; and, evenif they believeme, the clues which I can give them are so vaguethat it is a question whether justice will be done."

"Ha!" cried I, "if it isanything in thenature of a problem which you desire to see solved, I should strongly recommendyou to come to my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, before you go tothe official police."

"Oh, I have heard of thatfellow," answered my visitor, "and I should bevery glad if hewould take the matter up, thoughof course I must use the official police as well. Would you give me an introduction to him?"

"I'll do better.I'll take you round to him myself."

"I should be immensely obliged to you."

"We'll call a caband go together.We shall just be in time to have a little breakfast with him. Do you feel equalto it?"

"Yes;I shall not feeleasy until I have told my story."

"Then my servant will call acab, and I shall be with you inan instant." Irushed upstairs,explained the matter shortly tomy wife, and infive minutes was inside a hansom, driving withmy new acquaintance to Baker Street.

Sherlock Holmes was, as Iexpected, lounging about his sitting-room in hisdressing-gown,reading the agony column of TheTimes and smoking his before-breakfast pipe, which was composedof all the plugsand dottles left from his smokes of the day before, all carefully dried and collected on the corner of the mantelpiece. He received us in his quietly genial fashion, ordered fresh rashers andeggs, and joined us in a heartymeal. When it was concluded hesettled our newacquaintance upon the sofa, placed a pillow beneath his head, and laid a glass of brandy and water within his reach.

"It is easy to see that your experience has been no commonone, Mr. Hatherley," said he. "Pray, lie down there and make yourself absolutely at home. Tellus what you can,but stop when you are tired andkeep up your strength with a little stimulant.""Thank you," said my patient."but I have feltanother man since the doctor bandaged me, and Ithink that yourbreakfast has completed the cure. I shall takeup as little ofyour valuable time as possible,so I shall startat once upon mypeculiar experiences."

Holmessat in his big armchair with theweary, heavy-lidded expressionwhich veiled hiskeen and eagernature, while Isat opposite tohim, and we listened in silenceto the strange story which our visitor detailedto us.

"You must know," said he, "that I am anorphan and a bachelor, residingalone in lodgings in London. Byprofession I ama hydraulic engineer, and I havehad considerable experience ofmy work during the seven years that I was apprenticed to Venner& Matheson, thewell-known firm,of Greenwich. Two years ago, having served my time, and havingalso come into afair sum of money through my poor father's death, I determinedto start in business for myselfand took professional chambers in Victoria Street.

"I suppose that everyone finds his first independent start in business a dreary experience.To me it has been exceptionallyso. During two years I have hadthree consultations and one small job, and thatis absolutely all that my profession has broughtme. My gross takings amount to$27 10s. Every day, from nine inthe morning until four in the afternoon, I waited in my littleden, until at last my heart began to sink, and Icame to believethat I should never have any practice at all."Yesterday, however, just as I was thinking of leaving the office, my clerk entered to say therewas a gentlemanwaiting who wished to see me upon business. Hebrought up a card, too, with thename of 'Colonel Lysander Stark' engraved uponit. Close at hisheels came thecolonel himself,a man rather over the middle size, but of an exceeding thinness. I do not thinkthat I have ever seen so thin aman. His wholeface sharpened away into nose and chin, and theskin of his cheeks was drawn quite tense over his outstanding bones. Yet this emaciation seemedto be his natural habit, and dueto no disease,for his eye wasbright, his stepbrisk, and hisbearing assured.He was plainlybut neatly dressed, and his age,I should judge,would be nearerforty than thirty.

" 'Mr. Hatherley?' said he,with somethingof a German accent. 'You have been recommended to me, Mr. Hatherley, as being aman who is not only proficient in his professionbut is also discreet and capable of preservinga secret.'

"I bowed, feeling asflattered as any young man would at such an address. 'May I askwho it was whogave me so gooda character?'

"'Well, perhapsit is better that I should not tell you that just at this moment. I have it fromthe same sourcethat you are both an orphan anda bachelor andare residing alone in London.'" 'That is quitecorrect,' I answered; 'but youwill excuse me if I say that I cannot see how all this bears upon my professional qualifications. I understand that it was on aprofessional matter that you wished to speak tome?'

" 'Undoubtedly so. But youwill find thatall I say is really to the point. I have a professional commission for you, butabsolute secrecyis quite essential--absolute secrecy, you understand, and of course we may expect that more from a man who is alone than from one who lives inthe bosom of hisfamily.'

" 'IfI promise to keep a secret,' said I, 'you may absolutely dependupon my doing so.'

"He lookedvery hard at meas I spoke, andit seemed to methat I had neverseen so suspicious and questioning an eye.

" 'Do you promise,then?' said he at last.

" 'Yes,I promise.'

"'Absolute and complete silence before, during, and after? No reference to the matter at all, either in word or writing?'

" 'I have already given you my word.'" 'Very good.'He suddenly sprang up, and darting like lightning across the room he flung openthe door. The passage outside was empty.

" 'That's all right,'said he, comingback. 'I know that clerks are sometimes curiousas to their master's affairs. Now we can talk insafety.' He drew up his chair very close to mine and began to stare at me againwith the same questioning and thoughtful look."A feeling of repulsion, and ofsomething akinto fear had begun to rise withinme at the strange antics of this fleshless man.Even my dread of losing a client could not restrain me from showing my impatience.

" 'I beg that you will state your business,sir,' said I; 'my time is of value.' Heaven forgive me for thatlast sentence,but the words came to my lips." 'How would fifty guineas for anight's work suit you?' he asked.

" 'Most admirably.'

" 'I say a night's work, but an hour'swould be nearerthe mark. I simply want your opinion about a hydraulic stampingmachine which has got out of gear. If you show us what is wrongwe shall soon set it right ourselves. What do you think of sucha commission asthat?'

" 'The work appears to be light and thepay munificent.'" 'Precisely so. We shall wantyou to come to-night by the last train.'

" 'Where to?'

" 'ToEyford, in Berkshire. It is a little place nearthe borders of Oxfordshire, andwithin seven miles of Reading. There is a trainfrom Paddingtonwhich would bring you there at about 11:15.'

"'Very good.'

"'I shall come down in a carriageto meet you.'" 'There is a drive, then?'

" 'Yes, our littleplace is quite out in the country. It is a goodseven miles fromEyford Station.'

" 'Then we can hardly get there before midnight. I suppose there would be nochance of a train back. I shouldbe compelled tostop the night.'

" 'Yes, we could easily giveyou a shake-down.'

" 'That is very awkward. Could I not come atsome more convenient hour?'

"'We have judgedit best that youshould come late. It is to recompense you for any inconveniencethat we are paying to you, a young and unknownman, a fee whichwould buy an opinion from the very heads of your profession. Still, of course,if you would like to draw out ofthe business, there is plenty of time to do so.'

"I thought ofthe fifty guineas, and of how very useful theywould be to me.'Not at all,' said I, 'I shall be very happy toaccommodate myself to your wishes. I should like, however, to understand a little more clearly what it is that you wish me to do.'

" 'Quite so.It is very natural that the pledge of secrecy which we have exacted from you should have aroused your curiosity. I have no wishto commit you to anything without your having it all laid before you. I supposethat we are absolutely safe from eavesdroppers?'

" 'Entirely.'" 'Then the matter stands thus. You are probably aware that fuller's-earth isa valuable product, and that itis only found inone or two places in England?'" 'I have heardso.'

" 'Some little time ago Ibought a smallplace--a very small place--within ten miles of Reading. I was fortunate enough to discover thatthere was a deposit of fuller's-earth in one ofmy fields. On examining it, however, I found that this deposit was a comparatively small one, and that it formeda link betweentwo very much larger ones upon the right and left--both of them,however, in thegrounds of my neighbours. Thesegood people were absolutely ignorant that theirland containedthat which was quite as valuableas a gold-mine.Naturally, it was to my interest to buy their land before theydiscovered its true value, but unfortunately I had no capital bywhich I could do this. I took afew of my friends into the secret, however, andthey suggestedthat we should quietly and secretly work our ownlittle depositand that in thisway we should earn the money which would enableus to buy the neighbouring fields. This we havenow been doingfor some time, and in order to help us in our operations we erected a hydraulicpress. This press, as I have already explained,has got out of order, and we wish your advice upon the subject.We guard our secret very jealously, however, andif it once became known that wehad hydraulic engineers comingto our little house, it would soon rouse inquiry, and then, if the facts came out, it would be good-bye to any chance of gettingthese fields and carrying out our plans. That is why I have made you promise methat you will not tell a humanbeing that you are going to Eyford to-night. I hope that I makeit all plain?'" 'I quite follow you,' said I.'The only pointwhich I could not quite understand was what useyou could make of a hydraulic press in excavating fuller's-earth, which, as I understand, is dugout like gravelfrom a pit.'

"'Ah!' said he carelessly, 'we have our own process. We compressthe earth intobricks, so as toremove them without revealing what they are. But that is a meredetail. I havetaken you fullyinto my confidence now, Mr. Hatherley, and I have shown you howI trust you.' Herose as he spoke. 'I shall expect you, then, atEyford at 11:15.'

" 'I shall certainly be there.'

" 'And nota word to a soul.' He looked atme with a last long, questioninggaze, and then,pressing my hand in a cold, dank grasp, he hurried from the room.

"Well, whenI came to thinkit all over in cool blood I wasvery much astonished, as you mayboth think, atthis sudden commission which hadbeen intrustedto me. On the one hand, of course, I was glad, for the fee was at least tenfoldwhat I should have asked had I set a price uponmy own services,and it was possible that this order might leadto other ones. On the other hand, the face and manner of my patron had made an unpleasant impression upon me, and I could not think that his explanation of thefuller's-earth was sufficient toexplain the necessity for my coming at midnight, and his extreme anxiety lest Ishould tell anyone of my errand. However, I threw all fears tothe winds, ate ahearty supper,drove to Paddington, and startedoff, having obeyed to the letter the injunctionas to holding my tongue.

"At Reading I had tochange not onlymy carriage butmy station. However, I was in time for the lasttrain to Eyford,and I reached the little dim-lit station aftereleven o'clock.I was the only passenger who gotout there, andthere was no oneupon the platform save a singlesleepy porter with a lantern. As I passed out through the wicket gate, however,I found my acquaintance of themorning waitingin the shadow upon the other side. Without a word he grasped myarm and hurriedme into a carriage, the door ofwhich was standing open. He drewup the windowson either side,tapped on the wood-work, and away we went as fast as the horse could go."

"Onehorse?" interjected Holmes.

"Yes, only one."

"Did you observethe colour?"

"Yes, I saw it bythe side-lightswhen I was stepping into the carriage. It was achestnut."

"Tired-looking or fresh?"

"Oh, fresh and glossy.""Thank you. I amsorry to have interrupted you.Pray continue your most interesting statement.""Away we went then, and we drove for at least an hour. ColonelLysander Stark had said that itwas only seven miles, but I should think, from the rate that weseemed to go, and from the timethat we took, that it must havebeen nearer twelve. He sat at myside in silenceall the time, and I was aware,more than once when I glanced inhis direction,that he was looking at me with great intensity.The country roads seem to be notvery good in that part of the world, for we lurched and joltedterribly. I tried to look out ofthe windows tosee something ofwhere we were,but they were made of frosted glass, and I couldmake out nothing save the occasional bright blur of a passing light. Now and then I hazarded some remark to break the monotonyof the journey,but the colonelanswered only inmonosyllables,and the conversation soon flagged. At last, however, the bumpingof the road wasexchanged for the crisp smoothness of a gravel-drive, and the carriage came toa stand. ColonelLysander Starksprang out, and,as I followed after him, pulledme swiftly intoa porch which gaped in front ofus. We stepped,as it were, right out of the carriage and intothe hall, so that I failed to catch the most fleeting glance ofthe front of thehouse. The instant that I had crossed the threshold the door slammed heavily behind us, and I heard faintly therattle of the wheels as the carriage drove away.

"It was pitchdark inside thehouse, and thecolonel fumbledabout looking for matches and muttering under his breath. Suddenly a door openedat the other end of the passage, and a long, golden bar of light shot out in our direction. Itgrew broader, and a woman appeared with a lamp in her hand, which she held aboveher head, pushing her face forward and peeringat us. I could see that she waspretty, and fromthe gloss withwhich the lightshone upon her dark dress I knewthat it was a rich material. She spoke a few words in a foreigntongue in a tone as though asking a question, and when my companion answered ina gruff monosyllable she gave such a start thatthe lamp nearlyfell from her hand. Colonel Stark went up to her, whispered something in her ear, and then, pushing her back into the room fromwhence she hadcome, he walkedtowards me againwith the lamp in his hand.

" 'Perhaps you willhave the kindness to wait in this room for a few minutes,' saidhe, throwing open another door.It was a quiet,little, plainlyfurnished room,with a round table in the centre, on which several German bookswere scattered.Colonel Stark laid down the lamp on the top ofa harmonium beside the door. 'Ishall not keep you waiting an instant,' said he,and vanished into the darkness."I glanced atthe books upon the table, and inspite of my ignorance of GermanI could see that two of them were treatises onscience, the others being volumes of poetry. Then I walked across to the window,hoping that I might catch someglimpse of the country-side, butan oak shutter,heavily barred,was folded across it. It was awonderfully silent house. Therewas an old clockticking loudlysomewhere in thepassage, but otherwise everything was deadly still. A vague feeling of uneasiness began to steal over me. Who were these Germanpeople, and what were they doing living in thisstrange, out-of-the-way place?And where was the place? I was ten miles or so from Eyford, thatwas all I knew,but whether north, south, east,or west I had no idea. For thatmatter, Reading, and possibly other large towns, were within that radius, so the place might not be so secluded, after all. Yetit was quite certain, from theabsolute stillness, that we werein the country.I paced up anddown the room, humming a tune under my breath tokeep up my spirits and feelingthat I was thoroughly earning myfifty-guinea fee.

"Suddenly, without any preliminary sound inthe midst of theutter stillness, the door of myroom swung slowly open. The woman was standingin the aperture,the darkness ofthe hall behindher, the yellowlight from my lamp beating uponher eager and beautiful face. Icould see at aglance that shewas sick with fear, and the sight sent a chill to my own heart.She held up oneshaking finger to warn me to besilent, and sheshot a few whispered words of broken English atme, her eyes glancing back, likethose of a frightened horse, into the gloom behind her.

" 'I would go,' said she, trying hard,as it seemed tome, to speak calmly; 'I would go. I should notstay here. Thereis no good foryou to do.'

" 'But, madam,' said I, 'I have notyet done what Icame for. I cannot possibly leave until I haveseen the machine.'

" 'It is notworth your while to wait,' shewent on. 'You can pass through the door; no onehinders.' And then, seeing thatI smiled and shook my head, shesuddenly threw aside her constraint and made a step forward, with her hands wrung together. 'Forthe love of Heaven!' she whispered, 'get away from here beforeit is too late!'"But I am somewhat headstrongby nature, and the more ready toengage in an affair when thereis some obstaclein the way. I thought of my fifty-guinea fee, of my wearisome journey, and of the unpleasant night which seemedto be before me. Was it all togo for nothing?Why should I slink away withouthaving carried out my commission, and without the payment whichwas my due? Thiswoman might, for all I knew, bea monomaniac. With a stout bearing, therefore,though her manner had shaken memore than I cared to confess, Istill shook my head and declaredmy intention ofremaining whereI was. She wasabout to renew her entreaties when a door slammed overhead, andthe sound of several footsteps was heard upon the stairs. She listened for an instant, threw upher hands with adespairing gesture, and vanished as suddenly and as noiselesslyas she had come.

"The newcomers were Colonel Lysander Stark and a short thickman with a chinchilla beard growing out of the creases of his double chin, who was introduced tome as Mr. Ferguson.

" 'This ismy secretary and manager,' saidthe colonel. 'By the way, I wasunder the impression that I left this door shutjust now. I fear that you havefelt the draught.'

" 'On the contrary,' said I,'I opened the door myself because I felt the room to be a little close.'

"He shot one of his suspicious looksat me. 'Perhapswe had better proceed to business, then,' said he. 'Mr. Fergusonand I will takeyou up to see the machine.'

"'I had better put my hat on, I suppose.'

" 'Oh,no, it is in the house.'

" 'What, you dig fuller's-earth in the house?'

" 'No, no. This is only where we compress it. But never mind that. All we wish you todo is to examine the machine and to let us knowwhat is wrong with it.'

"We went upstairs together, the colonel first with thelamp, the fat manager and I behind him. It wasa labyrinth of an old house, with corridors, passages, narrow winding staircases, and little lowdoors, the thresholds of whichwere hollowed out by the generations who had crossed them. Therewere no carpetsand no signs ofany furniture above the groundfloor, while theplaster was peeling off the walls, and the dampwas breaking through in green,unhealthy blotches. I tried to put on as unconcerned an air as possible, but I had not forgottenthe warnings ofthe lady, eventhough I disregarded them, and Ikept a keen eyeupon my two companions. Ferguson appeared to bea morose and silent man, but Icould see from the little that he said that he was at least a fellow-countryman."Colonel Lysander Stark stopped at last beforea low door, which he unlocked.Within was a small, square room,in which the three of us couldhardly get at one time. Fergusonremained outside, and the colonel ushered me in.

" 'We are now,' said he, 'actually within thehydraulic press, and it would be a particularlyunpleasant thing for us if anyone were to turnit on. The ceiling of this smallchamber is really the end of the descending piston, and it comes down with theforce of many tons upon this metal floor. Thereare small lateral columns of water outside whichreceive the force, and which transmit and multiply it in the manner which is familiar to you. The machine goesreadily enough,but there is some stiffness in the working of it, and it has lost a little of its force. Perhapsyou will have the goodness to look it over andto show us how we can set it right.'

"I took the lamp from him,and I examinedthe machine verythoroughly. Itwas indeed a gigantic one, and capable of exercising enormous pressure. When I passed outside, however, and pressed down the levers which controlled it, I knewat once by the whishing sound that there was a slight leakage, which allowed a regurgitation ofwater through one of the side cylinders. An examination showed that one of the india-rubber bands which was round the head of adriving-rod hadshrunk so as notquite to fill the socket alongwhich it worked.This was clearly the cause of the loss of power, and I pointedit out to my companions, who followed my remarksvery carefullyand asked several practical questions as to howthey should proceed to set it right. When I hadmade it clear tothem, I returned to the main chamber of the machine and took agood look at itto satisfy my own curiosity. Itwas obvious at aglance that thestory of the fuller's-earth wasthe merest fabrication, for itwould be absurdto suppose thatso powerful an engine could be designed for so inadequate a purpose. The walls were of wood, butthe floor consisted of a largeiron trough, andwhen I came toexamine it I could see a crust of metallic deposit all over it.I had stooped and was scraping at this to see exactly what it was when I heard amuttered exclamation in Germanand saw the cadaverous face of the colonel looking down at me." 'What are youdoing there?' heasked.

"I feltangry at havingbeen tricked byso elaborate astory as that which he had toldme. 'I was admiring your fuller's-earth,' said I; 'I think thatI should be better able to advise you as to yourmachine if I knew what the exact purpose was for which it was used.'

"The instant that I uttered the words I regretted the rashness of my speech. His face sethard, and a baleful light sprang up in his greyeyes.

" 'Verywell,' said he,'you shall knowall about the machine.' He tooka step backward,slammed the little door, and turned the key inthe lock. I rushed towards it and pulled at thehandle, but it was quite secure,and did not give in the least to my kicks and shoves. 'Hullo!'I yelled. 'Hullo! Colonel! Let me out!'

"And then suddenly in the silence I heard a sound whichsent my heart into my mouth. Itwas the clank of the levers andthe swish of the leaking cylinder. He had set the engine at work. The lamp still stood upon thefloor where I had placed it when examining thetrough. By its light I saw thatthe black ceiling was coming down upon me, slowly, jerkily, but,as none knew better than myself, with a force which must withina minute grindme to a shapeless pulp. I threwmyself, screaming, against the door, and draggedwith my nails at the lock. I implored the colonel to let me out, but the remorseless clanking of the levers drowned my cries. The ceiling was only a foot or two above my head,and with my hand upraised I could feel its hard, rough surface.Then it flashedthrough my mindthat the pain of my death woulddepend very much upon the position in which I met it. If I layon my face the weight would comeupon my spine,and I shudderedto think of thatdreadful snap.Easier the otherway, perhaps; and yet, had I the nerve to lie and look up at that deadly blackshadow waveringdown upon me? Already I was unable to stand erect, when my eye caught somethingwhich brought agush of hope back to my heart."I have said that though the floor and ceiling were of iron, thewalls were of wood. As I gave alast hurried glance around, I saw a thin line of yellow light between two of the boards, whichbroadened and broadened as a small panel was pushed backward. For an instant I could hardly believe that here was indeed a doorwhich led away from death. The next instant I threw myself through, and lay half-fainting upon the other side. The panel had closed again behindme, but the crash of the lamp,and a few moments afterwards theclang of the two slabs of metal, told me how narrow had been myescape.

"I wasrecalled to myself by a franticplucking at mywrist, and I found myself lyingupon the stone floor of a narrowcorridor, whilea woman bent over me and tuggedat me with herleft hand, whileshe held a candle in her right.It was the samegood friend whose warning I hadso foolishly rejected.

" 'Come! come!' she cried breathlessly.'They will be here in a moment.They will see that you are notthere. Oh, do not waste the so-precious time, but come!'

"Thistime, at least,I did not scornher advice. I staggered to my feet and ran withher along the corridor and downa winding stair.The latter ledto another broadpassage, and just as we reachedit we heard thesound of running feet and the shouting of two voices, one answering the other from the floor onwhich we were and from the onebeneath. My guide stopped and looked about her like one who is at her wit's end.Then she threwopen a door which led into a bedroom, through the window of which the moon was shining brightly." 'It is youronly chance,' said she. 'It is high, but it maybe that you canjump it.'

"As she spoke a lightsprang into view at the furtherend of the passage, and I saw the lean figure of Colonel Lysander Stark rushingforward with alantern in one hand and a weaponlike a butcher's cleaver in theother. I rushedacross the bedroom, flung openthe window, andlooked out. Howquiet and sweetand wholesome the garden lookedin the moonlight, and it could not be more thanthirty feet down. I clambered out upon the sill,but I hesitatedto jump until Ishould have heard what passed between my saviour and the ruffian who pursued me. If she were ill-used, then atany risks I wasdetermined to goback to her assistance. The thought had hardlyflashed throughmy mind before he was at the door, pushing his way past her; butshe threw her arms round him and tried to holdhim back.

" 'Fritz! Fritz!' shecried in English, 'remember your promise afterthe last time. You said it should not be again.He will be silent! Oh, he will be silent!'

" 'You are mad, Elise!' he shouted,struggling to break away from her. 'You will bethe ruin of us.He has seen toomuch. Let me pass, I say!' He dashed her to oneside, and, rushing to the window, cut at me withhis heavy weapon. I had let myself go, and washanging by the hands to the sill, when his blowfell. I was conscious of a dullpain, my grip loosened, and I fell into the garden below.

"I was shaken but nothurt by the fall; so I picked myself up and rushed off among the bushes as hardas I could run,for I understood that I was farfrom being outof danger yet. Suddenly, however, as I ran, a deadly dizziness and sickness cameover me. I glanced down at my hand, which was throbbing painfully, and then, for the first time, saw that my thumb had been cutoff and that the blood was pouring from my wound. I endeavouredto tie my handkerchief round it, but there camea sudden buzzing in my ears, and next moment Ifell in a dead faint among the rose-bushes.

"How long I remained unconscious Icannot tell. Itmust have been avery long time,for the moon had sunk, and a bright morning wasbreaking when Icame to myself.My clothes wereall sodden withdew, and my coat-sleeve was drenched with bloodfrom my woundedthumb. The smarting of it recalled in an instant all the particulars of my night's adventure, and I sprang to my feet with thefeeling that I might hardly yetbe safe from mypursuers. But tomy astonishment, when I came tolook round me,neither house nor garden were tobe seen. I hadbeen lying in anangle of the hedge close by thehighroad, and just a little lower down was a long building, which proved, uponmy approaching it, to be the very station at which I had arrivedupon the previous night. Were it not for the ugly wound upon myhand, all thathad passed during those dreadfulhours might have been an evil dream.

"Half dazed, I went intothe station andasked about themorning train. There would be one to Reading inless than an hour. The same porter was on duty,I found, as hadbeen there whenI arrived. I inquired of him whether he had everheard of Colonel Lysander Stark. The name was strange to him. Had he observed acarriage the night before waiting for me? No, he had not. Was there a police-station anywhere near? There was one about three miles off.

"It was too far for me to go, weak and ill as I was.I determined towait until I gotback to town before telling mystory to the police. It was a little past six when I arrived, soI went first tohave my wound dressed, and thenthe doctor waskind enough to bring me along here. I put the case into your hands and shall doexactly what youadvise."

We both sat in silence for some little time after listening to this extraordinary narrative. Then Sherlock Holmes pulled down from the shelf one of the ponderous commonplace books in which he placed his cuttings."Here is an advertisement whichwill interest you," said he. "It appeared in all the papers about a year ago. Listen to this: 'Lost, on the 9thinst., Mr. Jeremiah Hayling, aged twenty-six, ahydraulic engineer. Left his lodgings at ten o'clock at night,and has not beenheard of since.Was dressed in,' etc., etc. Ha!That representsthe last time that the colonelneeded to have his machine overhauled, I fancy.""Good heavens!" cried my patient. "Then that explains what thegirl said."

"Undoubtedly. It is quite clear that the colonel was a cool and desperate man, whowas absolutelydetermined thatnothing should stand in the wayof his little game, like those out-and-out pirates who will leave no survivor from a captured ship. Well, everymoment now is precious, so if you feel equal toit we shall go down to ScotlandYard at once asa preliminary tostarting for Eyford."

Some three hours or so afterwards we were all in the train together, bound from Readingto the little Berkshire village.There were Sherlock Holmes, thehydraulic engineer, Inspector Bradstreet, of Scotland Yard, a plain-clothes man, and myself. Bradstreet had spread an ordnancemap of the county out upon the seat and was busywith his compasses drawing a circle with Eyfordfor its centre."There you are," said he. "That circle is drawn at a radius often miles fromthe village. Theplace we want must be somewherenear that line.You said ten miles, I think, sir."

"It was anhour's good drive."

"And you think that they brought you back all that way whenyou were unconscious?"

"They must have done so. I have a confused memory, too,of having beenlifted and conveyed somewhere.""What I cannotunderstand," said I, "is why they should have spared you when they found you lying fainting in the garden. Perhaps the villain was softened by the woman's entreaties."

"I hardly think that likely. I never saw a more inexorable face in my life."

"Oh, we shall soon clearup all that," said Bradstreet. "Well, I have drawn my circle, and I only wish Iknew at what point upon it the folk that we arein search of areto be found.""I think I couldlay my finger on it," said Holmes quietly.

"Really, now!" cried the inspector,"you have formed your opinion!Come, now, we shall see who agrees with you. I say it is south,for the countryis more desertedthere."

"And Isay east," saidmy patient.

"Iam for west," remarked the plain-clothes man. "There are several quiet little villages up there."

"And I am for north," said I, "because thereare no hills there, and our friend says that hedid not noticethe carriage goup any."

"Come," cried the inspector, laughing;"it's a very pretty diversity of opinion. We have boxed the compass among us. Who do you give your casting voteto?"

"You areall wrong."

"But we can't all be."

"Oh, yes, you can. This ismy point." He placed his fingerin the centre ofthe circle. "This is where we shall find them.""But the twelve-mile drive?" gasped Hatherley."Six out and six back. Nothingsimpler. You say yourself thatthe horse was fresh and glossy when you got in.How could it bethat if it had gone twelve milesover heavy roads?"

"Indeed, itis a likely ruse enough," observed Bradstreet thoughtfully. "Ofcourse there can be no doubt asto the nature of this gang."

"None at all," said Holmes. "Theyare coiners ona large scale, and have used themachine to formthe amalgam which has taken theplace of silver."

"We have known for some timethat a clever gang was at work," said the inspector. "They havebeen turning out half-crowns bythe thousand. We even traced them as far as Reading, but couldget no farther,for they had covered their traces in a way thatshowed that theywere very old hands. But now, thanks to this lucky chance, I think that we havegot them rightenough."

But the inspector wasmistaken, for those criminals were not destinedto fall into thehands of justice. As we rolledinto Eyford Station we saw a gigantic column ofsmoke which streamed up from behind a small clump of trees in the neighbourhoodand hung like animmense ostrichfeather over the landscape.

"Ahouse on fire?"asked Bradstreet as the train steamed off againon its way.

"Yes, sir!" said the station-master.

"When did itbreak out?"

"Ihear that it was during the night, sir, but ithas got worse, and the whole place is in a blaze."

"Whose houseis it?"

"Dr. Becher's."

"Tellme," broke in the engineer, "isDr. Becher a German, very thin,with a long, sharp nose?"

Thestation-master laughed heartily."No, sir, Dr. Becher is an Englishman, and there isn't a man inthe parish whohas a better-lined waistcoat. But he has a gentleman staying with him, a patient, as I understand, who is a foreigner, and he looks as if a little good Berkshire beef would dohim no harm."

The station-master had not finished his speech before we were allhastening in the direction of the fire. The road topped a low hill, and there was a great widespread whitewashed building in front of us, spouting fire at every chink and window, while in thegarden in frontthree fire-engines were vainlystriving to keepthe flames under.

"That's it!"cried Hatherley, in intense excitement. "Thereis the gravel-drive, and there are the rose-bushes where I lay.That second window is the one that I jumped from."

"Well, at least," said Holmes, "you have hadyour revenge upon them. There can be no question that it was your oil-lamp which, when it was crushed in the press, set fire tothe wooden walls, though no doubt they were tooexcited in thechase after youto observe it atthe time. Now keep your eyes open in this crowdfor your friends of last night,though I very much fear that they are a good hundred miles offby now."

And Holmes' fears cameto be realised,for from that day to this no word has ever beenheard either ofthe beautiful woman, the sinister German, or the morose Englishman. Early thatmorning a peasant had met a cartcontaining several people and some very bulky boxes driving rapidly in the direction of Reading, but there alltraces of the fugitives disappeared, and even Holmes' ingenuityfailed ever to discover the least clue as to their whereabouts.The firemen hadbeen much perturbed at the strange arrangementswhich they hadfound within, and still more soby discovering anewly severed human thumb upona window-sill ofthe second floor. About sunset,however, theirefforts were atlast successful,and they subdued the flames, but not before theroof had fallenin, and the whole place been reduced to such absolute ruin that, save some twisted cylinders and iron piping, not a trace remained of the machinery which had cost our unfortunate acquaintanceso dearly. Large masses of nickel and of tin were discovered stored in an out-house, but no coins were to be found, which may have explained the presence of those bulky boxeswhich have beenalready referredto.

How our hydraulic engineerhad been conveyed from the garden to the spot where he recovered his senses might have remainedforever a mystery were it not for the soft mould, which told usa very plain tale. He had evidently been carried down by two persons, one of whom had remarkably small feet andthe other unusually large ones.On the whole, it was most probable that the silent Englishman,being less boldor less murderous than his companion, had assisted the woman tobear the unconscious man out ofthe way of danger.

"Well," saidour engineer ruefully as we took our seats to return once moreto London, "it has been a prettybusiness for me! I have lost mythumb and I have lost a fifty-guinea fee, and what have I gained?"

"Experience," said Holmes,laughing. "Indirectly it may beof value, you know; you have only to put it intowords to gain the reputation ofbeing excellentcompany for theremainder of your existence."X.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE NOBLE BACHELOR


The Lord St. Simon marriage, and its curious termination, have long ceased to be a subject of interestin those exalted circles in which the unfortunate bridegroom moves. Fresh scandals have eclipsed it, and theirmore piquant details have drawnthe gossips awayfrom this four-year-old drama.As I have reasonto believe, however, that the full facts have never been revealed to the general public, and asmy friend Sherlock Holmes had aconsiderable share in clearingthe matter up, Ifeel that no memoir of him would be complete without some little sketch of thisremarkable episode.

It was a few weeks beforemy own marriage,during the dayswhen I was still sharing roomswith Holmes in Baker Street, that he came home from an afternoonstroll to finda letter on thetable waiting for him. I had remained indoors all day, for the weather had takena sudden turn to rain, with high autumnal winds, and the Jezailbullet which Ihad brought backin one of my limbs as a relic of my Afghan campaign throbbed with dull persistence. With my body in one easy-chair and my legsupon another, Ihad surrounded myself with a cloud of newspapersuntil at last,saturated with the news of the day, I tossed them all aside andlay listless, watching the hugecrest and monogram upon the envelope upon the table and wondering lazily who myfriend's noble correspondent could be.

"Here isa very fashionable epistle," Iremarked as he entered. "Your morning letters, if I remember right, were from afish-monger anda tide-waiter.""Yes, my correspondence has certainly the charmof variety," heanswered, smiling, "and the humbler are usuallythe more interesting. This looks like one of those unwelcome social summonses which call upon aman either to be bored or to lie."

He broke the seal and glanced over the contents.

"Oh, come, it may prove to be something of interest, after all."

"Not social, then?"

"No, distinctly professional."

"And from a nobleclient?"

"One of the highest inEngland."

"Mydear fellow, I congratulate you."

"I assure you, Watson, without affectation, that the status of my client is amatter of lessmoment to me than the interest of his case. It is just possible,however, that that also may notbe wanting in this new investigation. You havebeen reading thepapers diligently of late, haveyou not?"

"Itlooks like it,"said I ruefully,pointing to a huge bundle in the corner. "I have had nothing else to do."

"Itis fortunate, for you will perhaps be able to post me up. I readnothing exceptthe criminal news and the agonycolumn. The latter is always instructive. But ifyou have followed recent eventsso closely youmust have read about Lord St. Simon and his wedding?"

"Oh, yes,with the deepest interest."

"That is well. Theletter which Ihold in my handis from Lord St.Simon. I will read it to you, and in return youmust turn overthese papers andlet me have whatever bears uponthe matter. This is what he says:

" 'MY DEAR MR. SHERLOCK HOLMES:--Lord Backwater tells me that I may place implicit relianceupon your judgment and discretion. I have determined, therefore,to call upon you and to consultyou in reference to the very painful event which has occurred in connection with my wedding. Mr. Lestrade, of Scotland Yard, isacting alreadyin the matter, but he assures methat he sees noobjection to your co-operation,and that he even thinks that itmight be of some assistance. Iwill call at four o'clock in theafternoon, and,should you haveany other engagement at that time, I hope thatyou will postpone it, as this matter is of paramount importance.Yours faithfully,


" 'ST. SIMON.'

"It is dated from GrosvenorMansions, written with a quillpen, and the noble lord has hadthe misfortune to get a smear ofink upon the outer side of hisright little finger," remarked Holmes as he folded up the epistle.

"He says four o'clock. It isthree now. He will be here in an hour."

"ThenI have just time, with your assistance, to get clear upon the subject. Turn overthose papers and arrange the extracts in theirorder of time, while I take a glance as to who our client is." He picked a red-covered volume from a line of books of referencebeside the mantelpiece. "Here heis," said he, sitting down andflattening it out upon his knee." 'Lord RobertWalsingham de Vere St. Simon, second son of theDuke of Balmoral.' Hum! 'Arms: Azure, three caltrops in chief over a fess sable.Born in 1846.'He's forty-one years of age, which is mature formarriage. Was Under-Secretary for the coloniesin a late administration. The Duke, his father,was at one timeSecretary for Foreign Affairs. They inherit Plantagenet blood bydirect descent,and Tudor on the distaff side.Ha! Well, thereis nothing veryinstructive in all this. I thinkthat I must turn to you Watson,for something more solid."

"Ihave very littledifficulty in finding what I want," said I, "for the facts arequite recent, and the matter struck me as remarkable. I feared to refer them toyou, however, asI knew that youhad an inquiryon hand and thatyou disliked the intrusion of other matters.""Oh, you mean the little problemof the Grosvenor Square furniture van. That isquite cleared upnow--though, indeed, it was obvious from the first. Pray give me the results ofyour newspaperselections."

"Here is the firstnotice which Ican find. It isin the personalcolumn of the Morning Post, anddates, as you see, some weeks back: 'A marriagehas been arranged,' it says, 'and will, if rumour is correct, very shortly takeplace, between Lord Robert St. Simon, second sonof the Duke ofBalmoral, and Miss Hatty Doran,the only daughter of Aloysius Doran. Esq., of San Francisco, Cal., U.S.A.' Thatis all."

"Terseand to the point," remarked Holmes, stretchinghis long, thin legs towards thefire.

"There was a paragraph amplifying this inone of the society papers of the same week. Ah,here it is: 'There will soon bea call for protection in the marriage market, for the present free-trade principle appears to tell heavily against our home product. One by onethe managementof the noble houses of Great Britain is passinginto the hands of our fair cousins from across the Atlantic. Animportant addition has been madeduring the lastweek to the list of the prizeswhich have beenborne away by these charming invaders. Lord St.Simon, who has shown himself forover twenty years proof againstthe little god's arrows, has now definitely announced his approaching marriagewith Miss HattyDoran, the fascinating daughterof a Californiamillionaire. Miss Doran, whose graceful figure and striking faceattracted muchattention at theWestbury Housefestivities, isan only child, and it is currently reported thather dowry willrun to considerably over the sixfigures, with expectancies forthe future. As it is an open secret that the Duke of Balmoral has been compelledto sell his pictures within thelast few years,and as Lord St.Simon has no property of his own save the smallestate of Birchmoor, it is obvious that the Californian heiressis not the onlygainer by an alliance which will enable her tomake the easy and common transition from a Republican lady to aBritish peeress.' "

"Anything else?" asked Holmes, yawning.

"Oh, yes; plenty.Then there is another note in the Morning Post to say that the marriage would bean absolutely quiet one, that it would be at St. George's, Hanover Square, thatonly half a dozen intimate friends would be invited, and that the party would return to the furnished house atLancaster Gate which has been taken by Mr. Aloysius Doran. Two days later--thatis, on Wednesdaylast--there isa curt announcement that the wedding had taken place, and that the honeymoon would be passed atLord Backwater'splace, near Petersfield. Thoseare all the notices which appeared before the disappearance of the bride."

"Before the what?" asked Holmes witha start.

"Thevanishing of thelady."

"When did she vanish, then?"

"At the wedding breakfast."

"Indeed. This is more interesting than it promised to be; quite dramatic, infact."

"Yes; it struck me as being a little out of the common."

"They often vanish before theceremony, and occasionally during the honeymoon; but I cannot call to mind anything quite so prompt as this. Pray let me have the details."

"Iwarn you that they are very incomplete."

"Perhaps we may makethem less so.""Such as they are, they are setforth in a single article of a morning paper ofyesterday, whichI will read toyou. It is headed, 'Singular Occurrence at a Fashionable Wedding':

" 'The family of Lord RobertSt. Simon has been thrown intothe greatest consternation by the strange and painful episodes which have takenplace in connection with his wedding. The ceremony, as shortly announced in thepapers of yesterday, occurred onthe previous morning; but it isonly now that it has been possible to confirm the strange rumours which have been so persistently floating about. In spite of the attempts of the friends to hush the matter up, so much publicattention has now been drawn toit that no goodpurpose can beserved by affecting to disregardwhat is a common subject for conversation.

" 'The ceremony, which was performed at St. George's, Hanover Square, was a very quiet one, no onebeing present save the father ofthe bride, Mr.Aloysius Doran,the Duchess of Balmoral, Lord Backwater, Lord Eustace and Lady Clara St. Simon (the younger brother and sister of the bridegroom), and Lady Alicia Whittington.The whole partyproceeded afterwards to the house of Mr. Aloysius Doran, at Lancaster Gate, where breakfast hadbeen prepared. It appears that some little trouble was caused bya woman, whosename has not been ascertained, who endeavoured to force her wayinto the house after the bridalparty, allegingthat she had some claim upon Lord St. Simon. Itwas only after apainful and prolonged scene that she was ejected by the butlerand the footman.The bride, whohad fortunatelyentered the house before this unpleasant interruption, had sat down to breakfastwith the rest,when she complained of a suddenindisposition and retired to herroom. Her prolonged absence having caused somecomment, her father followed her, but learned from her maid thatshe had only come up to her chamber for an instant, caught up an ulster and bonnet, and hurrieddown to the passage. One of thefootmen declared that he had seen a lady leavethe house thus apparelled, but had refused to credit that it washis mistress, believing her tobe with the company. On ascertaining that his daughter had disappeared, Mr. Aloysius Doran, in conjunction withthe bridegroom,instantly put themselves in communication with the police, and very energetic inquiries are being made, which will probably result in a speedy clearing up of this very singularbusiness. Up toa late hour last night, however, nothing had transpired as to the whereabouts of the missing lady. There are rumours of foul play in the matter, and it is saidthat the policehave caused thearrest of the woman who had caused the originaldisturbance, inthe belief that, from jealousyor some other motive, she may have been concerned in the strangedisappearance of the bride.' ""And is that all?"

"Only one little item in another of the morning papers, butit is a suggestive one."

"Andit is--"

"ThatMiss Flora Millar, the lady whohad caused the disturbance, hasactually been arrested. It appears that she wasformerly a danseuse at the Allegro, and that shehas known the bridegroom for some years. Thereare no further particulars, andthe whole case is in your handsnow--so far as it has been set forth in the public press."

"Andan exceedinglyinteresting caseit appears to be. I would not have missed it for worlds. But there is a ring atthe bell, Watson, and as the clock makes it a few minutes afterfour, I have nodoubt that thiswill prove to be our noble client. Do not dreamof going, Watson, for I very much prefer havinga witness, if only as a check to my own memory."

"Lord RobertSt. Simon," announced our page-boy, throwing open the door. A gentleman entered,with a pleasant, cultured face,high-nosed andpale, with something perhaps ofpetulance aboutthe mouth, and with the steady,well-opened eyeof a man whose pleasant lot it had ever been tocommand and to be obeyed. His manner was brisk,and yet his general appearance gave an undue impression of age,for he had a slight forward stoop and a little bend of the kneesas he walked. His hair, too, ashe swept off his very curly-brimmed hat, was grizzled round theedges and thinupon the top. Asto his dress, it was careful tothe verge of foppishness, withhigh collar, black frock-coat, white waistcoat,yellow gloves, patent-leather shoes, and light-coloured gaiters.He advanced slowly into the room, turning his head from left toright, and swinging in his right hand the cordwhich held his golden eyeglasses.

"Good-day, Lord St. Simon," said Holmes, rising and bowing. "Pray take the basket-chair. Thisis my friend and colleague, Dr.Watson. Draw upa little to thefire, and we will talk this matter over."

"A most painful matter to me, as youcan most readily imagine, Mr. Holmes. I have been cut to the quick. I understand that you havealready managedseveral delicatecases of this sort, sir, thoughI presume thatthey were hardlyfrom the same class of society."

"No, I am descending."

"I beg pardon."

"Mylast client of the sort was a king."

"Oh, really! I had no idea. And which king?"

"The King ofScandinavia.""What! Had he lost his wife?"

"You can understand," said Holmessuavely, "thatI extend to theaffairs of my other clients thesame secrecy which I promise toyou in yours.""Of course! Veryright! very right! I'm sure I beg pardon. As tomy own case, Iam ready to giveyou any information which may assist you in forming an opinion."

"Thank you. Ihave already learned all that is in the publicprints, nothingmore. I presumethat I may takeit as correct--this article, forexample, as tothe disappearance of the bride."Lord St. Simonglanced over it. "Yes, it is correct, as far asit goes."

"Butit needs a great deal of supplementing before anyone could offer an opinion. Ithink that I mayarrive at my facts most directly by questioningyou."

"Pray doso."

"When didyou first meetMiss Hatty Doran?"

"In San Francisco, a year ago."

"You were travelling in theStates?"

"Yes."

"Did you become engaged then?"

"No."

"But you were on a friendly footing?""I was amused by her society, and she could seethat I was amused."

"Her father is very rich?""He is said tobe the richestman on the Pacific slope."

"Andhow did he makehis money?"

"In mining. He hadnothing a few years ago. Then he struck gold, invested it, andcame up by leapsand bounds."

"Now, what is your own impressionas to the younglady's--your wife's character?"The nobleman swung his glassesa little fasterand stared downinto the fire."You see, Mr. Holmes," said he,"my wife was twenty before her father became a rich man. Duringthat time she ran free in a mining camp and wandered through woods or mountains,so that her education has comefrom Nature rather than from theschoolmaster. She is what we call in England atomboy, with a strong nature, wild and free, unfettered by any sort of traditions. She is impetuous--volcanic, Iwas about to say. She is swiftin making up hermind and fearless in carrying out her resolutions. On the otherhand, I would not have given her the name whichI have the honour to bear"--hegave a little stately cough--"had I not thoughther to be at bottom a noble woman. I believe that she is capableof heroic self-sacrifice and that anything dishonourable wouldbe repugnant toher."

"Have youher photograph?"

"I brought this with me." Heopened a locketand showed us the full face of avery lovely woman. It was not aphotograph butan ivory miniature, and the artist had brought out the full effect of the lustrous black hair, the large dark eyes, and the exquisite mouth. Holmes gazed long and earnestly atit. Then he closed the locket and handed it backto Lord St. Simon.

"The younglady came to London, then, and you renewed youracquaintance?""Yes, her fatherbrought her over for this lastLondon season. Imet her severaltimes, became engaged to her, and have now married her."

"Shebrought, I understand, a considerable dowry?"

"A fair dowry. Not more than is usual in my family."

"And this,of course, remains to you, sincethe marriage isa fait accompli?"

"I really have made no inquiries on the subject."

"Very naturally not. Didyou see Miss Doran on the day before the wedding?"

"Yes."

"Wasshe in good spirits?"

"Never better. She kepttalking of whatwe should do inour future lives."

"Indeed! That is very interesting. And on the morning of thewedding?"

"Shewas as bright as possible--at least until afterthe ceremony.""And did you observe any changein her then?""Well, to tell the truth, I sawthen the first signs that I hadever seen that her temper was just a little sharp. The incidenthowever, was tootrivial to relate and can haveno possible bearing upon the case."

"Pray let us have it, for all that."

"Oh,it is childish.She dropped herbouquet as we went towards the vestry. She was passing the frontpew at the time, and it fell over into the pew.There was a moment's delay, butthe gentleman in the pew handedit up to her again, and it didnot appear to bethe worse for the fall. Yet when I spoke to herof the matter,she answered meabruptly; and inthe carriage, on our way home,she seemed absurdly agitated over this triflingcause."

"Indeed! You say that there was a gentleman in the pew.Some of the general public werepresent, then?""Oh, yes. It is impossible toexclude them when the church isopen."

"This gentleman was notone of your wife's friends?"

"No, no; I call him a gentleman bycourtesy, but he was quite a common-looking person. I hardly noticed his appearance. But reallyI think that weare wandering rather far from the point."

"Lady St. Simon, then, returned fromthe wedding ina less cheerfulframe of mind than she had goneto it. What didshe do on re-entering her father's house?"

"I saw her in conversation with hermaid."

"And whois her maid?""Alice is her name. She is an American and camefrom Californiawith her."

"A confidential servant?"

"A littletoo much so. Itseemed to me that her mistressallowed her to take great liberties. Still, of course, in America they look uponthese things ina different way."

"How long did she speak to this Alice?"

"Oh, a few minutes.I had somethingelse to think of."

"You did not overhear whatthey said?"

"Lady St. Simon said something about 'jumping a claim.' She was accustomed to use slang of the kind. I have no ideawhat she meant."

"American slang is very expressive sometimes.And what did your wife do whenshe finished speaking to her maid?"

"She walkedinto the breakfast-room."

"Onyour arm?"

"No,alone. She wasvery independentin little matters like that. Then, after we hadsat down for ten minutes or so,she rose hurriedly, muttered some words of apology, and left the room. She never came back."

"But this maid, Alice, as I understand, deposes that she went toher room, covered her bride's dress with a longulster, put on abonnet, and went out."

"Quiteso. And she wasafterwards seenwalking into Hyde Park in company with Flora Millar, a woman whois now in custody, and who hadalready made a disturbance at Mr. Doran's housethat morning.""Ah, yes. I should like a few particulars as tothis young lady,and your relations to her."

Lord St. Simon shrugged his shoulders and raised his eyebrows. "Wehave been on afriendly footingfor some years--I may say on avery friendly footing. She usedto be at the Allegro. I have nottreated her ungenerously, and she had no just cause of complaint against me, but you know whatwomen are, Mr. Holmes. Flora wasa dear little thing, but exceedingly hot-headedand devotedly attached to me. She wrote me dreadful letters when she heard thatI was about tobe married, and,to tell the truth, the reason why I had the marriage celebratedso quietly wasthat I feared lest there might be a scandal in the church. She came to Mr. Doran's door just after we returned,and she endeavoured to push herway in, utteringvery abusive expressions towards my wife, and even threateningher, but I had foreseen the possibility of something of the sort, and I had twopolice fellows there in privateclothes, who soon pushed her outagain. She wasquiet when she saw that there was no good in making a row."

"Did your wife hearall this?"

"No, thank goodness, she did not.""And she was seen walking withthis very womanafterwards?"

"Yes. That is whatMr. Lestrade, of Scotland Yard,looks upon as so serious. It isthought that Flora decoyed my wife out and laidsome terrible trap for her."

"Well, it is a possible supposition."

"You thinkso, too?"

"I did not say a probable one. But you do not yourself look upon this as likely?"

"I do not think Flora would hurta fly."

"Still,jealousy is a strange transformer of characters. Pray what is your own theory as to what took place?"

"Well, really, I came toseek a theory,not to propoundone. I have given you all the facts. Since you ask me, however,I may say that it has occurred to me as possiblethat the excitement of this affair, the consciousness that shehad made so immense a social stride, had the effect of causing some little nervous disturbance in my wife."

"Inshort, that shehad become suddenly deranged?""Well, really,when I considerthat she has turned her back--Iwill not say upon me, but upon so much that manyhave aspired towithout success--I can hardly explain it in anyother fashion.""Well, certainly that is alsoa conceivable hypothesis," saidHolmes, smiling."And now, LordSt. Simon, I think that I have nearly all my data. May I ask whether you were seated at the breakfast-table so that you could see out of the window?"

"We couldsee the other side of the roadand the Park.""Quite so. ThenI do not think that I need to detain you longer.I shall communicate with you.""Should you befortunate enoughto solve this problem," said our client, rising.

"I have solved it."

"Eh? What was that?"

"Isay that I havesolved it."

"Where, then, is my wife?"

"Thatis a detail which I shall speedily supply."

Lord St. Simon shook his head. "I am afraid that itwill take wiserheads than yours or mine," he remarked, and bowing in a stately, old-fashionedmanner he departed.

"It is verygood of Lord St. Simon to honour my head by putting it on a level with his own," said SherlockHolmes, laughing. "I think thatI shall have a whisky and soda and a cigar afterall this cross-questioning. I had formed my conclusions as to the case before our client came into the room.""My dear Holmes!"

"I have notesof several similar cases, though none, as I remarked before, which were quite as prompt. My whole examination served to turn myconjecture intoa certainty. Circumstantial evidence is occasionally very convincing, as when you find a troutin the milk, toquote Thoreau'sexample."

"ButI have heard allthat you have heard."

"Without, however, the knowledge of pre-existing cases which serves me so well. There was a parallel instance in Aberdeen some years back, and somethingon very much the same lines atMunich the yearafter the Franco-Prussian War. It is one of these cases--but, hullo, here is Lestrade! Good-afternoon, Lestrade!You will find an extra tumblerupon the sideboard, and there are cigars in thebox."

The official detective was attired in a pea-jacket and cravat, which gavehim a decidedlynautical appearance, and he carried a black canvas bag in his hand. With a short greeting he seated himself andlit the cigar which had been offered to him.

"What's up, then?" asked Holmes with a twinkle inhis eye. "You look dissatisfied."

"And I feeldissatisfied. Itis this infernal St. Simon marriage case. I canmake neither head nor tail of the business."

"Really! You surprise me."

"Whoever heard of such a mixed affair? Every clue seems to slip through my fingers.I have been at work upon it allday."

"And verywet it seems tohave made you,"said Holmes laying his hand upon the arm of thepea-jacket.

"Yes, I have beendragging the Serpentine."

"In heaven's name, what for?"

"In search of the bodyof Lady St. Simon."

Sherlock Holmes leaned back in his chair and laughed heartily.

"Have youdragged the basin of Trafalgar Square fountain?"he asked.

"Why? What do you mean?"

"Because you have just asgood a chance offinding this lady in the one asin the other."Lestrade shot an angry glance at my companion."I suppose you know all about it," he snarled."Well, I have only just heard the facts, but mymind is made up."

"Oh, indeed!Then you think that the Serpentine plays no partin the matter?""I think it very unlikely."

"Then perhaps youwill kindly explain how it is that we found this in it?" He opened his bag as he spoke, and tumbled onto the floor a wedding-dress of watered silk, a pair of white satin shoesand a bride's wreath and veil,all discolouredand soaked in water. "There," said he, putting anew wedding-ring upon the top of the pile. "There is a little nut for you to crack, Master Holmes."

"Oh, indeed!" said my friend, blowing bluerings into theair. "You dragged them from theSerpentine?"

"No. They were found floating nearthe margin by apark-keeper. They have been identified as her clothes, and it seemed to me thatif the clotheswere there the body would not befar off."

"Bythe same brilliant reasoning, every man's body is to be found inthe neighbourhood of his wardrobe. And pray what did you hope to arrive at through this?"

"Atsome evidence implicating FloraMillar in the disappearance."

"I am afraid thatyou will find it difficult."

"Are you, indeed,now?" cried Lestrade with somebitterness. "I am afraid, Holmes, that you are not very practical with your deductions and yourinferences. Youhave made two blunders in as many minutes. Thisdress does implicate Miss FloraMillar."

"And how?"

"In the dress is a pocket.In the pocket is a card-case. In the card-caseis a note. And here is the verynote." He slapped it down upon the table in front of him. "Listen to this: 'Youwill see me whenall is ready. Come at once. F.H. M.' Now my theory all along has been that Lady St. Simon wasdecoyed away byFlora Millar, and that she, withconfederates, no doubt, was responsible for herdisappearance.Here, signed with her initials,is the very notewhich was no doubt quietly slipped into her hand at the door and which lured her within their reach."

"Very good, Lestrade," said Holmes, laughing. "You really are very fineindeed. Let me see it." He tookup the paper ina listless way,but his attention instantly became riveted, andhe gave a littlecry of satisfaction. "This is indeed important," said he.

"Ha!you find it so?"

"Extremely so. I congratulateyou warmly."

Lestrade rose inhis triumph andbent his head tolook. "Why," heshrieked, "you're looking at the wrong side!""On the contrary, this is the right side."

"Theright side? You're mad! Here isthe note written in pencil overhere."

"And over here is whatappears to be the fragment of ahotel bill, which interests me deeply."

"There's nothing in it.I looked at itbefore," said Lestrade. " 'Oct.4th, rooms 8s.,breakfast 2s. 6d., cocktail 1s.,lunch 2s. 6d.,glass sherry, 8d.' I see nothingin that."

"Very likely not. Itis most important, all the same. As to the note, it is important also, or at least the initialsare, so I congratulate you again."

"I've wasted time enough,"said Lestrade, rising. "I believe in hard work and not in sitting by the fire spinning fine theories. Good-day,Mr. Holmes, andwe shall see which gets to the bottom of the matter first." He gathered up the garments, thrustthem into the bag, and made forthe door.

"Justone hint to you, Lestrade," drawled Holmes before his rival vanished; "I will tell you the truesolution of thematter. Lady St. Simon is a myth. There is not,and there neverhas been, any such person."

Lestrade looked sadly at my companion. Then he turned to me, tapped his forehead three times, shook his head solemnly, and hurriedaway.

He had hardly shut the door behind him when Holmes roseto put on his overcoat. "There is something in what the fellow says about outdoor work," he remarked, "so I think, Watson, thatI must leave youto your papersfor a little."It was after five o'clock when Sherlock Holmes left me, but I had no time to belonely, for within an hour therearrived a confectioner's man with a very largeflat box. This he unpacked withthe help of a youth whom he hadbrought with him, and presently,to my very great astonishment,a quite epicurean little cold supper began to belaid out upon our humble lodging-house mahogany. There were a couple of brace of cold woodcock,a pheasant, a pate de foie graspie with a group of ancient andcobwebby bottles. Having laid out all these luxuries, my two visitors vanishedaway, like the genii of the Arabian Nights, withno explanationsave that the things had been paid for and wereordered to thisaddress.

Just before nine o'clock Sherlock Holmes stepped briskly into the room. His features were gravely set,but there was alight in his eye which made methink that he had not been disappointed in his conclusions.

"They have laid thesupper, then,"he said, rubbinghis hands.

"You seem to expectcompany. They have laid for five."

"Yes, I fancy we may have some company dropping in," said he. "I am surprised that Lord St.Simon has not already arrived.Ha! I fancy thatI hear his stepnow upon the stairs."

It was indeed our visitor of the afternoon who came bustling in, dangling his glasses more vigorously than ever, and with a very perturbed expression upon his aristocratic features.

"My messenger reached you, then?"asked Holmes."Yes, and I confess that the contents startled me beyond measure. Have you goodauthority for what you say?"

"The best possible."

Lord St. Simon sank into a chair and passedhis hand over his forehead.

"What will the Dukesay," he murmured, "when he hears that one of the family has been subjected tosuch humiliation?"

"It is the purest accident.I cannot allow that there is anyhumiliation.""Ah, you look onthese things from another standpoint."

"I failto see that anyone is to blame.I can hardly see how the lady could have actedotherwise, though her abrupt method of doing itwas undoubtedlyto be regretted.Having no mother, she had no one to advise herat such a crisis."

"It was a slight, sir, a public slight," said Lord St. Simon, tapping his fingers upon the table.

"You mustmake allowancefor this poor girl, placed in sounprecedented aposition."

"Iwill make no allowance. I am very angry indeed,and I have beenshamefully used."

"I think thatI heard a ring," said Holmes. "Yes, there are steps on the landing. If I cannotpersuade you totake a lenientview of the matter, Lord St. Simon, I have brought an advocate here who may be more successful."He opened the door and usheredin a lady and gentleman. "Lord St. Simon," saidhe "allow me tointroduce you toMr. and Mrs. Francis Hay Moulton. The lady, I think, you have already met."

Atthe sight of these newcomers our client had sprung from his seat and stood veryerect, with hiseyes cast downand his hand thrust into the breast of his frock-coat, a pictureof offended dignity. The lady had taken a quickstep forward and had held out her hand to him,but he still refused to raise his eyes. It was as well for his resolution, perhaps, for her pleading face was one which it was hard to resist."You're angry, Robert," said she. "Well, I guessyou have everycause to be."

"Pray make no apology to me," said Lord St. Simonbitterly.

"Oh,yes, I know that I have treatedyou real bad and that I shouldhave spoken to you before I went; but I was kindof rattled, andfrom the time when I saw Frankhere again I just didn't know what I was doing or saying. I onlywonder I didn'tfall down and do a faint rightthere before thealtar."

"Perhaps, Mrs. Moulton, you would likemy friend and me to leave the room while you explain this matter?"

"If I may give an opinion,"remarked the strange gentleman,"we've had justa little too much secrecy overthis business already. For my part, I should like all Europe andAmerica to hearthe rights of it." He was a small, wiry, sunburnt man, clean-shaven, with a sharp face and alert manner.

"ThenI'll tell our story right away," said the lady."Frank here andI met in '84, in McQuire's camp, near the Rockies, where Pa wasworking a claim. We were engaged to each other,Frank and I; but then one day father struck a rich pocket and made a pile, while poor Frank here had a claim that petered out and came to nothing. The richer Pa grew the poorer was Frank; soat last Pa wouldn't hear of ourengagement lasting any longer, and he took me away to 'Frisco. Frank wouldn't throw up his hand,though; so he followed me there, and he saw mewithout Pa knowing anything about it. It would only have made him mad to know, so we just fixedit all up for ourselves. Frank said that he would go and make his pile, too, andnever come backto claim me until he had as much as Pa. So thenI promised to wait for him to the end of time and pledged myself not to marry anyone else whilehe lived. 'Whyshouldn't we bemarried right away, then,' saidhe, 'and then Iwill feel sure of you; and I won't claim to be your husband until I come back?'Well, we talkedit over, and hehad fixed it allup so nicely, with a clergymanall ready in waiting, that we just did it rightthere; and thenFrank went off to seek his fortune, and I went back to Pa.

"Thenext I heard ofFrank was thathe was in Montana, and then he went prospectingin Arizona, andthen I heard ofhim from New Mexico. After thatcame a long newspaper story about how a miners'camp had been attacked by ApacheIndians, and there was my Frank's name among the killed. I fainted dead away, and I was very sick for months after. Pa thoughtI had a declineand took me to half the doctorsin 'Frisco. Nota word of news came for a year and more, so thatI never doubtedthat Frank wasreally dead. Then Lord St. Simoncame to 'Frisco, and we came toLondon, and a marriage was arranged, and Pa wasvery pleased, but I felt all the time that no man on this earthwould ever takethe place in myheart that hadbeen given to mypoor Frank.

"Still, if I had married Lord St.Simon, of courseI'd have done my duty by him. We can't commandour love, but wecan our actions. I went to thealtar with him with the intention to make him just as good a wife as it was in me to be. But youmay imagine what I felt when, just as I came tothe altar rails, I glanced backand saw Frank standing and looking at me out ofthe first pew.I thought it washis ghost at first; but when Ilooked again there he was still,with a kind ofquestion in hiseyes, as if to ask me whether Iwere glad or sorry to see him. Iwonder I didn'tdrop. I know that everything was turning round,and the words of the clergymanwere just like the buzz of a beein my ear. I didn't know what to do. Should I stop the serviceand make a scenein the church?I glanced at himagain, and he seemed to know what I was thinking, for he raisedhis finger to his lips to tellme to be still.Then I saw him scribble on a piece of paper, andI knew that hewas writing me anote. As I passed his pew on the way out I dropped my bouquet over to him, andhe slipped the note into my handwhen he returned me the flowers. It was only aline asking me to join him whenhe made the signto me to do so.Of course I never doubted for amoment that myfirst duty was now to him, and Idetermined to do just whateverhe might direct."When I got back I told my maid, who had knownhim in California, and had always been his friend. I ordered her to say nothing, but to get a few things packedand my ulster ready. I know I ought to have spoken to Lord St.Simon, but it was dreadful hardbefore his mother and all thosegreat people. Ijust made up mymind to run awayand explain afterwards. I hadn't been at the table ten minutesbefore I saw Frank out of the window at the other side of the road. He beckonedto me and then began walking into the Park. I slipped out, put on my things, andfollowed him. Some woman came talking somethingor other aboutLord St. Simon to me--seemed tome from the little I heard as ifhe had a littlesecret of his own before marriage also--but I managed to get away from her andsoon overtook Frank. We got intoa cab together,and away we drove to some lodgings he had takenin Gordon Square, and that wasmy true weddingafter all thoseyears of waiting. Frank had beena prisoner among the Apaches, had escaped, cameon to 'Frisco,found that I hadgiven him up for dead and had gone to England,followed me there, and had comeupon me at laston the very morning of my secondwedding."

"I saw it in a paper," explained theAmerican. "It gave the name andthe church butnot where the lady lived."

"Then we had a talkas to what we should do, and Frank was all for openness, but I was so ashamed ofit all that I felt as if I should like to vanish away and neversee any of themagain--just sending a line to Pa, perhaps, to show him that I was alive. It wasawful to me tothink of all those lords and ladies sitting round that breakfast-table and waiting for me to come back. So Franktook my wedding-clothes and things and made a bundle of them, so that I shouldnot be traced, and dropped themaway somewhere where no one could find them. Itis likely that we should have gone on to Paris to-morrow, only that this good gentleman, Mr. Holmes, came roundto us this evening, though how he found us is more than I can think, and he showed us very clearly and kindly that I was wrong and that Frank was right, and that we should be putting ourselvesin the wrong ifwe were so secret. Then he offered to give us achance of talking to Lord St. Simon alone, andso we came rightaway round to his rooms at once. Now, Robert, you have heard itall, and I am very sorry if I have given you pain, and I hope that you do not think very meanlyof me."

Lord St. Simon had byno means relaxedhis rigid attitude, but had listened with a frowning brow and acompressed lipto this long narrative.

"Excuseme," he said, "but it is not mycustom to discuss my most intimate personal affairs in this public manner."

"Then you won't forgive me? You won't shake handsbefore I go?"

"Oh, certainly, if it would giveyou any pleasure." He put out his hand and coldly grasped that which she extended to him.

"I had hoped," suggested Holmes, "that you would havejoined us in afriendly supper."

"I think thatthere you ask alittle too much," responded hisLordship. "I may be forced to acquiesce in these recent developments, but I canhardly be expected to make merry over them. I think that with your permission Iwill now wish you all a very good-night." He included us all ina sweeping bowand stalked outof the room.

"Then I trust thatyou at least will honour me with your company,"said Sherlock Holmes. "It is always a joy to meet an American,Mr. Moulton, forI am one of those who believe that the folly ofa monarch and the blundering ofa minister in far-gone years will not prevent our children frombeing some daycitizens of thesame world-widecountry under aflag which shallbe a quarteringof the Union Jack with the Stars and Stripes.""The case has been an interesting one," remarked Holmes when our visitors had left us, "becauseit serves to show very clearlyhow simple the explanation may be of an affair which at first sight seems to bealmost inexplicable. Nothing could be more natural than the sequence of events as narrated by this lady, and nothing stranger than the result when viewed, for instance, by Mr.Lestrade of Scotland Yard."

"You were not yourself at fault atall, then?"

"From the first, two facts were very obvious to me,the one that the lady had beenquite willing toundergo the wedding ceremony, the other that she had repented of it within a few minutes of returning home. Obviously somethinghad occurred during the morning, then, to causeher to change her mind. What could that something be? She couldnot have spokento anyone whenshe was out, forshe had been inthe company ofthe bridegroom.Had she seen someone, then? If she had, it mustbe someone fromAmerica becauseshe had spent soshort a time inthis country that she could hardly have allowedanyone to acquire so deep an influence over herthat the mere sight of him would induce her tochange her plansso completely.You see we havealready arrived,by a process ofexclusion, at the idea that shemight have seenan American. Then who could this American be, and why should hepossess so muchinfluence overher? It might bea lover; it might be a husband.Her young womanhood had, I knew, been spent inrough scenes andunder strange conditions. So far I had got before I ever heardLord St. Simon'snarrative. Whenhe told us of aman in a pew, of the change inthe bride's manner, of so transparent a device for obtaining a note as the dropping of a bouquet, of her resortto her confidential maid, and ofher very significant allusion to claim-jumping--which in miners' parlance meanstaking possession of that whichanother personhas a prior claim to--the wholesituation becameabsolutely clear. She had goneoff with a man,and the man waseither a lover or was a previoushusband--the chances being in favour of the latter."

"And howin the world didyou find them?""It might havebeen difficult,but friend Lestrade held information in his hands the value ofwhich he did nothimself know. The initials were, of course, ofthe highest importance, but morevaluable stillwas it to know that within a week he had settledhis bill at oneof the most select London hotels."

"How did you deduce the select?"

"By the select prices. Eight shillings for a bed and eightpence for a glass of sherry pointed to one of the most expensive hotels. Thereare not many inLondon which charge at that rate. In the secondone which I visited in Northumberland Avenue, Ilearned by an inspection of thebook that Francis H. Moulton, anAmerican gentleman, had left only the day before, and on looking over the entries against him,I came upon thevery items whichI had seen in the duplicate bill. His letters were to be forwarded to 226 Gordon Square; so thither I travelled, and being fortunate enough tofind the lovingcouple at home,I ventured to give them some paternal advice andto point out tothem that it would be better inevery way thatthey should maketheir positiona little clearerboth to the general public andto Lord St. Simon in particular.I invited themto meet him here, and, as you see, I made him keep the appointment."

"But withno very good result," I remarked. "His conduct was certainly notvery gracious.""Ah, Watson,"said Holmes, smiling, "perhaps you would not bevery gracious either, if, afterall the troubleof wooing and wedding, you foundyourself deprived in an instantof wife and offortune. I thinkthat we may judge Lord St. Simon very mercifully and thank ourstars that we are never likely to find ourselvesin the same position. Draw yourchair up and hand me my violin,for the only problem we have still to solve ishow to while away these bleak autumnal evenings."

XI.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE BERYL CORONET


"Holmes," said I asI stood one morning in our bow-window looking down the street,"here is a madman coming along.It seems rathersad that his relatives should allow him to comeout alone."

Myfriend rose lazily from his armchair and stood with his hands inthe pockets ofhis dressing-gown, looking overmy shoulder. Itwas a bright, crisp February morning, and the snow of the day before still lay deep upon the ground, shimmeringbrightly in thewintry sun. Downthe centre of Baker Street it had been ploughedinto a brown crumbly band by the traffic, but at either side and on the heaped-up edges of thefoot-paths it still lay as whiteas when it fell. The grey pavement had been cleaned and scraped, but was stilldangerously slippery, so that there were fewer passengers than usual. Indeed, from the directionof the Metropolitan Station noone was coming save the single gentleman whose eccentric conducthad drawn my attention.

He wasa man of aboutfifty, tall, portly, and imposing, with a massive, strongly marked face and a commanding figure.He was dressedin a sombre yetrich style, in black frock-coat,shining hat, neat brown gaiters, and well-cut pearl-grey trousers. Yet his actions were in absurd contrast to the dignity of his dress and features, for he wasrunning hard, with occasional little springs, such as a weary man gives who islittle accustomed to set any taxupon his legs.As he ran he jerked his hands upand down, waggled his head, andwrithed his face into the mostextraordinary contortions.

"What on earth can be the matter with him?" I asked."He is lookingup at the numbers of the houses."

"I believe that he is cominghere," said Holmes, rubbing hishands.

"Here?""Yes; I ratherthink he is coming to consult meprofessionally.I think that Irecognise the symptoms. Ha! didI not tell you?"As he spoke, the man, puffing and blowing, rushed at our door and pulled at ourbell until thewhole house resounded with the clanging.

A fewmoments later hewas in our room, still puffing,still gesticulating, but with so fixed a look of grief and despair in his eyesthat our smileswere turned in an instant to horror and pity. For a while he could not get his words out, but swayed his body and plucked at hishair like one who has been driven to the extreme limits of hisreason. Then, suddenly springingto his feet, hebeat his head against the wallwith such forcethat we both rushed upon him andtore him away to the centre ofthe room. Sherlock Holmes pushedhim down into the easy-chair and, sitting beside him, patted his hand and chatted with him in the easy, soothing tones which heknew so well how to employ.

"You have come tome to tell yourstory, have younot?" said he. "You are fatiguedwith your haste. Pray wait until you have recovered yourself, and then I shallbe most happy tolook into any little problem which you may submit to me."

Theman sat for a minute or more with a heaving chest, fighting against his emotion.Then he passedhis handkerchiefover his brow,set his lips tight, and turned his face towardsus.

"No doubt you think me mad?" said he.

"I see that you havehad some greattrouble," responded Holmes.

"God knows I have!--a trouble whichis enough to unseat my reason,so sudden and soterrible is it.Public disgraceI might have faced, although Iam a man whose character has never yet borne a stain. Private affliction also isthe lot of every man; but the two coming together, and in so frightful a form,have been enoughto shake my very soul. Besides,it is not I alone. The very noblest in the landmay suffer unless some way be found out of thishorrible affair."

"Pray compose yourself, sir," said Holmes, "and let me havea clear accountof who you are and what it is that has befallenyou."

"My name," answered our visitor, "is probably familiar toyour ears. I amAlexander Holder, of the banking firm of Holder& Stevenson, ofThreadneedle Street."

The namewas indeed wellknown to us asbelonging to thesenior partnerin the second largest private banking concern inthe City of London. What couldhave happened, then, to bring one of the foremost citizens of London to this most pitiable pass?We waited, allcuriosity, untilwith another effort he braced himself to tell his story.

"I feel that time isof value," saidhe; "that is whyI hastened herewhen the policeinspector suggested that I should secure your co-operation. I came to Baker Street by the Underground and hurried from there onfoot, for the cabs go slowly through this snow.That is why I was so out of breath, for I am aman who takes very little exercise. I feel better now, and I will put the factsbefore you as shortly and yet asclearly as I can.

"It is, of course, well known to you that ina successful banking business as much depends upon our being able to find remunerative investments for our funds as upon our increasing our connection and thenumber of our depositors. One ofour most lucrative means of laying out money isin the shape ofloans, where the security is unimpeachable. Wehave done a gooddeal in this direction during the last few years, and there aremany noble families to whom wehave advanced large sums upon the security of their pictures, libraries, or plate.

"Yesterday morning I was seated in my officeat the bank when a card was brought in to me byone of the clerks. I started when I saw the name, for it was that of none otherthan--well, perhaps even to youI had better say no more than that it was a name which is a household word allover the earth--one of the highest, noblest, most exalted namesin England. I was overwhelmed bythe honour andattempted, whenhe entered, to say so, but he plunged at once into business withthe air of a man who wishes tohurry quickly through a disagreeable task.

" 'Mr. Holder,' saidhe, 'I have been informed thatyou are in the habit of advancing money.'

" 'The firm does so when the securityis good.' I answered.

" 'It isabsolutely essential to me,' said he, 'that I should have $50,000 at once. I could, of course,borrow so trifling a sum ten times over from myfriends, but I much prefer to make it a matter of business and to carry out thatbusiness myself. In my positionyou can readilyunderstand thatit is unwise toplace one's self under obligations.'

" 'For how long, may I ask, do you want this sum?' I asked.

" 'Next Monday I have a large sum due to me,and I shall then most certainlyrepay what youadvance, with whatever interestyou think it right to charge. But it is very essential to me that the money should be paid at once.'

" 'I should be happy to advance it withoutfurther parleyfrom my own private purse,' saidI, 'were it notthat the strainwould be rathermore than it could bear. If, onthe other hand,I am to do it in the name of the firm, then injustice to my partner I must insist that, even in your case, every businesslikeprecaution should be taken.'

"'I should much prefer to have itso,' said he, raising up a square, black morocco case which hehad laid besidehis chair. 'Youhave doubtless heard of the Beryl Coronet?'

" 'One of the mostprecious publicpossessions of the empire,' saidI.

" 'Precisely.' He opened the case, and there, imbedded in soft, flesh-coloured velvet, laythe magnificentpiece of jewellery which he hadnamed. 'There are thirty-nine enormous beryls,'said he, 'and the price of the gold chasing is incalculable. Thelowest estimatewould put the worth of the coronet at double the sum which I have asked. I am prepared to leaveit with you asmy security.'

"I took the precious case into myhands and looked in some perplexity from it tomy illustrious client.

" 'You doubt its value?'he asked.

" 'Not at all. I only doubt--'

" 'The propriety ofmy leaving it. You may set yourmind at rest about that. I should not dream of doing so were itnot absolutely certain that I should be able infour days to reclaim it. It is apure matter ofform. Is the security sufficient?'

" 'Ample.'" 'You understand, Mr. Holder, that I am givingyou a strong proof of the confidence which I have in you, founded upon all thatI have heard ofyou. I rely uponyou not only tobe discreet andto refrain fromall gossip uponthe matter but,above all, to preserve this coronet with everypossible precaution because I need not say thata great public scandal would becaused if any harm were to befall it. Any injuryto it would bealmost as serious as its complete loss, for there are no berylsin the world tomatch these, andit would be impossible to replace them. I leaveit with you, however, with every confidence, and I shall call for it in personon Monday morning.'

"Seeing that my client wasanxious to leave, I said no morebut, calling for my cashier, Iordered him to pay over fifty $1000 notes. WhenI was alone oncemore, however,with the precious case lying upon the table in front of me, I could not but think with some misgivings of the immense responsibility which it entailed upon me.There could be no doubt that, asit was a national possession, ahorrible scandal would ensue ifany misfortuneshould occur toit. I already regretted having ever consented totake charge ofit. However, itwas too late toalter the matternow, so I locked it up in my private safe and turned once moreto my work.

"When evening cameI felt that it would be an imprudence to leave so precious a thing in the officebehind me. Bankers' safes had been forced before now, and why should not mine be? If so, how terrible would bethe position inwhich I should find myself! I determined, therefore, that for the next few daysI would always carry the case backward and forward with me, so that it might never be really outof my reach. With this intention, I called a cab and drove outto my house at Streatham, carrying the jewel with me. I did notbreathe freely until I had takenit upstairs andlocked it in the bureau of my dressing-room.

"And now a word as to my household, Mr. Holmes, for I wish you tothoroughly understand the situation. My groom and my page sleepout of the house, and may be set aside altogether. I have threemaid-servants who have been with me a number ofyears and whoseabsolute reliability is quite above suspicion.Another, Lucy Parr, the second waiting-maid, hasonly been in myservice a few months. She camewith an excellent character, however, and has always given me satisfaction. Sheis a very prettygirl and has attracted admirerswho have occasionally hung about the place. That is the only drawback which wehave found to her, but we believe her to be a thoroughly good girl in every way."So much for the servants. Myfamily itself isso small that it will not takeme long to describe it. I am a widower and havean only son, Arthur. He has beena disappointment to me, Mr. Holmes--a grievousdisappointment.I have no doubtthat I am myselfto blame. People tell me that Ihave spoiled him. Very likely Ihave. When my dear wife died Ifelt that he wasall I had to love. I could notbear to see thesmile fade evenfor a moment from his face. I have never deniedhim a wish. Perhaps it would have been better for both of us hadI been sterner,but I meant itfor the best.

"It was naturallymy intention that he should succeed me in my business, but he was not of a business turn. He was wild, wayward,and, to speak the truth, I could not trust himin the handlingof large sums ofmoney. When hewas young he became a member ofan aristocraticclub, and there,having charmingmanners, he wassoon the intimate of a number of men with longpurses and expensive habits. Helearned to playheavily at cardsand to squandermoney on the turf, until he hadagain and againto come to me and implore me togive him an advance upon his allowance, that hemight settle his debts of honour. He tried morethan once to break away from the dangerous company which he waskeeping, but each time the influence of his friend, Sir GeorgeBurnwell, was enough to draw himback again.

"And, indeed, I could not wonder that such a man as Sir George Burnwell should gain an influence over him, for hehas frequently brought him to myhouse, and I have found myselfthat I could hardly resist the fascination of his manner. He isolder than Arthur, a man of theworld to his finger-tips, one who had been everywhere, seen everything, a brilliant talker, anda man of great personal beauty.Yet when I thinkof him in coldblood, far awayfrom the glamourof his presence, I am convincedfrom his cynical speech and thelook which I have caught in hiseyes that he isone who shouldbe deeply distrusted. So I think, and so, too, thinks my littleMary, who has awoman's quick insight into character.

"And nowthere is only she to be described. She is my niece; but when mybrother died five years ago andleft her alone in the world I adopted her, and have looked uponher ever since as my daughter. She is a sunbeamin my house--sweet, loving, beautiful, a wonderful manager and housekeeper, yetas tender and quiet and gentle as a woman couldbe. She is my right hand. I do not know what I could do withouther. In only onematter has sheever gone against my wishes. Twice my boy has asked her to marryhim, for he loves her devotedly, but each timeshe has refusedhim. I think that if anyone could have drawn himinto the rightpath it would have been she, andthat his marriage might have changed his wholelife; but now, alas! it is too late--forever toolate!

"Now, Mr. Holmes, you know the people who live under myroof, and I shall continue withmy miserable story.

"When we were taking coffeein the drawing-room that nightafter dinner, Itold Arthur andMary my experience, and of the precious treasurewhich we had under our roof, suppressing only the name of my client. Lucy Parr,who had broughtin the coffee,had, I am sure,left the room; but I cannot swear that the doorwas closed. Maryand Arthur weremuch interestedand wished to see the famous coronet, but I thought it better not to disturb it.

" 'Where haveyou put it?' asked Arthur.

" 'In my own bureau.'

" 'Well, I hope to goodnessthe house won'tbe burgled during the night.' said he.

" 'It islocked up,' I answered.

" 'Oh,any old key will fit that bureau. When I was ayoungster I haveopened it myself with the key of the box-room cupboard.'

"He often had a wildway of talking,so that I thought little of whathe said. He followed me to my room, however, that night with avery grave face." 'Look here,dad,' said he with his eyes castdown, 'can youlet me have $200?'

" 'No, I cannot!' I answeredsharply. 'I have been far too generous with youin money matters.'

" 'You havebeen very kind,' said he, 'butI must have thismoney, or elseI can never showmy face insidethe club again.'" 'And a verygood thing, too!' I cried.

" 'Yes, but you would not have me leave it a dishonoured man,' saidhe. 'I could notbear the disgrace. I must raisethe money in some way, and if you will not letme have it, thenI must try other means.'

"I was very angry, for this was the third demand during the month. 'You shall not have a farthing from me,' I cried,on which he bowed and left the room without another word.

"Whenhe was gone I unlocked my bureau, made sure that my treasure was safe, and locked it again. Then I started to go round the house to see that all was secure--aduty which I usually leave to Mary but which I thought it well to perform myselfthat night. AsI came down thestairs I saw Mary herself at theside window ofthe hall, whichshe closed and fastened as I approached.

" 'Tell me, dad,' saidshe, looking, Ithought, a little disturbed, 'did you give Lucy, the maid, leave to go out to-night?'

" 'Certainly not.'

" 'She came in justnow by the backdoor. I have nodoubt that she has only been tothe side gate tosee someone, but I think that it is hardly safeand should be stopped.'

" 'Youmust speak to her in the morning, or I will ifyou prefer it. Are you sure thateverything is fastened?'

" 'Quite sure, dad.'" 'Then, good-night.' I kissedher and went upto my bedroom again, where I wassoon asleep.

"I am endeavouring to tell you everything, Mr. Holmes, which mayhave any bearingupon the case,but I beg that you will questionme upon any point which I do not make clear.""On the contrary, your statementis singularly lucid."

"I cometo a part of mystory now in which I should wishto be particularly so. I am nota very heavy sleeper, and the anxiety in my mind tended, no doubt, to make me even less so thanusual. About two in the morning, then, I was awakened by some sound in the house. It had ceasedere I was wideawake, but it had left an impression behind it as though a window had gently closed somewhere. Ilay listening with all my ears.Suddenly, to myhorror, there was a distinct sound of footstepsmoving softly in the next room.I slipped out of bed, all palpitating with fear, and peeped round the corner ofmy dressing-room door.

" 'Arthur!' I screamed,'you villain! you thief! How dare you touch that coronet?'

"The gas was half up, as I had leftit, and my unhappy boy, dressedonly in his shirt and trousers,was standing beside the light,holding the coronet in his hands. He appeared tobe wrenching atit, or bendingit with all hisstrength. At mycry he dropped it from his graspand turned as pale as death. Isnatched it up and examined it.One of the goldcorners, with three of the beryls in it, was missing.

" 'You blackguard!' I shouted, beside myself with rage. 'You have destroyed it! You havedishonoured me forever! Where are the jewels which you have stolen?'

" 'Stolen!' he cried.

" 'Yes, thief!' I roared, shaking him by the shoulder.

" 'There are none missing.There cannot beany missing,' said he.

" 'Thereare three missing. And you knowwhere they are.Must I call youa liar as wellas a thief? DidI not see you trying to tear offanother piece?'" 'You have called me names enough,' said he,'I will not stand it any longer.I shall not sayanother word about this business, since you have chosen to insult me. I will leave your house in the morning and make my own way in the world.'" 'You shall leave it in the hands of the police!' I cried half-mad with griefand rage. 'I shall have this matter probed to the bottom.'

" 'You shall learnnothing from me,' said he with apassion such asI should not have thought was in his nature. 'If you choose tocall the police,let the policefind what they can.'

"By this time the whole house was astir, for I had raisedmy voice in my anger. Mary was the first to rushinto my room, and, at the sightof the coronetand of Arthur'sface, she read the whole story and, with a scream, fell down senseless on the ground. I sent thehouse-maid forthe police and put the investigation into theirhands at once. When the inspector and a constable entered the house, Arthur, whohad stood sullenly with his arms folded, askedme whether it was my intention to charge him with theft. I answered that it hadceased to be a private matter, but had become apublic one, since the ruined coronet was national property. I was determined that the law shouldhave its way ineverything.

"'At least,' saidhe, 'you will not have me arrested at once. Itwould be to youradvantage as well as mine if Imight leave thehouse for five minutes.'

" 'That you may get away, or perhaps that you may conceal what you have stolen,' saidI. And then, realising the dreadful position inwhich I was placed, I implored him to remember that not only myhonour but thatof one who was far greater thanI was at stake;and that he threatened to raisea scandal whichwould convulse the nation. He might avert it allif he would buttell me what hehad done with the three missingstones.

" 'Youmay as well face the matter,' said I; 'you havebeen caught inthe act, and noconfession couldmake your guiltmore heinous. If you but make such reparation as is in your power, by telling us where the beryls are, all shall be forgiven and forgotten.'

"'Keep your forgiveness for those who ask for it,' he answered,turning away from me with a sneer. I saw that hewas too hardened for any wordsof mine to influence him. Therewas but one wayfor it. I calledin the inspector and gave him into custody. A search was made at once not onlyof his person but of his room and of every portion of the housewhere he could possibly have concealed the gems;but no trace ofthem could be found, nor wouldthe wretched boyopen his mouthfor all our persuasions and ourthreats. This morning he was removed to a cell,and I, after going through all the police formalities, have hurried round to youto implore youto use your skill in unravellingthe matter. Thepolice have openly confessed that they can at present make nothing of it. You may go to any expense which you think necessary.I have already offered a rewardof $1000. My God, what shall I do! I have lost my honour, my gems, and my son inone night. Oh,what shall I do!"

He put a handon either sideof his head androcked himself to and fro, droning to himself like a child whosegrief has got beyond words.

Sherlock Holmes sat silent for some few minutes, with his brows knitted and his eyes fixed upon the fire.

"Do youreceive much company?" he asked.

"None save mypartner with his family and anoccasional friend of Arthur's. Sir George Burnwell has been several times lately. No one else, Ithink."

"Do you go out much insociety?"

"Arthur does. Mary and I stay at home. We neither ofus care for it."

"That is unusual in a young girl."

"She is of a quiet nature. Besides, she is not so very young. She is four-and-twenty."

"This matter, from what you say,seems to have been a shock to her also."

"Terrible! She is evenmore affected than I."

"You have neither of you any doubt as to your son's guilt?"

"How can we have when I saw him with my own eyes with thecoronet in his hands."

"I hardly consider thata conclusive proof. Was the remainder of the coronet at all injured?"

"Yes, itwas twisted."

"Do you not think, then, that hemight have beentrying to straighten it?"

"Godbless you! You are doing what you can for him and for me. But itis too heavy atask. What was he doing there atall? If his purpose were innocent, why did he not say so?"

"Precisely. And ifit were guilty,why did he not invent a lie? Hissilence appearsto me to cut both ways. There are several singular points aboutthe case. Whatdid the police think of the noise which awoke you from your sleep?"

"They considered that it might be caused byArthur's closing his bedroom door."

"A likelystory! As if a man bent on felony would slam hisdoor so as to wake a household.What did they say, then, of thedisappearance of these gems?""They are stillsounding the planking and probing the furniturein the hope of finding them."

"Have they thought of looking outside the house?""Yes, they have shown extraordinary energy. The whole garden has already beenminutely examined."

"Now, my dear sir," said Holmes. "is it notobvious to younow that this matter really strikes very much deeper than eitheryou or the police were at firstinclined to think? It appearedto you to be a simple case; to me it seems exceedingly complex.Consider what isinvolved by your theory. You suppose that yourson came down from his bed, went, at great risk,to your dressing-room, opened your bureau, tookout your coronet, broke off bymain force a small portion of it, went off to some other place,concealed threegems out of thethirty-nine, with such skill that nobody can find them, and thenreturned with the other thirty-six into the room in which he exposed himself tothe greatest danger of being discovered. I askyou now, is sucha theory tenable?"

"But what other is there?"cried the bankerwith a gestureof despair. "Ifhis motives wereinnocent, why does he not explain them?"

"It is our task to find that out," replied Holmes; "so now, if you please, Mr. Holder, we will set off for Streathamtogether, and devote an hour toglancing a little more closely into details."

My friend insisted upon my accompanying them in their expedition,which I was eager enough to do,for my curiosity and sympathy were deeply stirred by the storyto which we hadlistened. I confess that the guilt of the banker's son appearedto me to be as obvious as it didto his unhappyfather, but still I had such faith in Holmes' judgment that I felt that there must be some grounds for hope as long as he was dissatisfied withthe accepted explanation. He hardly spoke a wordthe whole way out to the southern suburb, but sat with his chinupon his breastand his hat drawn over his eyes, sunk in the deepest thought. Our client appeared to have takenfresh heart atthe little glimpse of hope whichhad been presented to him, andhe even broke into a desultory chat with me overhis business affairs. A short railway journey and a shorter walk brought us toFairbank, the modest residence of the great financier.

Fairbankwas a good-sized square house of white stone, standing back a little from the road. A double carriage-sweep, with a snow-clad lawn, stretched down in front totwo large iron gates which closed the entrance.On the right side was a small wooden thicket, which led into a narrow path between two neat hedges stretching from the road to the kitchen door,and forming thetradesmen's entrance. On the left ran a lane which led to the stables, and wasnot itself within the grounds atall, being a public, though little used, thoroughfare. Holmes left us standingat the door andwalked slowly all round the house, across the front, down the tradesmen's path,and so round bythe garden behind into the stable lane. So longwas he that Mr.Holder and I went into the dining-room and waited by the fire until he should return. We were sitting there in silence when thedoor opened anda young lady came in. She was rather above the middle height, slim, with dark hair and eyes, which seemed the darker against theabsolute pallorof her skin. Ido not think that I have ever seen such deadly paleness in a woman's face. Her lips, too, were bloodless, but her eyes were flushed with crying.As she swept silently into theroom she impressed me with a greater sense of grief than the banker had done inthe morning, andit was the morestriking in heras she was evidently a woman ofstrong character, with immensecapacity for self-restraint. Disregarding my presence, she wentstraight to heruncle and passedher hand over his head with a sweet womanly caress.

"You havegiven orders that Arthur shouldbe liberated, have you not, dad?" she asked.

"No, no, my girl,the matter mustbe probed to thebottom."

"ButI am so sure that he is innocent. You know whatwoman's instincts are. I know that he has done no harm and thatyou will be sorry for having acted so harshly.""Why is he silent, then, if heis innocent?"

"Who knows? Perhaps because he was so angry thatyou should suspect him."

"How could I help suspecting him, whenI actually sawhim with the coronet in his hand?"

"Oh, but hehad only pickedit up to look atit. Oh, do, dotake my word forit that he is innocent. Let thematter drop andsay no more. Itis so dreadfulto think of ourdear Arthur in prison!"

"I shall never let it drop until the gems are found--never, Mary! Youraffection for Arthur blinds youas to the awfulconsequences tome. Far from hushing the thing up, I have brought a gentleman down from London to inquire more deeply into it.""This gentleman?" she asked, facing round to me.

"No, his friend. He wished usto leave him alone. He is roundin the stable lane now."

"Thestable lane?" She raised her dark eyebrows. "What can he hope tofind there? Ah!this, I suppose, is he. I trust, sir, that youwill succeed inproving, what Ifeel sure is thetruth, that mycousin Arthur isinnocent of this crime."

"I fully share your opinion, and I trust, with you, that we may proveit," returned Holmes, going back to the mat toknock the snow from his shoes. "I believe I havethe honour of addressing Miss Mary Holder. Might I ask you a question or two?""Pray do, sir,if it may help to clear this horrible affair up."

"You heard nothing yourself last night?"

"Nothing, until myuncle here beganto speak loudly. I heard that,and I came down."

"You shut upthe windows anddoors the nightbefore. Did youfasten all the windows?"

"Yes.""Were they allfastened this morning?"

"Yes.""You have a maid who has a sweetheart? I thinkthat you remarked to your unclelast night thatshe had been out to see him?""Yes, and she was the girl who waited in the drawing-room, and who may have heard uncle's remarks about the coronet."

"I see. You infer that she may have goneout to tell hersweetheart, andthat the two mayhave planned the robbery."

"But what is the good of all thesevague theories,"cried the banker impatiently, "when I have toldyou that I sawArthur with thecoronet in his hands?"

"Wait alittle, Mr. Holder. We must comeback to that. About this girl,Miss Holder. Yousaw her returnby the kitchen door, I presume?""Yes; when I went to see if the door was fastened for the night I met her slipping in. I saw the man, too, inthe gloom."

"Doyou know him?""Oh, yes! he isthe green-grocer who brings ourvegetables round. His name is Francis Prosper.""He stood," said Holmes, "to the left of the door--that is tosay, farther upthe path than isnecessary to reach the door?""Yes, he did.""And he is a manwith a wooden leg?"

Somethinglike fear sprangup in the younglady's expressive black eyes. "Why, you are like a magician," said she. "How doyou know that?"She smiled, butthere was no answering smile inHolmes' thin, eager face.

"I should be very glad now to go upstairs," said he."I shall probably wish to go over the outside of the house again. Perhaps I hadbetter take a look at the lowerwindows beforeI go up."

He walked swiftly round from one to the other, pausing only at the large one which looked from the hall onto the stable lane. This heopened and madea very carefulexamination of the sill with hispowerful magnifying lens. "Nowwe shall go upstairs," said he at last.

The banker's dressing-room was a plainly furnished little chamber, witha grey carpet,a large bureau,and a long mirror. Holmes went to the bureau first and looked hard at the lock."Which key wasused to open it?" he asked.

"That which my sonhimself indicated--that of the cupboard of the lumber-room."

"Have you it here?"

"That is it on the dressing-table."

SherlockHolmes took itup and opened the bureau.

"It is a noiseless lock," said he. "It is no wonder that it did not wake you. This case, I presume, contains the coronet. We must have a look at it."He opened the case, and takingout the diadem he laid it upon the table. It wasa magnificent specimen of the jeweller's art, and the thirty-six stones were the finest that Ihave ever seen.At one side of the coronet was acracked edge, where a corner holding three gemshad been torn away.

"Now, Mr.Holder," said Holmes, "here is the corner whichcorresponds to that which has been so unfortunately lost. MightI beg that you will break it off."

The banker recoiled in horror. "I should notdream of trying," said he.

"Then I will." Holmes suddenly benthis strength upon it, but without result. "I feel it give a little," said he; "but, though I amexceptionally strong in the fingers, it would take me all my time to break it.An ordinary mancould not do it.Now, what do you think would happen if I did break it, Mr. Holder? There wouldbe a noise likea pistol shot. Do you tell me that all this happened within a few yards of yourbed and that youheard nothing of it?"

"I do not know what to think. It is alldark to me."

"But perhaps it may grow lighter as we go. What doyou think, MissHolder?"

"I confess that I still share my uncle's perplexity.""Your son hadno shoes or slippers on when yousaw him?"

"Hehad nothing on save only his trousers and shirt."

"Thank you. We have certainlybeen favoured with extraordinary luck during this inquiry, andit will be entirely our own fault if we do not succeed in clearing the matter up. With your permission, Mr. Holder, I shall nowcontinue my investigations outside."

He went alone, at his ownrequest, for heexplained that any unnecessary footmarks might make his task more difficult. Foran hour or morehe was at work,returning at last with his feetheavy with snowand his features as inscrutableas ever.

"I think that I haveseen now all that there is to see, Mr. Holder,"said he; "I canserve you best by returning to my rooms."

"Butthe gems, Mr. Holmes. Where arethey?"

"I cannot tell."

The banker wrung his hands. "I shall never see them again!" he cried."And my son? Yougive me hopes?""My opinion isin no way altered."

"Then, forGod's sake, what was this darkbusiness which was acted in my house last night?"

"If you can call upon me at my Baker Street rooms to-morrow morning between nine and ten I shall be happy todo what I can tomake it clearer. I understand that you give mecarte blanche toact for you, provided only thatI get back thegems, and that you place no limit on the sum I may draw."

"I would give my fortune to have themback."

"Very good. I shall look into the matter between this and then. Good-bye; it is just possible that I may have to come over here again before evening."It was obviousto me that my companion's mind was now made up about the case, although what hisconclusions were was more thanI could even dimly imagine. Several times duringour homeward journey I endeavoured to sound himupon the point,but he always glided away to some other topic,until at last Igave it over indespair. It wasnot yet three when we found ourselves in our rooms once more. Hehurried to hischamber and wasdown again in afew minutes dressed as a commonloafer. With hiscollar turned up, his shiny, seedy coat, his red cravat, and his worn boots, hewas a perfect sample of the class.

"I think that this should do," said he, glancing into the glass above the fireplace. "I only wish that youcould come withme, Watson, butI fear that it won't do. I may be on the trail in this matter, or I may be following a will-o'-the-wisp, but I shall soon know which it is. I hope that I may beback in a few hours." He cut aslice of beef from the joint upon the sideboard,sandwiched it between two rounds of bread, andthrusting this rude meal into his pocket he started off upon hisexpedition.

Ihad just finished my tea when hereturned, evidently in excellent spirits, swinging an old elastic-sided boot inhis hand. He chucked it down into a corner andhelped himself to a cup of tea."I only lookedin as I passed,"said he. "I amgoing right on.""Where to?"

"Oh, to the otherside of the West End. It may besome time before I get back. Don't wait up forme in case I should be late."

"How are you getting on?"

"Oh, so so. Nothing tocomplain of. Ihave been out toStreatham sinceI saw you last,but I did not call at the house. It is a very sweet little problem, and I wouldnot have missedit for a good deal. However, Imust not sit gossiping here, butmust get thesedisreputable clothes off and return to my highlyrespectable self."

I could seeby his manner that he had stronger reasons forsatisfaction than his words alone would imply. His eyes twinkled, and there waseven a touch ofcolour upon hissallow cheeks. He hastened upstairs, and a few minutes later I heard the slam ofthe hall door,which told me that he was off once more upon hiscongenial hunt.I waited untilmidnight, but there was no signof his return,so I retired tomy room. It wasno uncommon thing for him to beaway for days and nights on endwhen he was hotupon a scent, sothat his lateness caused me nosurprise. I do not know at whathour he came in,but when I camedown to breakfast in the morning there he was with a cup of coffee in one handand the paper inthe other, as fresh and trim aspossible.

"Youwill excuse mybeginning without you, Watson,"said he, "but you remember thatour client has rather an early appointment thismorning."

"Why,it is after nine now," I answered. "I should not be surprised if that were he.I thought I heard a ring."

It was, indeed, ourfriend the financier. I was shocked by the change which had comeover him, for his face which was naturally of abroad and massive mould, was now pinched and fallen in, while his hair seemed to me at least ashade whiter. Heentered with aweariness and lethargy which waseven more painful than his violence of the morning before, andhe dropped heavily into the armchair which I pushed forward forhim.

"I do notknow what I havedone to be so severely tried,"said he. "Only two days ago I was a happy and prosperous man, without a care inthe world. Now Iam left to a lonely and dishonoured age. One sorrow comes closeupon the heelsof another. My niece, Mary, hasdeserted me."

"Deserted you?""Yes. Her bed this morning had not been slept in, her room was empty, and a notefor me lay uponthe hall table.I had said to her last night, in sorrow and notin anger, thatif she had married my boy all might have been well with him. Perhaps it was thoughtless of me tosay so. It is to that remark that she refers inthis note:

" 'MY DEAREST UNCLE:--I feel that Ihave brought trouble upon you,and that if I had acted differently this terrible misfortune might never have occurred. I cannot, with this thought in my mind,ever again be happy under your roof, and I feelthat I must leave you forever. Do not worry about my future, forthat is provided for; and, above all, do not search for me, forit will be fruitless labour andan ill-serviceto me. In life or in death, I amever your loving


" 'MARY.'

"What could she mean by that note, Mr. Holmes? Doyou think it points to suicide?"

"No, no, nothing of the kind.It is perhaps the best possiblesolution. I trust, Mr. Holder,that you are nearing the end ofyour troubles.""Ha! You say so! You have heardsomething, Mr.Holmes; you havelearned something! Where are the gems?"

"You would not think $1000 apiece an excessive sum forthem?"

"I would pay ten."

"That would be unnecessary. Three thousand will cover the matter. And there is a little reward, I fancy. Have you your check-book?Here is a pen. Better make it out for $4000."

With a dazed facethe banker madeout the required check. Holmeswalked over to his desk, took out a little triangular piece of gold with three gems in it, and threw it down upon the table.

With a shriek of joy our client clutched it up.

"You have it!" hegasped. "I am saved! I am saved!"

The reactionof joy was as passionate as hisgrief had been,and he hugged his recovered gems to his bosom."There is one other thing you owe, Mr. Holder,"said Sherlock Holmes rather sternly.

"Owe!" Hecaught up a pen. "Name the sum,and I will payit."

"No, the debt is not to me. You owe a veryhumble apologyto that noble lad, your son, whohas carried himself in this matter as I shouldbe proud to seemy own son do, should I ever chance to have one."

"Then it wasnot Arthur who took them?"

"I told you yesterday, and I repeatto-day, that itwas not."

"Youare sure of it!Then let us hurry to him at onceto let him knowthat the truthis known."

"Heknows it already. When I had cleared it all up Ihad an interview with him, andfinding that hewould not tell me the story, I told it to him, on which he had to confess that Iwas right and to add the very few details whichwere not yet quite clear to me.Your news of this morning, however, may open his lips."

"For heaven's sake, tell me, then, what is this extraordinary mystery!"

"I will do so, and I will show you the stepsby which I reached it. And let me say to you, first, that whichit is hardest for me to say andfor you to hear:there has beenan understandingbetween Sir George Burnwell andyour niece Mary. They have nowfled together.""My Mary? Impossible!"

"It isunfortunately more than possible; it is certain.Neither you noryour son knew the true character of this man when you admittedhim into your family circle. Heis one of the most dangerous menin England--a ruined gambler, an absolutely desperate villain,a man without heart or conscience. Your niece knew nothing of such men. When hebreathed his vows to her, as hehad done to a hundred before her, she flatteredherself that shealone had touched his heart. The devil knows best what he said,but at least she became his tool and was in thehabit of seeinghim nearly every evening."

"Icannot, and I will not, believeit!" cried the banker with an ashen face.

"I will tell you, then, what occurredin your house last night. Yourniece, when youhad, as she thought, gone to your room, slippeddown and talkedto her lover through the windowwhich leads intothe stable lane. His footmarkshad pressed right through the snow, so long hadhe stood there.She told him ofthe coronet. Hiswicked lust forgold kindled atthe news, and he bent her to his will. I have no doubt that sheloved you, butthere are womenin whom the loveof a lover extinguishes all other loves, and Ithink that she must have been one. She had hardly listened to his instructions when she saw youcoming downstairs, on which sheclosed the window rapidly and told you about oneof the servants' escapade withher wooden-legged lover, which was all perfectlytrue.

"Your boy, Arthur, wentto bed after hisinterview withyou but he sleptbadly on account of his uneasiness about his club debts. In themiddle of the night he heard asoft tread passhis door, so herose and, looking out, was surprised to see hiscousin walking very stealthily along the passageuntil she disappeared into yourdressing-room.Petrified with astonishment, thelad slipped onsome clothes andwaited there inthe dark to seewhat would comeof this strangeaffair. Presently she emerged from the room again, and in the light of the passage-lamp your son saw that she carried the precious coronet in her hands. She passed down the stairs, and he, thrilling with horror, ran along and slipped behind the curtain near your door, whence he could see what passed inthe hall beneath. He saw her stealthily open the window, hand out the coronet to someone in thegloom, and thenclosing it oncemore hurry backto her room, passing quite close to where he stood hid behind the curtain.

"Aslong as she wason the scene hecould not takeany action without a horrible exposure of the woman whom he loved. But the instant that she wasgone he realisedhow crushing amisfortune thiswould be for you, and how all-important it was to set it right.He rushed down,just as he was,in his bare feet, opened the window, sprang outinto the snow, and ran down thelane, where he could see a darkfigure in the moonlight. Sir George Burnwell tried to get away,but Arthur caught him, and therewas a strugglebetween them, your lad tugging at one side of the coronet, and his opponent at the other. In thescuffle, your son struck Sir George and cut himover the eye. Then something suddenly snapped,and your son, finding that he had the coronet inhis hands, rushed back, closedthe window, ascended to your room, and had justobserved that the coronet had been twisted in the struggle and was endeavouringto straighten itwhen you appeared upon the scene."

"Is it possible?" gasped the banker.

"Youthen roused hisanger by callinghim names at amoment when he felt that he haddeserved your warmest thanks. Hecould not explain the true state of affairs without betraying one who certainlydeserved littleenough consideration at his hands. He took themore chivalrousview, however, and preserved hersecret."

"Andthat was why sheshrieked and fainted when she saw the coronet,"cried Mr. Holder. "Oh, my God!what a blind fool I have been! And his asking tobe allowed to go out for five minutes! The dearfellow wanted to see if the missing piece wereat the scene ofthe struggle. How cruelly I havemisjudged him!""When I arrived at the house,"continued Holmes, "I at once went very carefully round it to observe if there were any traces in the snow whichmight help me.I knew that nonehad fallen since the evening before, and also that there had been a strong frost to preserve impressions. I passed along the tradesmen's path,but found it alltrampled down and indistinguishable. Just beyond it, however, at the far side of the kitchen door, a woman hadstood and talkedwith a man, whose round impressions on one sideshowed that hehad a wooden leg. I could even tell that they had been disturbed, for the womanhad run back swiftly to the door, as was shown by the deep toe and light heel marks, while Wooden-leg had waiteda little, and then had gone away. I thought atthe time that this might be themaid and her sweetheart, of whomyou had alreadyspoken to me, and inquiry showed it was so. I passed round thegarden without seeing anything more than randomtracks, which Itook to be the police; but whenI got into the stable lane a very long and complex story was written in the snowin front of me."There was a double line of tracks of a bootedman, and a second double line which I saw withdelight belongedto a man with naked feet. I wasat once convinced from what youhad told me that the latter wasyour son. The first had walkedboth ways, but the other had runswiftly, and ashis tread was marked in placesover the depression of the boot,it was obviousthat he had passed after the other. I followed them up and foundthey led to thehall window, where Boots had worn all the snowaway while waiting. Then I walked to the other end, which was ahundred yards ormore down the lane. I saw whereBoots had facedround, where the snow was cut up as though there had been a struggle, and, finally, where a fewdrops of bloodhad fallen, to show me that I was not mistaken.Boots had then run down the lane, and another little smudge of blood showed thatit was he who had been hurt. When he came to the highroad at the other end, I found that the pavement had beencleared, so there was an end tothat clue.

"Onentering the house, however, I examined, as youremember, the sill and frameworkof the hall window with my lens, and I could atonce see that someone had passed out. I could distinguish the outline of an instep where the wet foot had beenplaced in comingin. I was thenbeginning to beable to form anopinion as to what had occurred.A man had waited outside the window; someone had brought the gems; the deed hadbeen overseen by your son; he had pursued the thief; had struggled with him; they had each tugged at the coronet, their unitedstrength causinginjuries whichneither alone could have effected. He had returned with the prize, but had lefta fragment in the grasp of his opponent. So farI was clear. Thequestion now was, who was the man and who was it brought him the coronet?

"Itis an old maximof mine that when you have excluded the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth. Now, I knew that itwas not you whohad brought itdown, so there only remained your niece and themaids. But if itwere the maids,why should yourson allow himself to be accusedin their place?There could beno possible reason. As he lovedhis cousin, however, there was an excellent explanation why he should retain hersecret--the more so as the secret was a disgraceful one. When Iremembered thatyou had seen her at that window, and how she had fainted on seeing the coronetagain, my conjecture became a certainty.

"And who could it be who was her confederate? A loverevidently, for who else could outweigh the loveand gratitude which she must feel to you? I knewthat you went out little, and that your circleof friends was avery limited one. But among them was Sir GeorgeBurnwell. I hadheard of him before as being aman of evil reputation among women. It must havebeen he who wore those boots and retained the missing gems. Even though he knewthat Arthur haddiscovered him,he might stillflatter himselfthat he was safe, for the lad could not say a word without compromising his ownfamily.

"Well,your own good sense will suggestwhat measures Itook next. I went in the shapeof a loafer to Sir George's house, managed to pick up an acquaintance with his valet, learned that his master had cut his head the night before,and, finally, at the expense ofsix shillings,made all sure bybuying a pair of his cast-off shoes. With theseI journeyed down to Streatham and saw that theyexactly fittedthe tracks."

"Isaw an ill-dressed vagabond inthe lane yesterday evening," said Mr. Holder.

"Precisely. It was I. I found that I had my man,so I came home and changed my clothes. It was adelicate part which I had to play then, for I saw that a prosecution must be avoided to avert scandal, and I knew that so astutea villain wouldsee that our hands were tied inthe matter. I went and saw him.At first, of course, he deniedeverything. Butwhen I gave himevery particularthat had occurred, he tried tobluster and tookdown a life-preserver from thewall. I knew myman, however, and I clapped a pistol to his headbefore he couldstrike. Then hebecame a littlemore reasonable. I told him that we would givehim a price forthe stones he held--$1000 apiece. That brought out the first signs of grief thathe had shown. 'Why, dash it all!' said he, 'I've let them go atsix hundred forthe three!' I soon managed to get the address of the receiver who had them, onpromising him that there would be no prosecution. Off I set to him, and after much chaffering Igot our stones at $1000 apiece.Then I looked inupon your son,told him that all was right, andeventually gotto my bed abouttwo o'clock, after what I may call a really hardday's work."

"A day which hassaved England from a great public scandal," saidthe banker, rising. "Sir, I cannot find words to thank you, butyou shall not find me ungrateful for what you have done. Your skill has indeedexceeded all that I have heard of it. And now Imust fly to my dear boy to apologise to him forthe wrong whichI have done him.As to what youtell me of poorMary, it goes tomy very heart.Not even your skill can inform me where she is now."

"I think that we may safely say," returnedHolmes, "that she is wherever Sir George Burnwell is. It is equally certain, too, that whateverher sins are, they will soon receive a more than sufficient punishment."

XII.THE ADVENTURE OF THE COPPER BEECHES


"To the man who loves artfor its own sake," remarked Sherlock Holmes, tossing aside theadvertisement sheet of the DailyTelegraph, "itis frequently inits least important and lowliest manifestationsthat the keenest pleasure is tobe derived. Itis pleasant to me to observe, Watson, that you have so far grasped this truth that in these little records of our cases which you have been goodenough to drawup, and, I am bound to say, occasionally to embellish, you havegiven prominencenot so much tothe many causescelebres and sensational trialsin which I havefigured but rather to those incidents which mayhave been trivial in themselves,but which havegiven room for those faculties of deduction andof logical synthesis which I have made my special province."

"And yet," said I,smiling, "I cannot quite hold myself absolved from the charge of sensationalismwhich has beenurged against myrecords."

"Youhave erred, perhaps," he observed, taking up aglowing cinder with the tongs and lighting withit the long cherry-wood pipe which was wont to replace his claywhen he was in adisputatious rather than a meditative mood--"you have erred perhaps in attempting to put colourand life into each of your statements instead of confining yourself to the taskof placing uponrecord that severe reasoning from cause to effect which is really the only notable feature about the thing."

"It seems to me that I have doneyou full justicein the matter,"I remarked withsome coldness,for I was repelled by the egotism which I had more than once observed to be a strong factor in my friend's singular character."No, it is not selfishness or conceit," said he,answering, as was his wont, mythoughts ratherthan my words. "If I claim fulljustice for my art, it is because it is an impersonal thing--a thing beyond myself. Crime is common. Logic is rare. Therefore itis upon the logic rather than upon the crime that you should dwell. You have degraded what should have been a course of lectures into a seriesof tales."

It was a cold morning of the early spring, and we sat after breakfast on either sideof a cheery fire in the old room at Baker Street. A thick fog rolled down between the lines ofdun-coloured houses, and the opposing windows loomed like dark,shapeless blursthrough the heavy yellow wreaths. Our gas was lit and shone on the white cloth and glimmer of china and metal, for the table hadnot been cleared yet. SherlockHolmes had beensilent all the morning, dippingcontinuously into the advertisement columns of asuccession of papers until at last, having apparently given uphis search, he had emerged in novery sweet temper to lecture meupon my literary shortcomings."At the same time," he remarkedafter a pause,during which hehad sat puffingat his long pipeand gazing downinto the fire,"you can hardlybe open to a charge of sensationalism, for out of these cases which you have been so kind as tointerest yourself in, a fair proportion do not treat of crime, in its legal sense, at all. The small matter in which I endeavoured to help the King of Bohemia,the singular experience of MissMary Sutherland,the problem connected with theman with the twisted lip, and the incident of the noble bachelor, were all matters which are outside the pale ofthe law. But inavoiding the sensational, I fear that you may have bordered onthe trivial."

"The end may havebeen so," I answered, "but themethods I hold to have been novel and of interest."

"Pshaw, mydear fellow, what do the public,the great unobservant public, who could hardlytell a weaver byhis tooth or acompositor by his left thumb, care about the finer shades of analysis and deduction! But, indeed, if you are trivial. I cannot blame you, for the days of the great cases are past. Man, or at least criminal man, has lost allenterprise and originality. As to my own littlepractice, it seems to be degenerating into an agency for recovering lost lead pencils and givingadvice to youngladies from boarding-schools. Ithink that I have touched bottom at last, however. This note Ihad this morningmarks my zero-point, I fancy. Read it!" He tossed a crumpled letter across to me.

It was datedfrom Montague Place upon the preceding evening,and ran thus:"DEAR MR. HOLMES:--I am very anxious to consultyou as to whether I should or should not accepta situation which has been offered to me as governess. I shall call at half-pastten to-morrow if I do not inconvenience you. Yours faithfully,"VIOLET HUNTER."

"Do you knowthe young lady?" I asked.

"NotI."

"It is half-past ten now.""Yes, and I have no doubt thatis her ring.""It may turn outto be of more interest than youthink. You remember that the affair of the bluecarbuncle, which appeared to bea mere whim atfirst, developedinto a seriousinvestigation. It may be so in this case, also.""Well, let ushope so. But ourdoubts will very soon be solved, for here, unless I am much mistaken, is the person in question."

As he spokethe door openedand a young ladyentered the room. She was plainly but neatly dressed, with a bright, quick face, freckled likea plover's egg,and with the brisk manner of a woman who has hadher own way tomake in the world.

"You will excuse my troubling you, I am sure," said she, asmy companion rose to greet her,"but I have hada very strange experience, and as I have no parents or relationsof any sort from whom I could ask advice, I thought that perhaps you would be kind enough to tell me what I should do."

"Praytake a seat, Miss Hunter. I shall be happy to doanything that Ican to serve you."

I could seethat Holmes wasfavourably impressed by the manner and speech of his new client. He looked herover in his searching fashion, and then composedhimself, with his lids droopingand his finger-tips together, to listen to herstory.

"I havebeen a governessfor five years," said she, "inthe family of Colonel Spence Munro, but two months ago the colonel received an appointment at Halifax, in Nova Scotia, and tookhis children over to America with him, so that Ifound myself without a situation. I advertised,and I answeredadvertisements,but without success. At last thelittle money which I had savedbegan to run short, and I was atmy wit's end asto what I should do.

"There isa well-known agency for governesses in the WestEnd called Westaway's, and there I used to callabout once a week in order to see whether anything had turned up which might suit me. Westawaywas the name ofthe founder of the business, butit is really managed by Miss Stoper. She sits in her own littleoffice, and theladies who areseeking employment wait in an anteroom, and arethen shown in one by one, when she consults herledgers and seeswhether she hasanything whichwould suit them."Well, when Icalled last weekI was shown into the little office as usual, but I found that Miss Stoper was not alone. A prodigiously stout man with a very smiling face anda great heavy chin which rolleddown in fold upon fold over histhroat sat at her elbow with a pair of glasses on his nose, looking very earnestly at the ladieswho entered. AsI came in he gave quite a jumpin his chair andturned quicklyto Miss Stoper." 'That will do,' said he; 'I could not ask foranything better. Capital! capital!' He seemed quite enthusiastic and rubbed hishands togetherin the most genial fashion. He was such a comfortable-looking man that it was quite a pleasure to look at him." 'You are looking for a situation, miss?' he asked.

" 'Yes, sir.'

" 'As governess?'

" 'Yes,sir.'

" 'And what salary do youask?'

" 'I had$4 a month in my last place with Colonel SpenceMunro.'

" 'Oh,tut, tut! sweating--rank sweating!' he cried, throwing his fathands out into the air like a man who is in a boiling passion. 'How could anyoneoffer so pitiful a sum to a lady with such attractions and accomplishments?'

"'My accomplishments, sir, may be less than youimagine,' said I. 'A little French, a little German, music, anddrawing--'

" 'Tut, tut!' he cried. 'This is allquite beside the question. Thepoint is, have you or have you not the bearing and deportment ofa lady? There it is in a nutshell. If you havenot, you are notfitted for therearing of a child who may someday play a considerable part inthe history of the country. Butif you have why,then, how couldany gentleman ask you to condescend to accept anything under the three figures?Your salary with me, madam, would commence at $100 a year.'

"You may imagine,Mr. Holmes, thatto me, destitute as I was, suchan offer seemedalmost too goodto be true. Thegentleman, however, seeing perhaps the look ofincredulity uponmy face, openeda pocket-book and took out a note.

" 'It is also my custom,' said he, smilingin the most pleasant fashion until his eyes werejust two littleshining slits amid the white creases of his face, 'to advance to my young ladies half their salary beforehand,so that they maymeet any littleexpenses of their journey and their wardrobe.'"It seemed to me that I had never met so fascinating and so thoughtful a man. As I was alreadyin debt to my tradesmen, the advance was a greatconvenience, and yet there wassomething unnatural about the whole transactionwhich made me wish to know a little more beforeI quite committed myself.

" 'May I ask where you live, sir?' said I.

" 'Hampshire. Charming rural place. The Copper Beeches, five miles on thefar side of Winchester. It is the most lovely country, my dearyoung lady, andthe dearest oldcountry-house.'" 'And my duties, sir? I shouldbe glad to knowwhat they wouldbe.'

" 'One child--one dear little romper justsix years old.Oh, if you couldsee him killingcockroaches with a slipper! Smack! smack! smack! Three gone before you could wink!' He leaned back in his chairand laughed hiseyes into his head again.

"I was a little startled at the nature of the child's amusement, butthe father's laughter made me think that perhaps he was joking." 'My sole duties, then,' I asked, 'are to take charge of a single child?'

"'No, no, not thesole, not the sole, my dear young lady,' he cried. 'Your duty would be, as I amsure your goodsense would suggest, to obey anylittle commandsmy wife might give, provided always that they were such commands as a lady might with proprietyobey. You see no difficulty, heh?'

" 'I shouldbe happy to make myself useful.'

" 'Quite so.In dress now, for example. We are faddy people,you know--faddybut kind-hearted. If you were asked to wear anydress which we might give you, you would not object to our little whim. Heh?'

"'No,' said I, considerably astonished at his words.

" 'Or to sit here, or sitthere, that would not be offensive to you?'

" 'Oh, no.'

" 'Orto cut your hairquite short before you come tous?'

"I could hardly believe myears. As you may observe, Mr. Holmes, my hair is somewhat luxuriant, and of a rather peculiar tint of chestnut.It has been considered artistic. I could not dream of sacrificing it in this offhand fashion." 'I am afraid that that is quite impossible,' said I. He had been watching me eagerly out of his small eyes, and I could see ashadow pass overhis face as I spoke.

" 'I am afraid that it isquite essential,' said he. 'Itis a little fancy of my wife's,and ladies' fancies, you know, madam, ladies' fancies must be consulted. And soyou won't cut your hair?'

" 'No, sir, I reallycould not,' I answered firmly." 'Ah, very well; then that quite settles the matter. It is a pity, because in other respects you would really have done very nicely. In that case, Miss Stoper,I had best inspect a few more of your young ladies.'

"The manageress had sat all this while busy with her papers without a word to either of us, but she glanced at me now with so much annoyance upon her face that I could not help suspecting that she hadlost a handsomecommission through my refusal." 'Do you desireyour name to bekept upon the books?' she asked.

" 'If you please, Miss Stoper.'

" 'Well, really, it seems rather useless, since you refuse the most excellent offers in thisfashion,' saidshe sharply. 'You can hardly expect us to exertourselves to find another such opening for you.Good-day to you,Miss Hunter.' She struck a gongupon the table,and I was shownout by the page.

"Well, Mr. Holmes, when I gotback to my lodgings and found little enough inthe cupboard, and two or three bills upon the table. I began toask myself whether I had not done a very foolishthing. After all, if these people had strange fads and expectedobedience on the most extraordinary matters, they were at leastready to pay for their eccentricity. Very few governesses in England are getting $100 a year. Besides, what usewas my hair tome? Many peopleare improved bywearing it shortand perhaps I should be among the number. Nextday I was inclined to think thatI had made a mistake, and by the day after I was sure of it. Ihad almost overcome my pride sofar as to go back to the agencyand inquire whether the place was still open when I received this letter from the gentleman himself. I have it here and I will read it to you:" 'The Copper Beeches, near Winchester.

" 'DEAR MISS HUNTER:--Miss Stoper hasvery kindly given me your address, and I write from here to askyou whether youhave reconsidered your decision.My wife is veryanxious that you should come, for she has beenmuch attracted by my descriptionof you. We arewilling to give$30 a quarter, or $120 a year, so as to recompense you for any little inconvenience which our fads may cause you. They are not very exacting, after all. My wifeis fond of a particular shade of electric blueand would like you to wear sucha dress indoorsin the morning.You need not, however, go to theexpense of purchasing one, as we have one belonging to my deardaughter Alice (now in Philadelphia), which would, I should think, fit you verywell. Then, as to sitting here or there, or amusing yourself inany manner indicated, that needcause you no inconvenience. As regards your hair, it is no doubta pity, especially as I could not help remarking its beauty during our short interview, but I am afraid that Imust remain firmupon this point, and I only hope that the increased salary mayrecompense you for the loss. Your duties, as faras the child isconcerned, arevery light. Nowdo try to come,and I shall meetyou with the dog-cart at Winchester. Let me know your train. Yours faithfully," 'JEPHRO RUCASTLE.'

"That isthe letter which I have just received, Mr. Holmes, and my mindis made up thatI will accept it. I thought, however, that before taking the final step I shouldlike to submitthe whole matterto your consideration."

"Well,Miss Hunter, ifyour mind is made up, that settles the question," said Holmes,smiling.

"But you would not advise me to refuse?"

"I confess that it is not the situation which I should liketo see a sisterof mine apply for."

"What is the meaning of itall, Mr. Holmes?"

"Ah, I have no data. I cannottell. Perhaps you have yourselfformed some opinion?"

"Well, there seems to meto be only onepossible solution. Mr. Rucastleseemed to be a very kind, good-natured man. Is it not possible that his wife isa lunatic, thathe desires to keep the matter quiet for fear sheshould be takento an asylum, and that he humours her fancies in every way in order to preventan outbreak?"

"That is a possible solution--infact, as mattersstand, it is the most probableone. But in anycase it does notseem to be a nice household fora young lady.""But the money,Mr. Holmes, themoney!"

"Well,yes, of coursethe pay is good--too good. Thatis what makes meuneasy. Why should they give you $120 a year, when they could have their pick for $40? There must be some strong reason behind."

"I thought that if I told youthe circumstances you would understand afterwards if I wanted your help. I should feel so muchstronger if I felt that you wereat the back ofme."

"Oh, you may carry that feeling away withyou. I assure you that your little problem promises to be the most interesting which has come myway for some months. There is something distinctly novel aboutsome of the features. If you should find yourself in doubt or indanger--"

"Danger! What dangerdo you foresee?"

Holmes shookhis head gravely. "It would cease to be a dangerif we could define it," said he. "But at any time, day or night, a telegram would bring me downto your help.""That is enough." She rose briskly from her chair with the anxiety all swept from her face. "Ishall go down toHampshire quiteeasy in my mindnow. I shall write to Mr. Rucastle at once, sacrifice my poor hair to-night, and start for Winchester to-morrow." With a few grateful words toHolmes she badeus both good-night and bustled off upon her way."At least," said I as we heardher quick, firmsteps descending the stairs, "she seems to be ayoung lady whois very well able to take care of herself."

"And she would needto be," said Holmes gravely. "Iam much mistaken if we do not hear from her before many days are past."

It wasnot very long before my friend's prediction wasfulfilled. A fortnight went by,during which Ifrequently foundmy thoughts turning in her direction and wondering what strangeside-alley of human experiencethis lonely woman had strayed into. The unusualsalary, the curious conditions,the light duties, all pointed tosomething abnormal, though whether a fad or a plot, or whetherthe man were a philanthropist ora villain, it was quite beyondmy powers to determine. As to Holmes, I observedthat he sat frequently for halfan hour on end,with knitted brows and an abstracted air, but he swept the matter away with a wave of his handwhen I mentionedit. "Data! data! data!" he cried impatiently. "I can't make bricks without clay." And yet he would always windup by mutteringthat no sister of his should ever have acceptedsuch a situation.

The telegramwhich we eventually received came late one nightjust as I was thinking of turning in and Holmeswas settling down to one of those all-night chemical researcheswhich he frequently indulged in, when I would leave him stooping over a retortand a test-tubeat night and find him in the same position whenI came down to breakfast in themorning. He opened the yellow envelope, and then, glancing at the message, threwit across to me.

"Just look upthe trains in Bradshaw," said he, and turned back to his chemical studies.

Thesummons was a brief and urgentone.

"Please beat the Black Swan Hotel at Winchester at middayto-morrow," itsaid. "Do come!I am at my wit'send.


"HUNTER."

"Will you come with me?" asked Holmes, glancing up.

"I should wish to."

"Just look it up, then."

"There isa train at half-past nine," said I, glancing over my Bradshaw."It is due at Winchester at 11:30."

"That willdo very nicely.Then perhaps I had better postpone my analysis of the acetones,as we may need to be at our bestin the morning."

By eleven o'clock the next day we were well upon our way to the old English capital. Holmes had been buried in the morning papers all the waydown, but afterwe had passed the Hampshire border he threw them down and beganto admire the scenery. It was an ideal spring day, a light bluesky, flecked with little fleecywhite clouds drifting across from west to east.The sun was shining very brightly, and yet there was an exhilarating nip in theair, which setan edge to a man's energy. All over the countryside, away to therolling hills around Aldershot,the little redand grey roofs of the farm-steadings peeped outfrom amid the light green of thenew foliage.

"Are they not fresh and beautiful?" I cried withall the enthusiasm of a man fresh from the fogsof Baker Street.But Holmes shook his head gravely.

"Do you know, Watson," said he, "that it is one of the curses of a mind with a turn like mine that I mustlook at everything with reference to my own special subject. Youlook at these scattered houses,and you are impressed by theirbeauty. I look at them, and theonly thought which comes to me is a feeling of their isolation and of the impunity with which crime may be committed there."

"Good heavens!" Icried. "Who would associate crime with these dear old homesteads?"

"They alwaysfill me with acertain horror.It is my belief,Watson, foundedupon my experience, that the lowest and vilestalleys in Londondo not presenta more dreadfulrecord of sin than does the smiling and beautiful countryside.""You horrify me!"

"But the reason is very obvious. The pressure of public opinion can do in the town what thelaw cannot accomplish. There isno lane so vilethat the screamof a tortured child, or the thudof a drunkard'sblow, does notbeget sympathy and indignation among the neighbours, and then the whole machinery of justice isever so close that a word of complaint can set it going, and there is but a stepbetween the crime and the dock.But look at these lonely houses, each in its own fields, filledfor the most part with poor ignorant folk who know little of the law. Think ofthe deeds of hellish cruelty, the hidden wickedness which may goon, year in, year out, in suchplaces, and nonethe wiser. Hadthis lady who appeals to us forhelp gone to live in Winchester,I should neverhave had a fearfor her. It is the five miles ofcountry which makes the danger.Still, it is clear that she isnot personally threatened."

"No. If she can come to Winchesterto meet us she can get away."

"Quite so. She has her freedom.""What can be the matter, then?Can you suggestno explanation?""I have devised seven separateexplanations, each of which would cover the facts as far as weknow them. But which of these iscorrect can only be determinedby the fresh information which we shall no doubtfind waiting for us. Well, there is the tower of the cathedral,and we shall soon learn all that Miss Hunter has to tell."

TheBlack Swan is an inn of reputein the High Street, at no distance from the station, and there we found the young lady waiting for us. She had engaged a sitting-room, and our lunch awaited usupon the table."I am so delighted that you have come," she said earnestly. "Itis so very kindof you both; but indeed I do not know what I should do. Your advice will be altogether invaluable to me."

"Pray tell us what has happened to you."

"I will doso, and I mustbe quick, for Ihave promised Mr. Rucastle to beback before three. I got his leave to come intotown this morning, though he little knew for what purpose."

"Let us have everything in its dueorder." Holmesthrust his longthin legs out towards the fire and composed himself to listen."In the first place, I may say that I have met,on the whole, with no actual ill-treatment fromMr. and Mrs. Rucastle. It is only fair to them to say that. ButI cannot understand them, and Iam not easy in my mind about them."

"What can you not understand?"

"Their reasons for their conduct. But you shall have it alljust as it occurred. When I came down, Mr. Rucastle met me hereand drove me inhis dog-cart tothe Copper Beeches. It is, as he said, beautifully situated, but it is not beautiful in itself,for it is a large square blockof a house, whitewashed, but allstained and streaked with dampand bad weather.There are grounds round it, woods on three sides, and on the fourth a field which slopes down to the Southampton highroad, which curves past about a hundred yards from the front door. This ground in front belongs to the house, but the woods all round arepart of Lord Southerton's preserves. A clump ofcopper beeches immediately in front of the halldoor has given its name to the place.

"I was driven over by myemployer, who was as amiable asever, and was introduced by himthat evening tohis wife and thechild. There was no truth, Mr.Holmes, in the conjecture whichseemed to us tobe probable in your rooms at Baker Street. Mrs.Rucastle is notmad. I found herto be a silent,pale-faced woman, much youngerthan her husband, not more thanthirty, I shouldthink, while hecan hardly be less than forty-five. From theirconversation I have gathered that they have beenmarried about seven years, thathe was a widower, and that hisonly child by the first wife wasthe daughter who has gone to Philadelphia. Mr.Rucastle told mein private thatthe reason whyshe had left them was that she had an unreasoning aversion to her stepmother. Asthe daughter could not have been less than twenty, I can quiteimagine that herposition must have been uncomfortable with herfather's young wife.

"Mrs. Rucastle seemed to me to be colourless in mind as well as in feature. She impressedme neither favourably nor the reverse. She was anonentity. It was easy to see that she was passionately devotedboth to her husband and to herlittle son. Herlight grey eyeswandered continually from one tothe other, noting every littlewant and forestalling it if possible. He was kind to her also inhis bluff, boisterous fashion,and on the wholethey seemed tobe a happy couple. And yet she had some secret sorrow, this woman. She would often be lost in deep thought, withthe saddest look upon her face.More than onceI have surprisedher in tears. Ihave thought sometimes that itwas the disposition of her childwhich weighed upon her mind, for I have never met so utterly spoiled and so ill-natured a little creature. He is small for hisage, with a headwhich is quitedisproportionately large. His whole life appearsto be spent inan alternation between savage fits of passion and gloomy intervals of sulking. Giving pain to any creature weaker than himself seems to be his one idea of amusement, and he shows quite remarkable talent in planning the capture of mice, little birds, and insects. But I would rather not talk about the creature, Mr. Holmes, and, indeed,he has little todo with my story."

"I am gladof all details,"remarked my friend, "whether they seem to you to be relevant ornot."

"I shalltry not to missanything of importance. The oneunpleasant thing about the house, which struckme at once, wasthe appearance and conduct of the servants. There are only two,a man and his wife. Toller, forthat is his name, is a rough, uncouth man, withgrizzled hair and whiskers, anda perpetual smell of drink. Twice since I have been with them hehas been quitedrunk, and yet Mr. Rucastle seemed to take no notice of it. Hiswife is a very tall and strong woman with a sourface, as silentas Mrs. Rucastle and much lessamiable. They are a most unpleasant couple, butfortunately I spend most of my time in the nursery and my own room, which are next to each otherin one corner of the building."For two days after my arrivalat the Copper Beeches my life was very quiet; onthe third, Mrs.Rucastle came down just after breakfast and whispered somethingto her husband." 'Oh, yes,' said he, turningto me, 'we are very much obligedto you, Miss Hunter, for falling in with our whims so far as tocut your hair.I assure you that it has not detracted in the tiniest iota fromyour appearance.We shall now see how the electric-blue dress will become you. You will find itlaid out upon the bed in your room, and if you would be so goodas to put it onwe should both be extremely obliged.'

"The dress which I foundwaiting for me was of a peculiarshade of blue.It was of excellent material, asort of beige, but it bore unmistakable signs ofhaving been worn before. It could not have beena better fit ifI had been measured for it. Both Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle expressed a delight at the look of it, which seemed quite exaggerated inits vehemence.They were waiting for me in thedrawing-room, which is a very large room, stretching along the entire front of the house, with three long windows reaching downto the floor. Achair had been placed close to the central window, with its backturned towardsit. In this I was asked to sit,and then Mr. Rucastle, walking up and down on the other side ofthe room, beganto tell me a series of the funniest stories thatI have ever listened to. You cannot imagine howcomical he was,and I laughed until I was quiteweary. Mrs. Rucastle, however,who has evidently no sense of humour, never so much as smiled, but sat with herhands in her lap, and a sad, anxious look upon her face. After an hour or so, Mr. Rucastle suddenly remarked that it was time tocommence the duties of the day,and that I might change my dress and go to little Edward in thenursery.

"Twodays later thissame performancewas gone through under exactlysimilar circumstances. Again I changed my dress,again I sat inthe window, andagain I laughedvery heartily atthe funny stories of which my employer had an immense repertoire, and which hetold inimitably.Then he handedme a yellow-backed novel, and moving my chair alittle sideways,that my own shadow might not fall upon the page, he begged me to read aloud tohim. I read forabout ten minutes, beginning inthe heart of a chapter, and thensuddenly, in the middle of a sentence, he ordered me to cease and to change mydress.

"You caneasily imagine,Mr. Holmes, howcurious I became as to what themeaning of thisextraordinary performance couldpossibly be. They were always very careful, I observed, to turnmy face away from the window, so that I becameconsumed with the desire to seewhat was going on behind my back. At first it seemed to be impossible, but I soon devised a means. My hand-mirror had been broken, so a happy thought seized me,and I concealeda piece of theglass in my handkerchief. On thenext occasion,in the midst ofmy laughter, I put my handkerchief up to my eyes, and was able with a little management to see all that there was behind me. I confess that I was disappointed.There was nothing. At least thatwas my first impression. At thesecond glance,however, I perceived that therewas a man standing in the Southampton Road, a small bearded manin a grey suit,who seemed to belooking in my direction. The road is an important highway, andthere are usually people there.This man, however, was leaning against the railings which bordered our field andwas looking earnestly up. I lowered my handkerchief and glancedat Mrs. Rucastle to find her eyes fixed upon mewith a most searching gaze. Shesaid nothing, but I am convinced that she had divined that I had a mirror in myhand and had seen what was behind me. She roseat once.

" 'Jephro,' said she,'there is an impertinent fellowupon the road there who stares up at Miss Hunter.'

" 'No friendof yours, MissHunter?' he asked.

" 'No, I know no one in these parts.'

" 'Dear me! How veryimpertinent! Kindly turn round and motion to himto go away.'

"'Surely it would be better to take no notice.'" 'No, no, we should have him loitering here always. Kindly turn round and wavehim away like that.'

"I did asI was told, andat the same instant Mrs. Rucastle drew down theblind. That wasa week ago, andfrom that timeI have not sat again in the window, nor have I worn the blue dress, nor seen theman in the road."

"Pray continue," said Holmes. "Your narrative promises to bea most interesting one."

"Youwill find it rather disconnected, I fear, and there may prove tobe little relation between thedifferent incidents of which I speak. On the very first day thatI was at the Copper Beeches, Mr. Rucastle tookme to a small outhouse which stands near the kitchen door. As weapproached it Iheard the sharprattling of a chain, and the sound as of a large animal movingabout.

" 'Lookin here!' said Mr. Rucastle, showing me a slit between two planks. 'Is he not abeauty?'

"I looked through andwas conscious oftwo glowing eyes, and of a vague figure huddledup in the darkness.

" 'Don't be frightened,' said my employer,laughing at thestart which I had given. 'It'sonly Carlo, my mastiff. I call him mine, but really old Toller,my groom, is theonly man who can do anything with him. We feedhim once a day,and not too muchthen, so that he is always as keen as mustard.Toller lets himloose every night, and God helpthe trespasser whom he lays hisfangs upon. Forgoodness' sake don't you ever onany pretext setyour foot overthe threshold atnight, for it'sas much as yourlife is worth.'"The warning was no idle one,for two nights later I happenedto look out of my bedroom windowabout two o'clock in the morning. It was a beautiful moonlightnight, and the lawn in front ofthe house was silvered over andalmost as brightas day. I was standing, rapt inthe peaceful beauty of the scene, when I was aware that something was moving under the shadow of the copper beeches. As it emerged into the moonshine I saw what it was. It wasa giant dog, aslarge as a calf, tawny tinted,with hanging jowl, black muzzle,and huge projecting bones. It walked slowly across the lawn andvanished into the shadow upon the other side. That dreadful sentinel sent a chill to my heart which I do not think that any burglar could havedone.

"And nowI have a very strange experienceto tell you. Ihad, as you know, cut off my hair in London, andI had placed itin a great coilat the bottom of my trunk. Oneevening, after the child was inbed, I began toamuse myself byexamining the furniture of my room and by rearranging my own little things. There was an old chest of drawers inthe room, the two upper ones empty and open, the lower one locked. I had filledthe first two with my linen, and as I had stillmuch to pack away I was naturally annoyed at not having the useof the third drawer. It struckme that it mighthave been fastened by a mere oversight, so I took out my bunchof keys and tried to open it. The very first keyfitted to perfection, and I drew the drawer open. There was only one thing in it, but I am surethat you wouldnever guess whatit was. It wasmy coil of hair."I took it upand examined it.It was of the same peculiar tint, and the samethickness. But then the impossibility of the thing obtruded itself upon me. Howcould my hair have been locked in the drawer? With trembling hands I undid my trunk, turned outthe contents, and drew from thebottom my own hair. I laid the two tresses together, and I assure you that theywere identical.Was it not extraordinary? Puzzleas I would, I could make nothing at all of whatit meant. I returned the strange hair to the drawer, and I saidnothing of thematter to the Rucastles as I felt that I had putmyself in the wrong by openinga drawer which they had locked."I am naturallyobservant, as you may have remarked, Mr. Holmes, and I soon hada pretty good plan of the wholehouse in my head. There was onewing, however,which appeared not to be inhabited at all. A door which faced that which led into the quarters of the Tollers opened into this suite, but it wasinvariably locked. One day, however, as I ascended the stair, Imet Mr. Rucastle coming out through this door,his keys in hishand, and a lookon his face which made him a very different person to the round, jovial man towhom I was accustomed. His cheeks were red, hisbrow was all crinkled with anger, and the veinsstood out at histemples with passion. He lockedthe door and hurried past me without a word ora look.

"This aroused my curiosity, so when I went out for a walk in the grounds with my charge, I strolled round to the side from which I could see the windows of this part of the house. There were four ofthem in a row, three of which were simply dirty,while the fourth was shutteredup. They were evidently all deserted. As I strolled up and down,glancing at them occasionally,Mr. Rucastle came out to me, looking as merry and jovial as ever.

" 'Ah!' saidhe, 'you must not think me rudeif I passed youwithout a word,my dear young lady. I was preoccupied with business matters.'

"I assured him that I was not offended. 'By the way,' said I, 'you seem to have quite a suite ofspare rooms up there, and one ofthem has the shutters up.'

"Helooked surprised and, as it seemed to me, a little startled atmy remark.

" 'Photography is one of my hobbies,' said he. 'I have made my darkroom up there. But, dear me! what an observant young lady we have come upon. Whowould have believed it? Who would have ever believed it?' He spoke in a jestingtone, but therewas no jest inhis eyes as he looked at me. I read suspicion there and annoyance, but no jest."Well, Mr. Holmes, from the moment that I understood that therewas something about that suiteof rooms which Iwas not to know, I was all on fire to go over them. It was notmere curiosity,though I have myshare of that.It was more a feeling of duty--afeeling that some good might come from my penetrating to this place. They talkof woman's instinct; perhaps itwas woman's instinct which gaveme that feeling.At any rate, itwas there, andI was keenly onthe lookout forany chance to pass the forbiddendoor.

"It wasonly yesterday that the chance came. I may tellyou that, besides Mr. Rucastle,both Toller andhis wife find something to do inthese desertedrooms, and I once saw him carrying a large blacklinen bag withhim through thedoor. Recently he has been drinking hard, and yesterday eveninghe was very drunk; and when I came upstairs there was the key inthe door. I have no doubt at all that he had left it there. Mr.and Mrs. Rucastle were both downstairs, and thechild was withthem, so that Ihad an admirableopportunity. Iturned the key gently in the lock, opened the door, and slippedthrough.

"Therewas a little passage in front of me, unpaperedand uncarpeted,which turned ata right angle atthe farther end. Round this corner were three doors in a line,the first and third of which were open. They each led into an empty room, dustyand cheerless, with two windowsin the one and one in the other,so thick with dirt that the evening light glimmered dimly through them. The centre door was closed, and acrossthe outside of it had been fastened one of the broad bars of aniron bed, padlocked at one end to a ring in thewall, and fastened at the otherwith stout cord.The door itselfwas locked as well, and the keywas not there.This barricadeddoor corresponded clearly with the shuttered window outside, andyet I could seeby the glimmerfrom beneath itthat the room was not in darkness. Evidently there was a skylight which let in light from above.As I stood in the passage gazing at the sinister door and wondering what secretit might veil,I suddenly heardthe sound of steps within the room and saw a shadow pass backward and forward against the little slit of dim light which shoneout from under the door. A mad,unreasoning terror rose up in meat the sight, Mr. Holmes. My overstrung nervesfailed me suddenly, and I turnedand ran--ran asthough some dreadful hand werebehind me clutching at the skirtof my dress. Irushed down thepassage, throughthe door, and straight into thearms of Mr. Rucastle, who was waiting outside." 'So,' said he, smiling, 'it was you, then. Ithought that itmust be when I saw the door open.'

" 'Oh, I amso frightened!'I panted.

" 'Mydear young lady! my dear younglady!'--you cannot think how caressing and soothing his manner was--'and what has frightened you, my dear younglady?'

"But hisvoice was justa little too coaxing. He overdidit. I was keenly on my guard against him.

" 'Iwas foolish enough to go into the empty wing,'I answered. 'Butit is so lonelyand eerie in this dim light that I was frightened and ran out again. Oh, it isso dreadfully still in there!'" 'Only that?' said he, lookingat me keenly.

"'Why, what didyou think?' I asked.

" 'Why doyou think that Ilock this door?'

" 'I am surethat I do not know.'

" 'It is to keep people out who have no business there. Doyou see?' He was still smilingin the most amiable manner.

" 'I am sure if I had known--'

" 'Well, then, youknow now. And ifyou ever put your foot over that threshold again'--here in an instant the smilehardened into agrin of rage, and he glared down at me with theface of a demon--'I'll throw you to the mastiff.'

"I was so terrified that I do not know whatI did. I supposethat I must have rushed past him into my room.I remember nothing until I foundmyself lying onmy bed trembling all over. ThenI thought of you, Mr. Holmes. Icould not livethere longer without some advice. I was frightened of the house,of the man, ofthe woman, of the servants, evenof the child. They were all horrible to me. IfI could only bring you down allwould be well. Of course I mighthave fled fromthe house, but my curiosity wasalmost as strongas my fears. Mymind was soon made up. I wouldsend you a wire.I put on my hatand cloak, wentdown to the office, which is about half a milefrom the house,and then returned, feeling verymuch easier. A horrible doubt came into my mindas I approachedthe door lest the dog might be loose, but I remembered that Toller had drunk himself into a state of insensibility that evening,and I knew thathe was the onlyone in the household who had any influence withthe savage creature, or who would venture to set him free. I slipped in in safety and lay awakehalf the nightin my joy at thethought of seeing you. I had nodifficulty in getting leave tocome into Winchester this morning, but I must beback before three o'clock, forMr. and Mrs. Rucastle are goingon a visit, andwill be away allthe evening, sothat I must look after the child. Now I have told you all my adventures, Mr. Holmes, and I should be very gladif you could tell me what it allmeans, and, above all, what I should do."

Holmes and I had listened spellboundto this extraordinary story. Myfriend rose nowand paced up and down the room,his hands in his pockets, and an expression ofthe most profound gravity upon his face.

"Is Toller still drunk?" he asked.

"Yes. I heard hiswife tell Mrs. Rucastle that shecould do nothing with him."

"That is well. Andthe Rucastles go out to-night?""Yes."

"Is there a cellar with a good stronglock?"

"Yes, the wine-cellar.""You seem to meto have acted all through thismatter like a very brave and sensible girl, MissHunter. Do youthink that you could perform onemore feat? I should not ask itof you if I didnot think you aquite exceptional woman."

"I will try. What isit?"

"We shallbe at the CopperBeeches by seven o'clock, my friend and I. TheRucastles will be gone by that time, and Tollerwill, we hope, be incapable. There only remainsMrs. Toller, whomight give thealarm. If you could send her into the cellar onsome errand, andthen turn the key upon her, youwould facilitate matters immensely."

"I will do it."

"Excellent! We shall then look thoroughly into the affair. Of course there is only one feasible explanation. You have been brought thereto personate someone, and the real person is imprisoned in thischamber. That is obvious. As towho this prisoner is, I have nodoubt that it is the daughter,Miss Alice Rucastle, if I remember right, who was said to have gone to America.You were chosen,doubtless, as resembling her inheight, figure,and the colourof your hair. Hers had been cutoff, very possibly in some illness through whichshe has passed,and so, of course, yours had tobe sacrificed also. By a curious chance you came upon her tresses. The man in the road was undoubtedly some friend of hers--possibly her fiance--and no doubt,as you wore thegirl's dress andwere so like her, he was convinced from your laughter, wheneverhe saw you, andafterwards fromyour gesture, that Miss Rucastle was perfectlyhappy, and thatshe no longer desired his attentions. The dog islet loose at night to prevent him from endeavouring to communicate with her. Somuch is fairlyclear. The mostserious point inthe case is thedisposition ofthe child."

"What on earth hasthat to do withit?" I ejaculated.

"My dear Watson, you as a medical man are continually gaining light as to the tendencies ofa child by the study of the parents. Don't you see that the converse is equallyvalid. I have frequently gainedmy first real insight into the character of parents by studyingtheir children.This child's disposition is abnormally cruel, merely for cruelty's sake, and whether he derivesthis from his smiling father, asI should suspect, or from his mother, it bodesevil for the poor girl who is intheir power.""I am sure thatyou are right, Mr. Holmes," cried our client. "Athousand thingscome back to mewhich make me certain that youhave hit it. Oh,let us lose notan instant in bringing help tothis poor creature."

"We must be circumspect, for we are dealing with a very cunning man. We can do nothing until seven o'clock. At that hour we shall be withyou, and it willnot be long before we solve themystery."

We were as good as our word, for itwas just seven when we reached the Copper Beeches, having put upour trap at a wayside public-house. The group of trees, with their dark leavesshining like burnished metal inthe light of thesetting sun, were sufficient tomark the houseeven had Miss Hunter not been standing smiling on the door-step."Have you managed it?" asked Holmes.

A loud thudding noise came from somewhere downstairs. "That is Mrs. Toller in the cellar," said she. "Her husband lies snoring on the kitchen rug. Hereare his keys, which are the duplicates of Mr. Rucastle's."

"Youhave done wellindeed!" cried Holmes with enthusiasm. "Now leadthe way, and weshall soon seethe end of thisblack business."We passed up the stair, unlocked the door, followed on down apassage, and found ourselves infront of the barricade which Miss Hunter had described. Holmes cut the cord andremoved the transverse bar. Thenhe tried the various keys in the lock, but without success. Nosound came fromwithin, and at the silence Holmes' face cloudedover.

"I trustthat we are nottoo late," saidhe. "I think, Miss Hunter, thatwe had better goin without you.Now, Watson, put your shoulderto it, and we shall see whetherwe cannot make our way in."

Itwas an old rickety door and gaveat once beforeour united strength. Together werushed into theroom. It was empty. There was no furniture savea little palletbed, a small table, and a basketful of linen. The skylight above was open, andthe prisoner gone.

"There has been some villainy here," said Holmes; "this beauty has guessed Miss Hunter's intentions and hascarried his victim off."

"But how?"

"Through the skylight. Weshall soon see how he managed it." He swung himself up onto theroof. "Ah, yes,"he cried, "here's the end of along light ladder against the eaves. That is howhe did it."

"But it is impossible," said MissHunter; "the ladder was not there when the Rucastles went away.""He has come back and done it.I tell you thathe is a cleverand dangerous man. I should notbe very much surprised if this were he whose step I hear now upon the stair. I think, Watson, that it would be as well for you to have your pistol ready."

Thewords were hardly out of his mouth before a manappeared at thedoor of the room, a very fat andburly man, witha heavy stick in his hand. MissHunter screamedand shrunk against the wall atthe sight of him, but Sherlock Holmes sprang forward and confronted him.

"You villain!" said he, "where's yourdaughter?"

Thefat man cast hiseyes round, andthen up at theopen skylight."It is for me toask you that,"he shrieked, "you thieves! Spiesand thieves! Ihave caught you,have I? You arein my power. I'll serve you!" He turned and clattered down thestairs as hard as he could go."He's gone for the dog!" cried Miss Hunter.

"Ihave my revolver," said I.

"Better close the front door," criedHolmes, and weall rushed downthe stairs together. We had hardly reached the hall when we heard the baying ofa hound, and then a scream of agony, with a horrible worrying sound which it wasdreadful to listen to. An elderly man with a red face and shaking limbs came staggering out ata side door.

"My God!" he cried. "Someone has loosed the dog. It's not been fedfor two days. Quick, quick, orit'll be too late!"

Holmes andI rushed out andround the angleof the house, with Toller hurrying behind us. There was the huge famished brute, its black muzzle buried in Rucastle's throat,while he writhedand screamed upon the ground. Running up, I blew its brains out, and it fell over with its keenwhite teeth still meeting in the great creasesof his neck. With much labour weseparated themand carried him,living but horribly mangled, into the house. Welaid him upon the drawing-roomsofa, and havingdispatched thesobered Toller to bear the newsto his wife, I did what I couldto relieve his pain. We were allassembled roundhim when the door opened, and atall, gaunt woman entered the room.

"Mrs. Toller!" cried MissHunter.

"Yes, miss. Mr. Rucastle let me out when he came back before he went upto you. Ah, miss, it is a pityyou didn't let me know what youwere planning, for I would havetold you that your pains were wasted."

"Ha!" said Holmes, looking keenly at her. "It is clear that Mrs. Tollerknows more aboutthis matter than anyone else.""Yes, sir, I do, and I am readyenough to tellwhat I know."

"Then, pray, sitdown, and let ushear it for there are several points on which Imust confess that I am still inthe dark."

"Iwill soon make it clear to you,"said she; "andI'd have done sobefore now if Icould ha' got out from the cellar. If there's police-court business over this,you'll rememberthat I was the one that stood your friend, and that I was Miss Alice's friend too.

"She was never happy at home, Miss Alice wasn't, from the time that her father married again. She was slighted like and hadno say in anything, but it neverreally became bad for her untilafter she met Mr. Fowler at a friend's house. As well as I could learn, Miss Alice had rights of her own by will, but she was so quiet and patient, she was, that she never said a word about them but just left everything inMr. Rucastle's hands. He knew hewas safe with her; but when there was a chanceof a husband coming forward, whowould ask for all that the lawwould give him,then her fatherthought it timeto put a stop onit. He wanted her to sign a paper, so that whether she marriedor not, he coulduse her money.When she wouldn't do it, he kepton worrying heruntil she got brain-fever, andfor six weeks was at death's door. Then she gotbetter at last,all worn to a shadow, and with her beautiful hair cut off; but that didn't makeno change in heryoung man, andhe stuck to heras true as man could be."

"Ah,"said Holmes, "Ithink that whatyou have been good enough to tell us makes thematter fairly clear, and that Ican deduce all that remains. Mr.Rucastle then,I presume, tookto this system of imprisonment?""Yes, sir."

"And brought MissHunter down from London in order to get rid ofthe disagreeablepersistence ofMr. Fowler."

"That was it, sir."

"But Mr. Fowler being a persevering man, as agood seaman should be, blockaded the house, andhaving met yousucceeded by certain arguments,metallic or otherwise, in convincing you that your interests were the same as his."

"Mr. Fowlerwas a very kind-spoken, free-handed gentleman,"said Mrs. Toller serenely.

"And in this way hemanaged that your good man should have no wantof drink, and that a ladder should be ready at the moment when your master had gone out."

"Youhave it, sir, just as it happened."

"I am surewe owe you an apology, Mrs. Toller," said Holmes, "for you havecertainly cleared up everythingwhich puzzled us. And here comesthe country surgeon and Mrs. Rucastle, so I think, Watson, thatwe had best escort Miss Hunterback to Winchester, as it seemsto me that our locus standi nowis rather a questionable one."And thus was solved the mysteryof the sinisterhouse with the copper beeches infront of the door. Mr. Rucastlesurvived, but was always a broken man, kept alive solely through the care of his devoted wife.They still livewith their old servants, who probably know so much of Rucastle'spast life thathe finds it difficult to part from them. Mr. Fowler and Miss Rucastle were married, by special license, in Southampton the day after their flight, and he is nowthe holder of agovernment appointment in the island of Mauritius. As to Miss Violet Hunter, myfriend Holmes,rather to my disappointment, manifested no further interest in her when once shehad ceased to be the centre ofone of his problems, and she isnow the head ofa private schoolat Walsall, where I believe that she has met with considerablesuccess.

*** END OF THE PROJECTGUTENBERG EBOOK, THE ADVENTURESOF SHERLOCK HOLMES ***

This file should be named advsh12h.htmor advsh12h.zipCorrected EDITIONS of our eBooksget a new NUMBER, advsh13h.txtVERSIONS based on separate sources get new LETTER, advsh12ah.txtProject Gutenberg eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, allof which are confirmed as PublicDomain in the US
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus,we usually do not
keep eBooks incompliance withany particularpaper edition.We are now trying to release allour eBooks oneyear in advanceof the officialrelease dates, leaving time forbetter editing.Please be encouraged to tell usabout any erroror corrections,even years afterthe official publication date.Please note neither this listing nor its contents are final tilmidnight of thelast day of themonth of any such announcement.The official release date of all Project Gutenberg eBooks is atMidnight, Central Time, of thelast day of thestated month.  Apreliminary version may often be posted for suggestion, commentand editing bythose who wish to do so.

Most people start at our Web sites at:http://gutenberg.net or
http://promo.net/pg

These Web sites include award-winning informationabout Project
Gutenberg, including how to donate, how to help produce our new
eBooks, and how tosubscribe to our email newsletter (free!).


Those of you who want to downloadany eBook beforeannouncement
can get to them asfollows, and just download by date.  This is
also a good way toget them instantly upon announcement, as the
indexes our cataloguers produce obviously take a while after an
announcement goesout in the Project Gutenberg Newsletter.

http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/etext04 or
ftp://ftp.ibiblio.org/pub/docs/books/gutenberg/etext03

Or/etext03, 02, 01, 00, 99, 98, 97, 96, 95, 94, 93, 92, 92, 91 or90

Just searchby the first five letters of the filename you want,
as it appears in our Newsletters.


Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)

We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
time it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hours
to get any eBook selected, entered, proofread, edited, copyright
searched and analyzed, the copyrightletters written, etc.   Our
projected audienceis one hundred million readers.If the value
per text is nominally estimated atone dollar thenwe produce $2
million dollars per hour in 2002as we release over 100 new textfiles per month:1240 more eBooks in 2001 for atotal of 4000+We are already on our way to trying for 2000 more eBooks in 2002If they reach just 1-2% of theworld's population then the total
will reach over half a trillion eBooks given away by year's end.

The Goal ofProject Gutenberg is to Give Away 1 Trillion eBooks!
This is tenthousand titleseach to one hundred million readers,
which is only about 4% ofthe present number of computer users.

Here is the briefest record of our progress (* means estimated):

eBooksYear Month1  1971 July10  1991 January100  1994 January
 1000  1997August
 1500  1998 October
 2000  1999 December2500  2000 December
 3000  2001 November
 40002001 October/November
 6000  2002 December*
 9000  2003 November*
10000  2004January*


The Project GutenbergLiterary Archive Foundation hasbeen created
tosecure a futurefor Project Gutenberg into thenext millennium.We need your donations more than ever!

As ofFebruary, 2002,contributions are being solicited from people
and organizationsin: Alabama, Alaska, Arkansas, Connecticut,
Delaware, District of Columbia, Florida, Georgia, Hawaii, Illinois,Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Kentucky,Louisiana, Maine, Massachusetts,
Michigan, Mississippi, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New
Hampshire, NewJersey, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina, Ohio,
Oklahoma, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, South
Dakota,Tennessee, Texas, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Washington, West
Virginia, Wisconsin, and Wyoming.We have filed inall 50 states now, but these are the only onesthat have responded.

As the requirements for other states are met, additions tothis list
willbe made and fundraising will begin in the additional states.
Please feel free to ask to check the status of your state.

In answer to various questions we havereceived on this:

We are constantly working onfinishing the paperwork to legally
request donations in all 50states.  If yourstate is not listed and
you would like to knowif we have addedit since the list you have,
just ask.

While wecannot solicitdonations from people in stateswhere we are
notyet registered,we know of no prohibition against accepting
donations from donors in these states who approachus with an offerto
donate.

International donations are accepted, but we don'tknow ANYTHING about
how to makethem tax-deductible, or even ifthey CAN be madedeductible, anddon't have thestaff to handleit even if thereare
ways.

Donations by check or money order may be sent to:

Project GutenbergLiterary Archive Foundation
PMB113
1739 University Ave.
Oxford, MS 38655-4109Contact us if you want to arrange for a wire transfer or payment
method other than by check ormoney order.

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundationhas been approved by
the US Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) organizationwith EIN
[Employee Identification Number] 64-622154.  Donationsare
tax-deductible to the maximum extent permitted by law.  Asfund-raising
requirements for other states are met, additions tothis list willbe
made and fund-raising will begin in the additional states.

We need your donations more thanever!

You can get up to date donation information online at:

http://www.gutenberg.net/donation.html


***

Ifyou can't reachProject Gutenberg,
you can always email directlyto:

Michael S.Hart <hart@pobox.com>

Prof. Hart will answer or forward your message.

We would prefer to sendyou informationby email.


**The Legal Small Print**


(ThreePages)

***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS**START***
Why is this "Small Print!" statement here? You know: lawyers.
They tell us you might sueus if there is something wrong with
your copy ofthis eBook, even if you got itfor free from
someone other thanus, and even ifwhat's wrong isnot our
fault.So, among otherthings, this "Small Print!" statement
disclaimsmost of our liability to you. Italso tells youhow
you may distribute copies ofthis eBook if you want to.

*BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS EBOOK
By using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
eBook, you indicatethat you understand, agree to and accept
this "Small Print!" statement. If you do not, you can receive
a refundof the money (ifany) you paid for this eBook bysending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the personyou got it from.If you receivedthis eBook on aphysical
medium(such as a disk), you must return it with yourrequest.

ABOUTPROJECT GUTENBERG-TM EBOOKS
ThisPROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBook, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBooks,
is a "publicdomain" work distributed by Professor Michael S. Hart
through the Project Gutenberg Association(the "Project").
Among other things, this meansthat no one owns a United States copyright
on or for this work,so the Project(and you!) can copy and
distribute it in the United States without permission and
without payingcopyright royalties. Special rules, set forth
below, apply if you wish to copyand distribute this eBook
underthe "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.

Please do not use the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark to market
any commercialproducts without permission.

To create these eBooks, the Project expends considerable
effortsto identify, transcribe and proofread public domain
works. Despite these efforts, the Project'seBooks and any
medium they may be on may contain"Defects". Among other
things,Defects may takethe form of incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or otherintellectual property infringement, a defectiveor damaged
diskor other eBook medium, a computer virus, or computer
codes thatdamage or cannotbe read by yourequipment.

LIMITED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES
But for the"Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
[1] Michael Hart and the Foundation (and anyother party youmay
receive thiseBook from as aPROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBook) disclaims
all liability to you fordamages, costs and expenses, including
legal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIESFOR NEGLIGENCE OR
UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR FORBREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVEOR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

If you discover a Defect inthis eBook within 90 days of
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money(if any)
you paid for it by sending an explanatory note withinthat
time to theperson you received it from. Ifyou received iton a physical medium, you mustreturn it with your note, and
such person may choose to alternatively give you areplacement
copy. If you received it electronically, such person may
choose toalternatively give you a secondopportunity to
receive it electronically.

THISEBOOK IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS". NO OTHER
WARRANTIESOF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED,ARE MADE TO YOUAS
TO THE EBOOKOR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A
PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do notallow disclaimers of implied warranties or
theexclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
above disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you,and you
may haveother legal rights.

INDEMNITYYou will indemnify and hold Michael Hart, the Foundation,
and its trustees and agents, and any volunteers associated
with the production and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
texts harmless, from all liability, cost and expense, including
legal fees, that arise directly or indirectlyfrom any of thefollowing that you do or cause:[1] distribution of this eBook,[2] alteration,modification, or addition to the eBook,
or [3]any Defect.

DISTRIBUTION UNDER"PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"
You may distribute copiesof this eBook electronically, or by
disk, bookor any other medium if you either delete this
"Small Print!" andall other references to ProjectGutenberg,
or:[1]  Only giveexact copies ofit.  Among otherthings, thisrequires thatyou do not remove, alter or modify the
     eBook or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,
     if you wish, distribute this eBook in machine readable
     binary,compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,
     including any form resulting fromconversion by word
     processing or hypertextsoftware, but only so long as*EITHER*:[*]  The eBook, when displayed, is clearly readable, anddoes *not* contain characters other thanthoseintended by theauthor of the work, although tilde
          (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_)characters maybe use









d to convey punctuation intendedby the









author, and additional characters may be usedto
          indicate hypertextlinks; OR[*]  The eBook may be readily converted by the reader atno expense into plain ASCII,EBCDIC or equivalent
          form by the program that displaysthe eBook (as is
          thecase, for instance, with most word processors);OR[*]  You provide, or agree toalso provide onrequest atno additional cost, fee orexpense, a copyof the









eBook in its original plain ASCII form (or inEBCDIC









or other equivalent proprietaryform).

[2]  Honor the eBook refund and replacement provisionsof this
     "Small Print!" statement.

[3]  Paya trademark license fee to theFoundation of 20% of the
     gross profits youderive calculated using the method you
     already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  Ifyou
     don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties arepayable to"Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation"the 60 days following eachdate you prepare (or werelegally requiredto prepare) your annual (or equivalent
     periodic) tax return.  Please contact us beforehandto
     let usknow your plansand to work outthe details.

WHAT IF YOU *WANT*TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'THAVE TO?
Project Gutenberg is dedicated to increasing the number of
public domain and licensedworks that can be freely distributed
in machinereadable form.The Project gratefully accepts contributions ofmoney, time,
public domain materials, or royaltyfree copyrightlicenses.
Moneyshould be paid to the:
"ProjectGutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

If youare interested in contributing scanning equipment or
software orother items, please contact Michael Hart at:
hart@pobox.com

[Portions of thiseBook's header and trailer may be reprinted onlywhen distributed free of all fees.  Copyright (C) 2001, 2002 byMichael S. Hart.  Project Gutenberg is a TradeMark and may notbe
used in any sales of ProjectGutenberg eBooksor other materials be
they hardware or softwareor any other related product without
express permission.]

*ENDTHE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS*Ver.02/11/02*END*The Project Gutenberg EBook of History of the United States
by Charles A. Beardand Mary R. Beard

This eBook isfor the use ofanyone anywhereat no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You maycopy it, give itaway or
re-useit under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook oronline at www.gutenberg.net


Title: History ofthe United States

Author: Charles A. Beard andMary R. Beard

Release Date: October 28, 2005 [EBook #16960]

Language: EnglishCharacter set encoding: ISO-8859-1

*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK HISTORY OF THE UNITED STATES ***Produced byCurtis Weyant, Mand the OnlineDistributed
Proofreading Team athttp://www.pgdp.net







HISTORY

OF THE

UNITED STATES


BYCHARLES A. BEARD

AND

MARY R.BEARD



New York

THE MACMILLAN COMPANY

1921_All rights reserved_

COPYRIGHT, 1921,

BY THEMACMILLAN COMPANY.


Set up andelectrotyped. Published March,1921.




Norwood Press

J.S. Cushing Co.--Berwick & Smith Co.NORWOOD, MASS.,U.S.A.




PREFACE


As things now stand, the course of instruction in Americanhistory in
our public schools embraces three distinct treatmentsof the subject.Three separatebooks are used.First, there isthe primary book, which
is usually a very condensed narrative with emphasis on biographies and
anecdotes. Second, there is the advanced text forthe seventh oreighth
grade, generally speaking, an expansion of the elementarybook by the
addition of forty or fifty thousandwords. Finally,there is the high
school manual. This, too, ordinarily followsthe beaten path,giving
fuller accounts of the same events and characters. To put it bluntly, wedo not assume that our childrenobtain permanent possessions from their
study of history in thelower grades. If mathematiciansfollowed the
same method, highschool texts onalgebra and geometry would include the
multiplication table andfractions.

There is, of course,a ready answerto the criticismadvanced above.It
is that teachers have learned from bitter experience how little history
their pupils retainas they pass along the regular route. No teacherof
history willdeny this. Still it is a standing challenge toexisting
methodsof historical instruction. If the study of history cannot be
made truly progressive like the study of mathematics, science, andlanguages, thenthe historiansassume a grave responsibility inadding
their subject to the already overloadedcurriculum. If the successive
historical texts are only enlargededitions of thefirst text--more
facts, more dates, more words--then history deserves most of the sharp
criticism which it is receiving from teachers of science, civics, and
economics.

In this condition ofaffairs we findour justification for offering anew high schooltext in American history. Our first contribution is one
of omission. The time-honored stories of exploration and the
biographies of heroes areleft out. We frankly hold that,if pupils know
little or nothingabout Columbus,Cortes, Magellan, or Captain John
Smith by thetime they reachthe high school,it is useless to tell the
samestories for perhaps the fourth time. It is worsethan useless. It
is an offenseagainst the teachers of those subjects that aredemonstrated tobe progressive in character.

Inthe next placewe have omittedall descriptionsof battles. Ourreasons for this are simple. The strategy of acampaign or of asingle
battle is a highly technical, and usually a highly controversial, matterabout which experts differ widely. In the fieldof military andnaval
operations most writers and teachers of history are merenovices. To
dispose of Gettysburg or the Wilderness in ten linesor ten pages isequally absurdto the serious student of military affairs. Anyone who
comparesthe ordinary textbook account of a single CivilWar campaign
with the account given by Ropes, for instance, will ask for no further
comment. Noyouth called upon to serve ourcountry in armswould think
of turning to a highschool manual for information about the art ofwarfare. The dramatic scene or episode, so useful in arousing the
interest of the immature pupil, seems out of place in a book that
deliberatelyappeals to boysand girls on the very thresholdof life's
serious responsibilities.

It is notupon negative features, however,that we rest our case. It is
rather upon constructive features._First._ We have written a topical, not a narrative, history.We have
tried toset forth the important aspects, problems, andmovements of
each period, bringing in the narrative rather by way of illustration.

_Second._ Wehave emphasizedthose historical topics which help to
explain how our nation has come to be what it is to-day._Third._ We have dwelt fully upon the social and economic aspects of our
history, especially inrelation to thepolitics of each period.

_Fourth._ We have treated the causesand results of wars, the problems
of financing and sustaining armed forces, rather than militarystrategy.
Theseare the subjects which belong to a history forcivilians. Theseare matters which civilians canunderstand--matters which theymust
understand,if they are toplay well theirpart in war andpeace.

_Fifth._By omitting theperiod of exploration, we havebeen able to
enlarge the treatment of our own time. We have given special attention
to the history of those current questions which must form the subject
matterof sound instruction in citizenship.

_Sixth._We have borne inmind that America, with all herunique
characteristics, is a part of a generalcivilization. Accordingly we
have given diplomacy, foreign affairs, world relations, and the
reciprocal influences of nations their appropriateplace.

_Seventh._ We have deliberately aimed atstandards of maturity. The
study of a mere narrative calls mainly for the use of the memory. Wehave aimed to stimulate habitsof analysis, comparison, association,
reflection, and generalization--habits calculated to enlarge as well as
inform the mind. We have been at great pains to make our text clear,
simple, and direct; but we have earnestly sought to stretch the
intellects ofour readers--toput them upon their mettle. Most of them
will receive the lastof their formalinstruction in the high school.The world will soon expect maturity from them. Their achievements will
depend upon the possession of other powers than memory alone. The
effectiveness of theircitizenship in our republic willbe measured bythe excellence of their judgmentas well as thefullness of their
information.C.A.B.









M.R.B.

     NEW YORK CITY,February 8, 1921.




=A SMALLLIBRARY IN AMERICAN HISTORY=_=SINGLE VOLUMES:=_

BASSETT, J.S. _A Short History of the United States_
ELSON,H.W. _History of the United States of America__=SERIES:=_

"EPOCHS OF AMERICAN HISTORY," EDITED BY A.B. HARTHART, A.B. _Formation of the Union_
THWAITES,R.G. _The Colonies_
WILSON, WOODROW. _Division and Reunion_

"RIVERSIDE SERIES,"EDITED BY W.E.DODD

BECKER, C.L. _Beginnings of the American People_
DODD, W.E. _Expansion andConflict_
JOHNSON, A. _Union and Democracy_
PAXSON, F.L. _The New Nation_




CONTENTS


PART I. THE COLONIAL PERIOD

CHAPTER